,Title,Time,Content
0,Health ministry implements HIV AIDS Act 2017: All you need to know,2018-09-11T14:30:17+05:30,"NEW DELHI: The HIV AIDS (prevention and control) Act 2017 was implementated September 10 onwards, announced the Ministry of Health and Family Welfare on Tuesday. 


Rajya Sabha passed the bill in March that criminalises discrimination against patients suffering Acquired Immune Deficiency Syndrome (AIDS), a condition caused by Human Immunodeficiency Virus (HIV) , which attacks and weakens the body’s immune system. Here is all you need to know about the act:

* The bill is a milestone because it empowers a person living with HIV to report discrimination meted out against them in fields of employment, health care services, educational services, public facilities, property rights, holding public office, and insurance.

* The Act penalises ""propagation of hatred"" against the protected person where a violator could be punished with a minimum jail term of three months to a maximum of two years and can be fined up to one lakh rupees.

* The Act makes Anti-Retroviral Treatment (ART) a legal right for all HIV/AIDS patients. It has also adopted ""test and treat"" policy which means any person testing positive will be entitled for free treatment by the state and central government. Earlier, this was restricted by a CD4 count rate.

* It also provides for confidentiality of HIV-related information and makes it necessary to get informed consent for undertaking HIV tests, medical treatment and research.

* The law makes it mandatory for state governments to appoint an Ombudsman to inquire into complaints related to the violation of the Act and the provision of health care services. 

* If a person or an institution fails to comply with any order given by the Ombudsman within the stipulated period of time, they could be fined a maximum of Rs 10,000. A continuous failure could lead to an additional fine of up to Rs 5000 every day until the they comply.

* The new legislation has provisions to safeguard the property rights of HIV positive people. Every HIV infected person below the age of 18 years has the right to reside in a shared household and enjoy the facilities of the household.

* The Bill was initially introduced in Parliament by the UPA government, the amendments to the HIV and AIDS (Prevention and Control) Bill, 2014 were revived by the Narendra Modi government in July last year.

* The total number of people living with HIV in India is estimated at 21.17 lakhs, whereas around 86000 new HIV infections were reported in 2015, showing 66% decline in new infections from 2000. In 2015 around 68000 people died of AIDS-related causes nationally.


Read this story in Bengali
"
1,Mumbai: Free HIV tests at six railway stations for a week from Dec 1,2018-11-24T00:17:38+05:30,"MUMBAI: In a bid to change the negative attitude towards HIV testing, Mumbai District AIDS Control Society (MDACS) will offer free tests at six railway stations with maximum footfalls on December 1, World AIDS Day.

The test will be available for a week at Rs75 almost a fifth of the usual cost at 700 laboratories of the private Metropolis laboratory from December. 

“We are focusing on normalising HIV testing,’’ said Dr Shrikala Acharya of MDACS ahead of World AIDS Day, whose theme is ‘Know your status’. If tests are easily available at public places for free or at affordable rates, testing may be seen as a socially accepted concept. “At present, if people are asked to undergo a test by their doctor or health worker, they will come up with an excuse or say this test is not for them as they are safe,’’ she said.

There are 38,000 people with the virus who have registered with MDACS in Mumbai city, but there is no corresponding estimate for the private sector so far.

MDACS will put up kiosks at CSTM, Dadar, Kurla, Andheri, Ghatkopar and Borivli stations to make the test easily accessible.

Experts admit that the stigma attached to HIV and AIDS is still high, preventing people from testing themselves, leading to a delay in the start of treatment. “We want to make testing a social movement. It should be a normal question to ask each other if one has undergone the HIV test,’’ she added. 

MDACS will carry out social media campaigns with Marathi film and TV actors to promote HIV testing. “The idea is to create a social movement of sorts so that people forget the stigma attached to HIV testing,” she said.

"
2,"Insurers can't deny cover for HIV+ patients, says IRDAI",2018-10-11T11:36:35+05:30,"COIMBATORE: The Insurance Regulatory and Development Authority of India (IRDAI) has said that HIV-positive individuals cannot be denied insurance cover, unless supported by actuarial studies. The regulator has asked insurers to stop discriminating against persons with HIV/AIDS.


IRDAI has made this mandatory after 'The Human Immunodeficiency Virus (HIV) and Acquired Immunodeficiency Syndrome (AIDS) (Prevention and control) Act, 2017' came into force from September 10. The Act bars insurance companies from discriminating against HIV-positive individuals. However, most insurance companies have stayed away from launching products for HIV/AIDS patients due to pricing-related issues.

""If the immunity is low due to a person being HIV-positive, treatment expenses go up several times. The cost of tests and duration of stay in the hospital for HIV-positive patients would be much more compared to regular patients. That is why insurance companies are wary about offering cover for persons with compromised immunity,"" a senior industry official said.

New India Assurance Company CMD G Srinivasan said, ""The problem is that insurers do not have enough data to design a cover for HIV-positive patients. We can offer coverage for early-stage HIV-positive patients with certain caveats and conditions."" Star Health Insurance was the first company in the country to come out with an exclusive policy for such patients on a group basis. The 'Star Netplus Insurance Plan' is a special policy catering to HIV positive patients.

"
3,When meds don’t heal: HIV+ kids fight daily war with side-effects,2018-09-04T03:24:45+05:30,"SOLAPUR: Sumana has the appearance of a 10-year-old though she’s a teenager 11 months shy of 18. Four feet tall and with body weight of 30 kilos, she is at least 25kg underweight and significantly short for her age. Her mental ability is of a kid half her age. She is also hearing impaired.


At Solapur’s Palawi-Prabha Hira Pratishthan, one of Maharashtra’s oldest institutions caring for children living with HIV, cases like Sumana’s are not an exception. At least 60% of the 110 children here suffer from varying degrees of hearing loss. The prevalence of height and weight stunting is more than 70%, while over a third have stymied mental development. Besides physical, the prevalence of mental health problems such as depression is alarmingly high. 

AIDS-related deaths may have dropped 54% and new infections 66% in India over a decade, but children like Sumana are testimony to the gaping deficit in the national programme that focuses on drugs instead of a comprehensive medical, nutritional and psychosocial model that a complex disease like HIV warrants. 



An otherwise spirited child, Sumant becomes drowsy and irritable after taking medicines. “I get severe stomach-ache, dizziness, headache and diarrhoea,” he says, describing his plight after taking the daily dose of antiretroviral therapy (ART) medicines. The six-year-old is among the 17 children at the Palawi home who have forsaken ART even though their survival depends on it. Born with the virus, these children need to take 2-6 capsules daily. For additional infections such as tuberculosis, the pill count could run into double digits. 

“Children go through hell in spite of ART. There is no denying the dramatic shift in HIV care today, but what about those who got the disease at the turn of the century and have spent a lifetime taking medicines? We know little or nothing about what the virus or ART does to each child,” said Palawi’s 65-year-old founder Mangaltai Shah. She says most children in Palawi grapple with everyday health problems ranging from skin rashes, oral and vaginal yeast infections, pus accumulation in ears, hearing and vision problems to life-threatening infections like TB. “So when medicines meant to heal start giving trouble, they find it easier to discard.” Moreover, she adds, institutions like Palawi neither have adequate funds nor support from government hospitals to tackle the unique problems of each child.

Sumant is supposed to receive intensive counselling from the local ART centre till his adherence improves, but Shah says the three doctors and four counsellors that cater to 300 HIV patients daily at Solapur Civil Hospital barely have the time. 

For nearly 3 lakh registered HIV patients in the state, there are less than 1,000 counsellors. Palawi was compelled to start its own school in 2014 as children are denied admission in regular ones the moment Palawi is mentioned. But it’s a blessing in disguise for these children who struggle to sit through more than one or two classes without dozing off. 

Palawi, which has been home to 250 HIV-positive children since 2001, has lost 40 to the disease. 


"
4,"In 7 years, HIV cases in India dropped by 27%: UN report",2018-07-25T03:49:15+05:30,"NEW DELHI: India has witnessed a major reduction in its AIDS burden with new HIV cases dropping by 26.6% and AIDS-related deaths declining 56.8% between 2010 and 2017 backed by sustained and focused efforts, a latest report by the United Nations says. The report warned the epidemic was growing in Pakistan and Philippines.


In India, new HIV infections dropped from 1.2 lakh 2010 to 88,000 in 2017, AIDS related deaths from 1.6 lakh to 69,000 and people living with HIV from 23 lakh to 21 lakh in the same time period.



In fact, India has done better than the global average in terms of improvement percentage. Globally, new infections declined by merely 18% since 2010 against a target of 75% by 2020, though deaths due to the virus have dropped by 34% during 2010-2017 with expansion of anti-retroviral therapy and increasing access to other treatment options, the report said.

""Sustained and focused efforts to reach key populations have led to major reductions in HIV infections in Cambodia, India, Myanmar, Thailand and Vietnam between 2010 and 2017. However, epidemics are expanding in Pakistan and Philippines,"" the report titled 'Miles to go -closing gaps, breaking barriers, righting injustices' said. The report has been prepared by the joint UN Agency on AIDS (UNAIDS).

"
5,World AIDS Day 2018: Chennai college students to take oath to not discriminate people living with HIV,2018-11-30T01:18:01+05:30,"CHENNAI: Indian Community Welfare Organisation and Shri Krishnaswamy College for Women will jointly mark the World AIDS Day on November 30 with a theme, “Know your Status”. 

At least 2,500 students will participate in the event, to be held at the Shri Krishnaswamy College for Women in Anna Nagar here between 11am and 12pm. 

A huge human red ribbon would be displayed by the students during the event, which would be followed by taking an oath to not discriminate people living with HIV/AIDS, said a release from ICWO. 


"
6,Private drug de-addiction centres to have HIV testing,2018-09-17T08:14:07+05:30,"CHANDIGARH: In an effort aimed at timely detection of HIV-infected drug addicts through proper screening and testing, the Punjab government has decided to open integrated counselling and testing centres at private drug de-addiction centres. The government plans to set up these under public-private partnership (PPP) mode. 

As per the data of National Health Profile-2018, which was released recently, there are 26,841 people living with HIV/AIDS (PLHIV). The state has 12 antiretroviral therapy centres where HIV infected people are given treatment. There are around 84 de-addiction centres located in different parts of the states, of which 53 are licensed private centres. While most of the government drug de-addiction centres already have integrated counselling and testing centres, the private centres are functioning without this facility. 

Dr Manpreet Chhatwal, additional project director of Punjab State Aids Control Society, shared that the integrated counselling and testing centres will be opened in private drug de-addiction centres under PPP mode as defined by the National Aids Control Organisation for screening of HIV patients as well as for hepatitis-C. As per the guidelines framed by the health department, proper screening will be done by the staff posted in these centres for HIV and hepatitis-C by using testing kits, which will be provided by National Aids Control Organisation and National Health Mission.

The government will sign an MoU with the private de-addiction centres for which the process will be started by the Punjab State AIDS Control Society. Any person found HIV-positive will be referred to the nearest antiretroviral therapy centres for further treatment and the list will be shared with the nearest government centres by private de-addiction centres every month. Anyone suffering from hepatitis-C will be referred to district civil hospital and government medical colleges for further treatment.

In cases where integrated counselling and testing centres are not available in public health institutes, the existing staff, including laboratory technician\staff nurse will be imparted training by the Punjab State Aids Control Society and civil surgeons office for the screening of patients and necessary kits will also made available.

Punjab health minister Brahm Mohindra said that timely detection would help in providing the required care and treatment to people infected with HIV and hepatitis-C. “We want to ensure that the facility of counselling and testing centres are available at all drug de-addiction centres,” said Mohindra.


"
7,"At Delhi mall, transgenders say with pride they’re Born This Way",2018-09-12T00:20:40+05:30,"NEW DELHI: Days after Section 377 of the Indian Penal Code, which condemned LGBTQ citizens to humiliation and denial, was read down by the Supreme Court, the transgender community came together in strength and solidarity on Tuesday at Delhi’s Select Citywalk for the annual Hijra Habba. Organised by the HIV/AIDS Alliance India, the event, whose theme this year was ‘Born This Way’, brings together transgender advocates, international agencies and health organisations to present their perspectives, with song and dance and much good cheer. 

“We are the only sexual minority that is visible to the naked eye,” said Laxmi Narayan Tripathi, a prominent activist and head of the first transgender religious akhara. While hijras and transgender groups once had important roles in Indian society, they are yet to fully realise their freedoms. They are cast out of familial structures and political decision-making, leaving Tamanna Keni, 26, an activist from Thane, to rue, “We used to be the ‘mahalon ki zeenat’ (pride of the palaces) in Mughal times and the Maratha durbars had a place for us, but now we are left behind.” 

A survey of the National Human Rights Commission has established that 92% of the transgender community are economically marginalised. They rely on begging and sex work, and frequently face discrimination, even violence. A full 98% of transgender persons live apart from their families, so have for support their chosen gurus (‘the person your heart goes out to’, as Tamanna described the relationship) and their peers. This gives them a sense of community, but also sharpens their isolation from wider society.

The Hijra Habba, in that sense, is an attempt to connect the community within itself and with others. Tuesday’s event started with a flash mob by the group Harmless Hugs. Many visitors were intrigued enough to stay and listen. “I had only heard myths, or seen hijras at ceremonies like weddings or births. I was just curious,” admitted Puneet Kumar, a 24-year-old MNC executive. He clapped enthusiastically at drag queen (also Mr Gay India 2014) Rani Kohinoor’s versions of ‘Ambar sariya’ and ‘I will survive’ almost as if responding to the emcee’s exhortation: “Iss function mein taaliyon ki kami nahi honi chahiye.”

The Indian state recognises gender-variant identities in public documents, and many states like Tamil Nadu have dedicated transgender welfare programmes. The Supreme Court’s groundbreaking Nalsa judgment in 2014 made a basis for self-identified gender identity — the fact that you know the gender you identify with, irrespective of medical diagnosis, and that the law must give you your full due as a citizen. A transgender rights bill is pending in Parliament. 

Officials from agencies like the HIV/AIDS Alliance, National AIDS Control Organisation, USAID and UNAIDS spoke of “being in this together”. Cricketer Gautam Gambhir too expressed his support, congratulating everyone on the dilution of Section 377.

Activist Gauri Sawant, one of those who had moved the Supreme Court on behalf of the transgender community, spoke of giving back to society and how one could invest care and attention on others. Sawant, who works in an initiative called ‘Nani ka Ghar’ for the children of sex workers, said her own sense of family was “Mere chele mere bachche hain”. She explained, “Motherhood is a behaviour, it doesn’t mean giving birth to a baby.” 

An exhibition at the event introduced visitors to the transgender community, what it means to identify as a woman or man, the behaviours one learns by wearing a bindi or holding up a false moustache. It introduced people to prominent trans persons and to cultural references like Bahuchara Mata, a patron deity of the hijra community. To walk through the space is to understand what it means to be born in the way we all are but being force-fitted into a rigid gender identity.


"
8,HIV positive cases decline in Vizianagaram: Govt data,2018-11-06T14:34:13+05:30,"VIZIANAGARAM: There has been a decline in the number of people being affected by human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) virus in Vizianagaram district, according to government data.

Data for the last 10 years, since Anti-Retroviral Therapy (ART) Centres were opened in Vizianagaram and Parvathipuram divisions clearly indicate the declining trend, while the number of people being screened and tested has gone up three times approximately in the same time period (over the last decade).

Talking to TOI, the Vizianagaram AIDS and Leprosy control officer, S Ravi Kumar, pointed out that the number of people testing HIV positive has come down both numerically and percentage wise. 

“We attribute this decrease chiefly to the rise in awareness over the last decade after ART centres were established. A massive public awareness campaign was conducted across the district and target groups were identified,” Kumar said.

Referring to the data, Kumar said, “In 2008, when we began screening and testing people for HIV, out of the 22,672 tested, 1,771, turned to be HIV positive. Nine years later, for the year 2017, a total 73,360 were tested and only 633 turned out to be positive. The percentage of people, who tested positive in 2007 was 7.61% against 0.80% for 2017-2018.”

Referring to HIV in pregnant women, AIDS control officials noted that 176 out of 29, 562 tested positive for the year 2008-2009, while only 29 out of the 60,686 tested positive last year, bringing the percentage count from close to 1% to less than 0.05%.

The officials observed that this downward trend was continuing this year as well. Regarding the provision of treatment to affected people at the ART centres, the officials observed that earlier tablets were dispensed every month, but because of logistical issues, some of the affected were unable to turn up on time. They said that a special multi-dispensation programme was initiated by the National AIDS Control Society and training for the multi-dispensation programme was initiated for the staff members of the two ART centres in the district on Saturday, under the guidance of the DCHS (district community health services) officials.


"
9,India sees major reductions in HIV infections: UN report,2018-07-20T15:06:23+05:30,"UNITED NATIONS: India saw a major reduction in the number of new HIV infections, AIDS-related deaths and people living with HIV from 2010 to 2017 on the back of sustained and focussed efforts, according to a UN report which warned that the epidemic was growing in Pakistan.

The Joint UN Agency on AIDS (UNAIDS) report titled 'Miles to go -- closing gaps, breaking barriers, righting injustices' said Asia and the Pacific regions have made strong inroads with its HIV response.

Sustained and focused efforts to reach key populations have led to major reductions in HIV infections in Cambodia, India, Myanmar, Thailand and Vietnam between 2010 and 2017.

The report, however, warned that the global new HIV infections were not declining fast enough. It also noted that the epidemics were expanding in Pakistan and the Philippines.

In India, new HIV infections dropped from 120,000 in 2010 to 88,000 in 2017, AIDS-related deaths from 160,000 to 69,000 and people living with HIV from 2,300,000 to 2,100,000 in the same time period, the report said.

India has an approved social protection strategy, policy or framework that is being implemented, it said.

Successive surveys in Cambodia, India, Thailand and Vietnam also indicate that attitudes towards people living with HIV have improved creating safer working conditions for sex workers and engaging them closely in the design and implementation of programmes make a huge difference, it said.

The report underscored the public health benefits of decriminalising sex work.

It found that countries that had decriminalised at least some aspects of sex work have fewer sex workers living with HIV than countries that criminalise all aspects of sex work.

Modelling based on data from Canada, India and Kenya indicates that the decriminalisation of sex work could avert 33-46 per cent of HIV infections over the course of a decade.

The report cited the example of Karnataka, where advocacy work with senior police officials, sensitisation workshops and the inclusion of HIV and human rights topics in pre-service curricula led to significant decreases in the arrest of female sex workers, especially during police raids.

Before the interventions, half (50 per cent) of the 4,110 surveyed female sex workers said they had been arrested or detained at some point during police raids, that proportion shrank to 20 per cent after the interventions, the report said.

Referring to the initiative sponsored by the Bill & Melinda Gates Foundation to reduce the spread of HIV in India, the report said the Avahan programme in Karnataka and other States remained a ""sterling example"" of the impact of combining condom programming with community empowerment and structural improvements that tackle stigma, violence and unsafe working environments.

UNAIDS, however, issued a stark wake-up call for nations, warning that the global response to HIV is at a precarious point.

At the halfway point to the 2020 targets, the report warned that the pace of progress was not matching global ambition.

""We are sounding the alarm"", said Michel Sidibe, Executive Director of UNAIDS.

""Entire regions are falling behind, the huge gains we made for children are not being sustained, women are still most affected, resources are still not matching political commitments and key populations continue to be ignored. All these elements are halting progress and urgently need to be addressed head-on,"" Sidibe said.

Global new HIV infections have declined by just 18 per cent in the past seven years, from 2.2 million in 2010 to 1.8 million in 2017, the report noted.

Although this is nearly half the number of new infections compared to the peak in 1996 (3.4 million), the decline is not quick enough to reach the target of fewer than 500,000 by 2020.

In 2017, an estimated 36.9 million people globally were living with HIV and 21.7 million people were accessing treatment, it said.

The report also shows that key populations are not being considered enough in HIV programming.

Key populations and their sexual partners account for 47 per cent of the new HIV infections worldwide and 97 per cent of new HIV infections in eastern Europe and central Asia, where one third of new HIV infections are among people who inject drugs.

""The right to health for all is non-negotiable,"" said Sidibe.

""Sex workers, gay men and other men who have sex with men, prisoners, migrants, refugees and transgender people are more affected by HIV but are still being left out from HIV programmes. More investments are needed in reaching these key populations,"" Sidibe added. 

"
10,"Man misdiagnosed with HIV sues hospital, receives 1 lakh in compensation",2018-04-03T22:32:31+05:30,"KOLKATA: A court in West Bengal ordered a private hospital to give a compensation of one lakh rupees to Swapan Sahu (name changed) after an error wrongfully diagnosed him with HIV.

Sahu's ordeal started when he saw an advertisement in a local newspaper calling for kidney donors. 

Sahu decided to offer his kidney to help the man in need and contacted a local hospital in the city.

Following the preliminary medical check-up, the hospital found that Sahu is “infected” with HIV.

The hospital's faulty diagnosis marked a turning point in Sahu's life. His marriage broke down. His family and friends abandoned him. Heartbroken, Sahu started contemplating suicide.

Not ready to give up on his life, Sahu approached a private hospital in Kolkata with the help of one of his friends. 

Another round of tests found Sahu to be perfectly healthy. Bewildered, Sahu sought another opinion from a hospital based in Alipore. There too the tests came out as negative.

Sahu immediately approached the consumer court against the first hospital, responsible for his misdiagnoses. After hearing Sahu's case, the court ordered the hospital to give a compensation of Rs 1 lakh to Sahu.

""I want to start again. Want to live again,"" Sahu said.


Read the story in Bengali

"
22,Insurers cannot deny cover for HIV-positive patients,2018-10-12T18:52:00+05:30,"The Insurance Regulatory and Development Authority of India (IRDAI) has said that HIV-positive individuals cannot be denied insurance cover, unless supported by actuarial studies. The regulator has asked insurance companies to stop discriminating against persons with HIV/AIDS.

IRDAI has made this mandatory after ‘The Human lmmunodeficiency Virus (HIV) and Acquired lmmune Deficiency Syndrome (AIDS) (Prevention and control) Act, 2017’ came into force from September 10. The Act bars insurance companies from discriminating against HIV-positive individuals.

As per Section 3 (j) of the Act, “no person shall discriminate against the protected person on any ground including any of the following, namely—the denial of, or unfair treatment in, the provision of insurance unless supported by actuarial studies.”

“All insurance companies are hereby directed to comply with the aforesaid provisions of the HIV and AIDS (Prevention and Control) Act 2017 with immediate effect,” IRDAI said in its latest circular. The regulator had directed insurance companies to provide cover to HIV-positive individuals in its draft regulations issued in 2013. The total number of people living with HIV (PLHIV) in India is estimated at 21.40 lakh, according to the National AIDS Control Organisation.

However, most insurance companies have stayed away from launching products for HIV/AIDS patients due to pricing-related issues. Insurance firms typically exclude HIV and its related ailments from the scope of coverage due to the high risks involved.

“If the immunity is low due to a person being HIV-positive, treatment expenses go up several times. The cost of tests and duration of stay in the hospital for HIV-positive patients would be much more compared to regular patients. That is why insurance companies are wary about offering cover for persons with compromised immunity,” a senior industry official said. 

“The problem is that insurers do not have enough data to design a cover for HIV-positive patients,” said G Srinivasan, chairman and managing director (CMD), New India Assurance Company. “We can offer coverage for early-stage HIV-positive patients with certain caveats and conditions,” he said.

Star Health Insurance was the first company in the country to come out with an exclusive policy for such patients on a group basis. The ‘Star Netplus Insurance Plan’ is a special policy catering to HIV-positive patients. “It (IRDAI stipulation) is a good step. HIV-positive patients need not be discriminated from the regular population for insurance cover,” said V Jagannathan, CMD, Star Health Insurance.

“The industry should come forward and offer cover for HIV-positive patients,” said Dr S Prakash, chief operating officer, Star Health Insurance. “We have a specific cover for treatment of HIV-positive patients also,” he said.

Acceptance of proposal and payment of claims for hospitalisation under Star Health’s insurance scheme, however, is dependent on CD (cluster differentiation)-4 count. In medical parlance, a low CD-4 count in HIV-positive patients is considered risky. 


"
23,"A blue pill is stopping HIV like never before, study shows",2018-10-19T09:51:34+05:30,"SYDNEY: An antiviral pill taken daily by thousands of men across Sydney and other parts of Australia led to a globally unprecedented reduction in new HIV cases, showing that a targeted, preventative approach may accelerate progress on ending the AIDS epidemic.

New cases of HIV among gay and bisexual men fell by almost a third to the lowest on record, according to the world’s first study to measure the impact of Gilead Sciences Inc's Truvada pill on reducing the AIDS-causing virus in a large population. The results, published Thursday in the Lancet HIV medical journal, may pave the way for other states and countries to stop transmission of the virus with the use of a treatment called pre-exposure prophylaxis, or PrEP.

""The speed of the decline we’ve seen in new HIV infections in gay and bisexual men is a world first,"" said study leader Andrew Grulich, head of HIV epidemiology and prevention at the Kirby Institute of the University of New South Wales. ""These numbers are the lowest on record since HIV surveillance began in 1985.""

Progress against AIDS over the past 15 years has inspired a commitment by UN member states to end the epidemic by 2030. The number of people newly infected with HIV fell to 1.8 million worldwide in 2017, from more than 3 million a year through most of the 1990s. While the study results can’t be generalized to indicate similar efficacy in heterosexual populations, they do demonstrate that PrEP is ""highly cost-effective"" in certain high-risk groups, Grulich said in a phone interview.

New HIV infections occurred in 102 gay and bisexual men in the state of New South Wales in the first year after the study began, compared with 149 infections in the 12 months prior.

""While we’ve known for at least three or four years now of individual-level efficacy of PrEP, there has been some reticence around the world by policy makers to properly fund the roll out of PrEP because the population impact hasn’t been shown -- and that’s what we set out to do,"" Grulich said.

There were about 180,000 people in the US taking Truvada for PrEP at the end of June, Robin L. Washington, Gilead’s chief financial officer, said on a conference call in July.

The blue, oval-shaped pill is a fixed-dose combination of the drugs tenofovir, disoproxil and emtricitabine. Generic versions of Truvada made by Mylan NV, Cipla Ltd. and Teva Pharmaceutical Industries Ltd. have made the medication available more cheaply.

""We see the nice steady growth of Truvada for the use of PrEP,"" Gilead’s Chief Executive Officer John F. Milligan told the Morgan Stanley Global Health Care Conference last month. Areas of the US with the highest uptake of PrEP had achieved some of the best reductions in HIV infections, he said.

""I’m more confident now that the policymakers are being very innovative in thinking about how to increase access to PrEP,"" Milligan said. ""So we’ll be working on a number of things in the coming year that could really increase the number of patients on PrEP and could be very good for preventing the infection, and of course good for our business as well.""

"
24,Contest of one-min films aims to tackle HIV/AIDS stigma,2018-09-30T12:12:26+05:30,"PANAJI: In order to challenge HIV and AIDS-related stigma and explore its negative impact on people living with HIV, the Human Touch Foundation, a youth-led organization that works in the field of HIV is organizing a one-minute film competition on HIV stigma. The theme seeks to do away with HIV and AIDS discrimination in terms of self and social acceptance, access to HIV prevention and treatment services, education and employment opportunities as well as many other aspects of everyday life.





“HIV and AIDS-related stigma and discrimination refer to negative perceptions and attitudes, misconceptions, prejudice and abuse directed at people living with HIV. Despite the remarkable progress made in advancing HIV science, stigma and discrimination which is founded on the fear surrounding the early AIDS pandemic in the 1980s continues to persist to this day,” says founder, Human Touch Foundation, Peter Borges.

The consequences of stigma and discrimination are invariably devastating, he adds, stating that some people are shunned by family, friends, community and society, while others face poor treatment in healthcare and education settings, violation of their human rights, and psychological damage. “These push people living with HIV and key populations further underground, limiting their access to HIV prevention, testing, treatment and other lifesaving health services,” he says.

The contest is open to students of higher secondary schools and colleges affiliated to Goa Board and Goa University. The last date to submit the films November 20 by email- getintouch@humantouch.ngo. Richard Williams (M-81975 49909) and Yasin Kalagar (M-78754 04325) can be contacted for details.


"
25,Karnataka has third highest number of HIV patients,2018-09-15T08:27:25+05:30,"Karnataka has the third highest number of HIV/AIDS patients in the country, a report released by the National AIDS Control Organisation shows. 


The overall prevalence of HIV/ AIDS is sliding but the number of new cases is rising in some states, including Assam, Mizoram and Meghalaya. By the end of 2017, India had an estimated 21.4 lakh people living with HIV. 




Maharashtra, at 3.3 lakh, had the highest number, followed by AP (2.7 lakh) and Karnataka (2.5 lakh).
"
29,"HIV+ women, widow to get dairy booths in Rajasthan",2018-06-22T09:31:26+05:30,"JAIPUR: This year Jaipur Municipal Corporation (JMC) will give preference in allotting the dairy booths to the women suffering from HIV+, cancer or a widow. They will be allotted one booth in every ward in the Jaipur city. 


Chief minister Vasundhara Raje had declared that 5,000 dairy booths will be opened in the state for the women out of which 1,000 will be in Jaipur city. This will be done to empower women and to raise employment opportunities for them. 

Along with this, there are even plans to open a single window for licensing in the JMC office as the complaints of the public towards the authorities related to the issue of licensing for dairy booths are rising in number. 

This plan is made to keep a check on the officials so that problem will not be created for the general public. Jaipur city is divided into eight zones and at present in every zone a junior engineer (JEN) look after the matter but after the implementation of single window, soon two JEN and two clerks will look after the matters of four zones each in the office to be allotted in the JMC. 

Mayor Ashok Lahoti said, “The decision to open a single window is taken to make the licensing scheme more transparent. There is a plan to open 1,000 new dairy booths in the city and new licenses will be given only to the ladies as per the social welfare scheme announced by the chief minister Vasundhara Raje. In all the 91 wards, we have planned to give one dairy booth to the women suffering from AIDS, cancer or is a widow, to help them earn a decent living.”

To increase the competition in the state regarding the milk sale JMC has even planned to give 100 booths to the Amul dairy which will also be the company’s first entry in Rajasthan. 

The chairman of the licensing committee Mahesh Kalwani told TOI that the proposal for single window for licensing is made to give proper shape to the plans of chief minister Vasundhara Raje. “I have met many people who have complained about the red tap-ism and corruption that is rampant during the time of license issuing. Even all the applications do not reach us as the officials send applications of those that fulfils their interests and pockets. When the work will start here then we can check for any discrepancies while issuing the order” said that Kalwani. 


"
30,'Every fourth sexually active person in UP has not heard of HIV-AIDS',2018-02-14T09:15:06+05:30,"LUCKNOW: Over 27% men and women in the 15-49 years age group have not even heard about HIV-AIDS. This means that every fourth person in the largely sexually active age group in the state have not heard about. 


The fact, noted in the recently released fourth National Family Health Survey report, explains why incidents like the one in Unnao can take place in the state. To recall, over 50 persons belonging to a couple of villages in Unnao's Bangarmau area tested positive to HIV infection in a period of seven months.

While a quack who reportedly administered injection to locals with the same syringe is being blamed for the havoc, theory of the affected persons contracting the infection as a result of unsafe sexual behaviour is not being ruled out. 

The report also assessed higher risk sex among men and women of UP. Higher-risk sex refers to sexual intercourse with someone who is neither a spouse nor a cohabiting partner. 

Among those who had sex in the past 12 months, only 1% women and 9% men reported having higher-risk sex during the period. The trend was higher in urban than rural areas. A small proportion of respondents said that they had multiple sex partners in past one year (0.3% of women and 3% of men). 

Over one-fourth of men (26%) who had higher-risk sex in the past 12 months reported using a condom the last time they had higher-risk sex. One percent of men said they had paid for sex in the past year. Though the numbers are small, 34% men who paid for sexual intercourse in past one year used a condom the last time they paid for sexual intercourse.

The report also showed that only 18% women and 26% men in the state have a comprehensive knowledge about HIV/AIDS. This means that they know that consistent use of condoms during sex and having just one uninfected committed sex partner can reduce the chance of it . But on an overall scale, 52% women and 26% men were not aware of the importance of use of condoms and commitment. 

Comprehensive knowledge of HIV-AIDS also entails awareness to the fact that a healthy-looking person can have it and they reject common misconceptions about transmission or prevention of HIV-AIDS. Over 65% women 59% men did not show accepting attitude towards indicators assessing stigma.

The indicators were: 'willing to take care of relative with HIV/AIDS', 'would buy vegetables from an HIV positive vendor', 'believe that an HIV positive but healthy school teacher could take classes' and 'would not keep HIV status of their relative as a secret) assessing stigma towards HIV-AIDS.'


"
31,"With no disclosure norms, most HIV+ kids learn about ailment after parent’s death",2018-09-04T06:36:29+05:30,"SOLAPUR: Throughout her childhood, 14-year-old Mona would overhear terms such as ‘HIV’ and ‘AIDS’ uttered in hushed tones at her Solapur house. The mystery ended two years ago when her mother succumbed to AIDS following a ten-year battle.

Her bedridden father, also afflicted by the virus, broke the news to her just a day later. “It’s a germ in our blood that will stay with us forever. It has not spared you either,” says Mona, recalling her father’s words. The revelation, she vividly remembers, was followed by a directive to keep it a secret. More than the disease, it was the secrecy that instilled a deep sense of shame.

Similarly, Pandharpur native Sundari (13) barely had time to cope with her father’s death when she was told about her HIV status. That was the first time her grandfather told her that it was AIDS that killed her parents. Unable to bear the ill-treatment meted out to her by the extended family, the grandfather put her in an orphanage, where she presently lives.

Studies have underlined the criticality of disclosure—telling someone about their HIV status—in fighting the disease and how, when done under tragic circumstances and without counselling, it can damage the way an HIV-infected child or an adolescent view themselves for the rest of their lives. The lack of a holistic framework in India has left parents, caregivers and institutions grappling to find the right approach. Several children discover the ailment accidentally or at the time of losing a parent; many come to know when they are being discriminated against, or worse, after they have been sexually abused. 

The complex questions of ‘how to tell’ and ‘when to tell’ is simply passed over at Pune-based Manavya, one of the oldest homes in Maharashtra to care for HIV positive children. The caretakers never let out the “secret” even as they teach every child how to take medicines and fight the disease. “If they have questions about HIV, we answer them scientifically,” said Shirish Lawate, trustee of Manavya. Children as young as five start questioning their daily medications. “We tell them it’s to kill the jantu (organism) inside their body,” says Sushma Apte, one of the coordinators. 

Visits to hospitals and ART centres seem to be one of the common ways children discover their HIV status. Fifteen-year-old Sushila says, “I figured I had HIV by looking at posters at Solapur Civil Hospital. But it took me a while to understand there are ways other than physical relationships to get HIV,” she says. The teenager is from Palawi in Pandharpur, a residential institution run by Mangaltai Shah and her daughter Dimple Ghadge that provides shelter to 110 HIV children. Ghadge says counselling at state-run ART centres is perfunctory. “That’s perhaps the reason why mental health issues, particularly depression, mood swings and anger is rampant among them,” says Ghadge. 

Chinmayi Modi, a member of the National Coalition of People living with HIV India (NCPI+), adds that the incidence of suicides among HIV-affected youth is high but there is no verifiable data. 

At the Bandra-based CCDT, for in-house residents older than 10-12 years, the disclosure is done gradually keeping the child’s maturity in mind. It’s when families are involved, says programme director Poonam DSouza, that it becomes challenging. “All parents want to delay it till their children are in late teens,” she says. “But we discourage late disclosures since children at that age start having relationships and should be aware of the risks of unsafe sex,” she adds. Brahmadev from Vihaan, an NGO working for HIV, says it’s common for children to blame parents, run away from home and stop taking medicines. 

Unlike practices worldwide, where a lot of thought goes into disclosing a child’s HIV status, no structure exists here, says Shabana Patel, president of Network of Maharashtra People with HIV (NMP+). ""The first counselling when a child starts ART is crucial and should last for a minimum of 45 minutes. Unfortunately, it doesn't happen even for 5 minutes,"" says Patel. In Maharashtra, there is one counsellor for every 300 HIV patients. Parimal Singh, who heads Maharashtra State Aids Control Society, said a methodology is being drawn up to ensure those who have adherence issues don't miss out on quality counselling. 

Mumbai’s Sion Hospital has developed some tools for this purpose. Counsellor Laxman Jamkhandi uses storytelling to educate his young patients. White cells vital to the immune system assume the role of good soldiers that need the aid of weapons like ART drugs and nutrition to kill the black demon virus. “A superhero story never fails to get the attention of children,"" he says. ""With better ART, children are surviving for decades, so it's better their body and mind starts accepting it early.”


"
32,"‘Don’t advertise HIV-positive status, write ‘universal precaution’ instead’",2018-01-24T08:49:05+05:30,"CHANDIGARH: For HIV-positive people to get medical attention without being harassed, health practitioners should put “universal precaution” and not their HIV status on medical cards, says Puja Thakur, HIV-positive activist for the cause.

At a TOI event related to the national girl child campaign, she talked about the harassment that the HIV-positive people face in hospitals where they go in search of medication. She said: “My husband refused to go to hospital because laboratory technicians would ask him awkward questions like whether he had any extra-marital affair. The law says the HIV-positive status is not to be disclosed, so why is on the pateints’ medical cards?”

She pointed out that the medical term for HIV-positive is “universal precaution”, about which only a few people know. She urged the health department to promote the term so that patients are treated with dignity. Disclosure of their HIV-positive status renders patients vulnerable to harassment at the hands of chemists, who pry into their medical history and personal life.

No school is ready to accept her children. Local MP Kirron Kher found it strange that doctors were writing the HIV-positive status on medical cards. She underlined the need to spread awareness about the way the HIV-positive people should be treated, and said laboratory techinicians should correct their mindset. “I ask people to accept HIV/AIDS as a medical problem like cancer.”

Pooja’s life changed after she was screened with this medical issue. Not only her in-laws but also her parents denied her financial help for treatment. “Don’t go for the treatment,” her in-laws said, “Society is making fun of us.” This after she lost her husband to the disease. “An HIV-postive person can live a normal life up to 60,” Pooja said.

Her in-laws turned her out of the house along with two HIV-postive sons, though they kept her eldest child, who had tested negative. The director of State Aids Control Society supported her treatment and got her life back on track. She now works for the Chandigarh HIV-positive Society. 

“This medical problem gave me a mission of life,” Pooja said. “To make myself aware of the legal rights of HIV-postitive people, I resumed my education,” she said. She was a matriculate when she got married and completed her graduation after family disowned her. She plans to get a master’s degree in social work and keep working for the rights of HIV-positive people. During the 2010 IPL season, she was “toss ka boss” for a match.


"
33,62% jump in HIV/AIDS deaths in Mumbai in 1 year: Health ministry,2018-05-19T09:44:31+05:30,"MUMBAI: Deaths due to AIDS (acquired immuno-deficiency syndrome) have increased significantly in the city over the last three years, according to data available with the central health ministry’s Health Management Information System. While 27 HIV-positive people died in Mumbai in 2015-16, the number rose to 72 in 2016-17 and further to 116 in 2017-18, showed the data.



“There has been a 62% increase in deaths due to the HIV/ AIDS epidemic in the last one year alone,” said RTI activist Chetan Kothari, who compiled the data. Between 2015 and 2016, the deaths rose by 166%. 





The HIV/AIDS epidemic, that had peaked in the nineties, has become manageable due to availability of medicines called antiretroviral treatment (ART); a fatal disease was soon transformed into achronic condition manageable with drugs. Number of deaths fell as a result even as the number of fresh HIV infections began to show a decline in the last few years.

In this backdrop, the sudden spurt in deaths is worrisome, said doctors. A senior doctor, who didn’t want to be identified, said, “Deaths occur in poor patients in whom the current mode of treatment has failed.” Patients for whom the first line of ART no longer worked due to years of use, needed second- or third-line drugs. 

“However, these new medicines are expensive and not easily available in the governmentrun programme. The poor cannot afford to buy them,” the doctor added. However, city authorities in charge of the HIV/AIDS control programme said there is a simple explanation for the increase: A sharper public health programme that has managed to track more patients. 

Dr Shrikala Acharya of the Mumbai District AIDS Control Society (MDACS) said the organization had carried out intensive loss-to-follow-up drives as per central government directives to track patients who were lost to follow-up. “This drive helped us update the actual number of deaths. It could also be the reason for the increase in reported deaths,” she said, adding that the rise isn’t necessarily an actual increase in the number of deaths. 

Incidentally, the HMIS data shows that the number of AIDS deaths has been steadily decreasing across Maharashtra. From 1,426 deaths in 2015-16, the figure fell to 1,390 in the following year and further to 1,327 in 2017-18. A doctor said that HIV care has improved so much that very few deaths are recorded in the private sector, where patients pay for the latest medicine and get updated care. 

"
34,International Women's Day 2018: HIV+ woman who’s spreading positivity,2018-03-08T08:18:58+05:30,"SURAT: Her life had many twists and turns as she had to pass from the toughest struggle for inclusion and acceptance after facing discrimination in society when she was detected with HIV in 1997. 

At the age of 21 years, she and her husband had to take a tough decision to abort the child. With a mission to change peoples’ perception about HIV/AIDS, she got herself involved in social activities for HIV community. At present, she is the face of HIV community in the country. 

Meet Daxa Patel, who is not only president of National Coalition of People Living with HIV in India (NCPI+), but also relentlessly working for patients, most of them outcast by the society. From organizing awareness camps to marriage fairs for HIV patients and successfully running a day-boarding school and hostel for HIV-infected children, Daxa has put her life, blood and sweat for their uplift.

“When my husband and I were diagnosed with HIV in 1997, there was no treatment available. Meanwhile, I got pregnant and had no choice but to go for termination. One of the doctors told me that my lifespan was just for five months. I was searching for a person infected with HIV and I found a woman who was living with the disease for two years. This gave me confidence that I could also live long. This was the turning point in my life,” says 42-year-old Daxa.

Daxa, who was doing a small embroidery business from her house, and her husband informed their family and relatives about the disease. To their surprise, the family was very supportive and this further boosted her confidence on fighting discrimination faced by people like her. Her treatment began only in 2007, 10 years after he was infected.

It was in 2003, Daxa, who was earlier working as a counsellor with a city-based non-governmental organization SAHAS, got in touch with Umesh Patel. Along with Umesh and other few community members, they decided to launch a platform for HIV positive people. This is how the Gujarat State Network for People Living with HIV/ÁID (GSNP+) was launched in 2003. 

The main objective of GSNP+ was to assist the people infected with HIV/AIDS, ensure they get proper medical attention and timely medicines and organizing awareness programmes etc. 

“We used to meet the HIV patients at some deserted places and gardens to protect their identity. We started with just 35 members at GSNP+ and now we have 67,000 members across all the districts in Gujarat,” she said.

Later, the NCPI+ was launched at the national level and the organization has a presence in 32 states across the country. Daxa is also running Janani Dham for the destitute HIV and AIDS infected orphaned children on the outskirts of the city since 2009. It is supported by Gujarat government’s social justice department and Surat-based P P Savani Group and has around 98 boys and girls. 

GSNP+ will soon launch a scheme for HIV positive people, where they can get easy medicine refill and won’t have to visit government dispensaries. This is for the first time that a project has been launched with the state government and will be introduced on national-level.


"
35,Mystery cases of children testing HIV+ in Tamil Nadu rise,2018-04-23T09:37:08+05:30,"CHENNAI: In 2017, 236 children below 18 years tested positive for HIV in the state, registering a near 25% decline in two years. While the number remains a concern for officials, what is worrying them even more is that they could not establish the source of the disease in 32 children, an increase of 10. This has led officials to believe that more children are engaging in highrisk sexual behavior or are victims of abuse.

In 2015, of the 311 children who tested positive for HIV/ AIDS in the state, 289 contracted the infection from their HIV-infected mothers during pregnancy, labour or breastfeeding. Officials couldn’t establish the source of the infection in 22 children. Two years later, the number of parent-to-child transmission dipped along with the number of new cases detected among children, but the number of unaccounted cases touched 32, show data furnished by Tamil Nadu State Aids Control Society in response to an RTI application by TOI.


Officials and doctors say they suspect the mode of transmission of the infection among these children to be sexual as the increase is corroborated by an uptick in the number of children referred to government-run clinics for sexually transmitted infections. The number went up from 6,234 in 2015 to 8,871last year.

Recognising the growing prevalence of STIs among children, TANSACS project director K Senthil Raj said he is in talks with the school education secretary to dedicate more space to sex education in the soon-to-be-introduced revamped textbooks.


Children could have acquired HIV through transfusion, says official

He said staff at the integrated counselling and testing centers (ICTC) for HIV usually maintain a record of children with the infection, including those who haven’t got it from infected mothers. “They usually don’t probe. But if they do find the reason during the counselling, they maintain it in their notebooks,” he said. Some of the children, he said, could have acquired it through blood transfusion or injectable drugs.

Consultant psychiatrist Dr M Suresh Kumar, who has worked extensively with injection drug users, rules out this possibility. “Heroin and other synthetic injectable opioids were popular till the late 90s. We haven’t been seeing young heroin addicts in a while,” saidDr Kumar.Hisobservation is backed by official data: Of the 1.43 lakh people living withHIVin TNcovered under the central-sponsored prevention programme, 56 are users of injectibles. All are in their 40s and above. Dr Kumar saidthey are,however, seeing other kinds of addictions, including marijuana and alcohol,on the rise among youngsters. “It is known that high drug use can make you vulnerable to engaging in high-risksexualbehavior,” he noted.

HIV specialist Dr S Sundar observed that the state should expand its HIV/AIDS prevention programme to youngsters who aren’t part of the traditional “high-risk” group. “All our programmes are targeted at the high-risk population like female sex workers, transgenders, men who have sex with men and truck drivers. But ask a counsellor at an ICTC who he or sheseesthe most–itisusually people who are not part of this group,” hesaid. “Children are engaging in sexual activity belowthelegal ageof consent. It is a fact. They could be in a situation where nobody will even ask for consent,” added Sundar.

Whatever be the source, once diagnosed, these children are forced to battle the stigma associated with the infection or live in the fear that someone may find out they are positive, said P Manorama, former chairperson of Child Welfare Committee, Chennai, who runs an organisation that works with children withHIV. Shesaidshe receives at least one child trafficking victim a year who tests positivefor HIVlinkedto sexualexploitation. “Butthey remain mere names in the state’s medical records. Officials don’t investigate further,” saidManorama, adding that TANSACS should coordinate with other departments to tackle these cases.


"
36,"At Sion hospital, ‘palatable’ oral pellets for HIV+ kids",2018-07-13T04:48:42+05:30,"MUMBAI: The long-standing demand for a more palatable form of HIV medicine for infants has finally been met with the National Aids Control Organisation (NACO) rolling out oral pellets in its eight nodal paediatric centres across the country, including Sion hospital in Mumbai. 


Since little over a month, 16 children aged between six months and two years are being given pellets, which look like homeopathy pills, containing drugs lopinavir and ritonavir. The pellets, that can be sprinkled over food too, have already proven to be advantageous, in terms of administration. The syrup, which used to be the main alternative for paediatric patients, was met with a lot of resistance as it left a bitter aftertaste and children would often spit it out.

The centre at Sion hospital will be documenting the efficacy and acceptance of the oral pellets, along with the other centres. “So far, the response has been positive. Earlier, parents would return with the syrup bottles and say it was unpalatable,” said Dr Yashwant Gabhale, head of the paediatric centre at Sion. Additionally, a decrease in side-effects has also been seen. “Problems such as nausea, vomiting and diarrhoea have been minimal, so far,” he added. 

There are nearly 76,000 children living with HIV in the country of which 5,000-odd are from Maharashtra. The use of oral pellets has been restricted to children up to two years of age for now. While the national programme incorporated children since 2006, it was only by late 2007 that paediatric formulations were available. Former paediatric head of Sion hospital Dr Mamata Manglani said that children were initially given adult medication till syrups came into the national programme. “However, there were logistical and storage issues with syrups that paved the way for dispensable tablets over time,” she said. 

Finding pharmaceutical companies to make child-friendly formulations has always been a challenge, say NACO experts, who hope to scale up once the paediatric centres present their feedback and there are more suppliers. “Currently, Cipla is the only company that is making oral pellet formulation. Mylan is likely to start producing it next,” said NACO’s Dr RS Gupta. He said the introduction of pellets is likely to make a big difference in adherence. “Gulping pills every day is a struggle in itself. It becomes more difficult for babies,” he said. Doctors say the overall adherence among children is more than 90%, till their parents are giving them the medicines. 

A parent TOI spoke to said oral pellets are undoubtedly easy to administer. “We only hope that it is regularly available and the supply is uninterrupted since there are limited manufacturers,” he said. Not too long ago, the syrup was in short supply across the country. 


"
37,Goa positive about drop in HIV cases,2017-12-01T10:44:22+05:30,"With one more month to year-end, Goa is optimistic that 2017 will reveal a decline in the number of HIV (human immunodeficiency virus) cases compared to last year. In 2016, 378 people tested positive for HIV while 317 tested positive till October this year. AIDS (acquired immunodeficiency syndrome) cases, however, have already seen a rise during the first 10 months this year compared to last year. There have been 25 deaths due to AIDS till October this year, compared to 31 last year. 




“What should happen is that anyone who has the slightest doubt should subject themselves to testing,” an official from the Goa State Aids Control Society said.

Around 40% of HIV positive people don’t know their HIV status and are hidden in the community, either due to ignorance or the stigma associated with it. 

“Earlier people would be hesitant to get themselves tested because they thought there was no hope. Now they know there’s treatment available and there’s some light at the end of the tunnel,” the official said, adding that only once the stigma goes away will more people step forward to get themselves tested.

Thanks to the test-and-treat policy rolled out by the government in April this year, those who have tested positive for HIV can avail free antiretroviral therapy (ART). In the past, the therapy was provided only when a person’s CD4 count went below normal and if it was clinically felt that his resistance had gone down.

“Now every person who tests positive can be put on treatment, ensuring that his viral load is kept low, thereby preventing him from contracting AIDS early on,” he said, citing examples of people who have lived up to 25 years after being tested HIV+.


"
38,"Man weds woman concealing HIV infection, booked",2018-10-06T11:24:14+05:30,"TRICHY: Srirangam all women police have registered a case against a man infected with HIV for marrying a 25-year-old woman after concealing his disease. Police said the woman was six months pregnant now.

The 30-year-old man from a village near Palani in Dindigul district was booked for cheating the woman from a locality on Vayaloor road in Trichy by allegedly keeping his HIV infection under wraps while marrying her. The man, a coolie, had married the woman in February this year and the latter came to know about his disease in July. 

Police inspector Andal Eswari said that the woman observed that the man had been looking tired and taking medicines frequently. Feeling worried about her husband’s health condition, she took him to the hospital and made him undergo a medical check-up which revealed that he was infected with HIV. “He was infected with HIV for a year but he conveniently covered up the matter for marrying her. But the woman is six months pregnant,” the inspector told TOI. 

When the shocked woman confronted her husband about the suppression of his illness, she had to face the music. According to the complaint, she was tortured mentally and physically by her husband and his family members – three women and two men, all residents of Pappampatti. After allegedly being subjected to torture for the past two months, she preferred to lodge a complaint with the police on Thursday. 

A case was registered under various sections including cheating, causing cruelty to woman by husband and his relatives and criminal intimidation. The police also booked him and five of his family members for physically and mentally torturing the woman. Since the accused were residents of Palani, the police were yet to dig deeper into the matter and arrest them. Doctors said that the chances of the woman getting infected with AIDS from her husband through their sexual relationship were higher. 


"
39,Newborn son contracts HIV infection from father: Study,2018-09-28T16:34:00+05:30,"NEW YORK: In an unusual case, researchers have reported how a newborn baby of an HIV-negative mother got the infection from his father who was also suffering from chicken pox.


Fluids leaking from skin blisters of the father was determined to be the source of the infection.

""Transmission occurred during the seroconversion period when the father was unaware of the (HIV) infection and was likely accidental,"" said the study co-authored by Nuno Taveira of University of Lisbon, Portugal, and colleagues.

Diagnosis of the child happened when he reached age 4. 

The results of genetic, phylogenetic, and serologic data analysis on both the father and son and the hypothesis for how the boy became infected were published in the journal AIDS Research and Human Retroviruses.

Based on comparative analysis of the data from the father and the son, the researchers concluded that the virus was accidentally transmitted to the son during the first days of the child's life. 

During this time of seroconversion, the father was being treated for infection with varicella-zooster virus (chicken pox) and syphilis when he developed large vesicles all over his body that profusely leaked fluids. 

The high virus production early in HIV infection would have made the fluids leaking from the father's skin blisters highly infectious, the study said. 

These infectious fluids could have come in contact with the newborn child causing this atypical HIV transmission event.

""This case shows how genetic, phylogenetic, and serological data can contribute for the forensic investigation of HIV transmission,"" the study added.
"
40,"HIV postive man keeps it secret, booked after wife’s plaint",2018-09-28T09:28:47+05:30,"LUDHIANA: A 22-year-old woman has accused her husband and in-laws of harassment for not bringing enough dowry and also hiding the fact that her husband is HIV positive.


The woman came to know about the fact eight months after marriage following which she lodged a police complaint. The woman cell of Ludhiana police, after a year-long inquiry, has booked the man and his father on Wednesday.

The woman got married to a Patiala-based professor on January 19, 2017. Her husband did not develop physical relation with her saying that he has some infection. Months later, she found the medical reports of her husband which revealed that he is HIV positive.

The woman shared the details with her family who took up the matter with husband and his parents. Meanwhile, the in-laws also started harassing her for not bringing dowry, she alleged.

The father of woman said a family in their locality had fixed the match of her daughter. When they questioned them on keeping boy’s medical condition a secret, they threatened the family to keep mum.

On August 28, 2017, the family lodged a complaint with the woman cell of Ludhiana police.

ASI Sukhdev Singh, investigating officer, woman cell, said police have lodged a case against the accused under Sections 406 (criminal breach of trust), 498-A (dowry harassment) and 420 (cheating and dishonestly inducing delivery of property) of IPC after investigation. The police will arrest the accused soon.


"
41,"HIV/AIDS - Causes, Signs, Symptoms & Prevention",2017-11-16T10:49:56+05:30,"Acquired Immunodeficiency Syndrome (AIDS) refers to a range of symptoms which are caused due to Human Immunodeficiency Virus (HIC) infection. After the infection occurs, the person usually does not experience very pronounced symptoms but may go through influenza-like symptoms. Following this, there is a long period that is typically asymptomatic. However, as the infection spreads in the body, it affects one’s immunity, making him more prone to other infections such as tumours, tuberculosis and opportunistic infections, the infections which usually do not occur in people who have a properly functioning immune system.
 

CAUSES

HIV is caused by transmission of three types: Sexual, exposure to infected blood and vertical transmission from mother to child.


1. Sexual contact: This is the most common form of transmission of the virus. If one has unprotected sex with a person who is infected with HIV, he will get the infection as well. The risk is particularly higher during anal sex. The transmission of infection basically occurs through infected bodily fluids that include fluids from genital, rectal, or oral mucous membrane. Till some time ago, the most common form of sexual contact that led to AIDS was heterosexual. However, lately, more gay and bisexual contact has led to the occurrence of AIDS in the men of the United States.

2. Exposure to infected blood: This is the second most common mode of transmission of HIV. It includes contact with infected blood through transfusion of contaminated blood, needle-sharing during drug intake or getting injected with an unsterilized equipment. However, the risk of HIV through blood is getting lower in developed countries, thanks to better screening and meticulous precautions.


3. Vertical transmission from mother to child: It is possible for HIV to transmit from the mother to her child while she is pregnant, while she is delivering the baby or through her breast milk if she is infected. However, the risk of perinatal transmission can be significantly decreased if the mother and/or the child are given antiretroviral drugs.


What does not transmit HIV
It must be noted that the infection does not spread through exposure to faeces, saliva, sputum, nasal secretions, sweat, urine, vomit or tears of an infected person unless these are contaminated by blood of the person.
Mosquitoes or any other insects also cannot transmit HIV.





SYMPTOMS

There are three stages in the symptoms of an HIV infection. They are called acute infection, asymptomatic HIV and AIDS or late-stage HIV.


1. Acute infection
This phase includes the influenza-like symptoms which develop within two to six weeks of contracting the HIV infection. These symptoms occur in every four to nine cases out of ten. The symptoms of this phase include the following:

1. Fever

2. Chills

3. Muscle aches

4. Soreness in throat

5. Swollen lymph nodes

6. Pain in joints

7. Night sweats

8. Fatigue, weakness and tiredness

9. Weight loss

10. Rashes on the trunk which may or may not occur

11. Vomiting may or may not occur

12. Diarrhoea may or may not occur


2. Asymptomatic HIV
Also known as clinical latency, this is the long haul of no symptoms that follows after the initial phase of influenza-like symptoms. The person will feel absolutely fine and will not experience any symptoms. This phase can be long and may last many years, even 20 in some cases. The average length of this phase is eight years.

What happens in this phase is that your body’s immune system keeps getting damaged by the HIV strain in your body. It even begins to affect your organs.

One needs to take medication of HIV in order to prevent the virus from replicating and furthering the damage. If you don’t, then the damage continues silently for many years.


3. Late-stage HIV / AIDS
This is the most severe phase of the infection with a CD4+ T cell count below 200 cells per µL. Another marker of this phase is occurrence of multiple diseases which are typically associated with an HIV infection. HIV may or may not develop to AIDS, depending on if treatment is administered in the right time or not. Almost in half the cases, it does. 

The three most common and initial conditions that usually warn doctors to screen for AIDS are pneumocystis pneumonia, esophageal candidiasis and cachexia in the form of HIV wasting syndrome.

Other opportunistic infections may also be caused and which infections occur will depend on the person’s environment.

People who reach this stage of the HIV infection also become more predisposed to various cancers such as Kaposi's sarcoma, primary central nervous system lymphoma, Burkitt's lymphoma and cervical cancer.
Some other symptoms of this phase include the following:

1. Diarrhoea

2. Blurred vision

3. Fever of above 100-degree Fahrenheit

4. Dry cough

5. White spots in the mouth and on the tongue

6. Weight loss

7. Night sweats

8. Breathlessness

9. Fatigue and tiredness

10. Swollen lymph nodes


PREVENTION

There is no licensed vaccination that can prevent the deadly infection from occurring. Also, there is no cure for HIV. However, there are some easy ways that can help you prevent HIV from infecting you.

The first and the most vital aspect in prevention of this disease is awareness. If you know about the possible sources of the infection and its transmission, there are high chances that you will not contract the infection.


1. Safe sexual contact: There are multiple facets to a safe sexual contact. They include the following:

Using condoms every time you have sex and using a new one for every new session is of utmost importance.

A lot of people skip condoms when they are having oral or anal sex because these two forms of sexual contact do not lead to pregnancy. However, one must know that the chances of contracting the infection from an HIV-positive person through these two kinds of sexual contact are very high.

You must always disclose to your sexual partner if you are HIV positive. Similarly, your partner should also never hold this information from you. If you have a doubt, never hesitate to get yourself and your partner screened.


2. Consider drug Truvada: This drug is an effective measure to prevent contracting HIV if you are at a high risk position. However, it should only be taken if your doctor recommends it to you and the dosage should be as per his recommendations. It should be noted that though this medicine is also administered for HIV treatment, but that is only done along with other medications. When taken in isolation, it is only a preventive medicine and will not help if you already have the infection. Your doctor will get you screened for HIV, hepatitis B and kidney function before he prescribes this combination drug to you.


3. Always use clean needles for drugs: If you are on any drugs that need to be injected in your body, you must make sure that they are sterile, clean and unused. You must never share needles with anyone. This is because intravenous drug use is a very common factor which causes HIV transmission.


4. Avoid exposure to infected blood: This largely applies to healthcare workers who have to deal with HIV-positive patients on a day-to-day basis. They must wear proper paraphernalia which includes gloves, eyewear, masks, gowns and shields to prevent exposure to infected blood. However, if your skin gets exposed to infected blood, besides consulting a doctor, you must wash it thoroughly and frequently. It should reduce the risk factor significantly.


5. If you are pregnant or are planning pregnancy, get yourself screened immediately: The news of pregnancy must follow a thorough body check-up. In fact, the decision to have a baby needs to be followed with a check-up for HIV. This will reduce the risk factor for your baby significantly. Even if you are tested positive for HIV after you got pregnant, proper treatment and medication can reduce the risk of your baby of contracting the infection by 92 to 99 per cent.


6. Awareness: As stated above, the first step towards preventing HIV is by creating awareness about the disease. This will significantly curb risky behaviour among people.


"
42,"After brief delay, Mysuru gets its quota of anti-HIV drug",2018-09-20T10:27:30+05:30,"MYSURU: Nevirapine syrups and tablets, a key preventive medicine for those afflicted with HIV, is now available in Mysuru. Shortage of the medicine had left pregnant women and new mothers living with HIV, troubled. The city got the first batch of medicines on Wednesday afternoon.

The state government had issued a notice saying the drug will not be available until the end of October sending HIV positive mothers into a panic. Nevirapine syrup is given to babies born from HIV positive mothers within 72 hours of birth to reduce the risk of contracting the disease from their mothers.

The drug which was available at anti-retroviral therapy (ART) centers was out of stock. It was not available at private organizations as well.

After a 20-day delay, the city on Wednesday received its first consignment of Nevirapine syrups.

The essential drug was out of stock since the beginning of September. While NGOs were pulling out all stops to get the drug, new mothers and pregnant women were left wringing their hands and worried sick for their babies. People living with HIV were also deprived of combinations of Nevirapine.

Speaking to TOI, district AIDS prevention officer Dr Ravi said taking note of the urgency and complaints from NGOs in the city, the state government dispatched Nevirapine syrups for infants. “It is available at the ART centres and new mothers can avail it. Now there is adequate stock to cater to all pregnant and new mothers with HIV. Newborns are our priority,” he stated.

Chandrashekar, head of the city-based NGO Anandajyothi, said that he had written several mails to the authorities and health officers seeking supply of the essential drug. “When NACO replied stating a three-month delay in the supply of Nevirapine, we were shocked. The drug is a necessity for newborns and pregnant women. The drug was available at ART centres but not in medical stores in the city. Since 20 days, people with HIV, parents of newborn would visit hospitals and go back crestfallen. New mothers were worried as it was the question of their child’s health. Despite repeated requisitions, the medicine was delayed by 20 days,” he added.

According to statistics, the city currently has over a dozen HIV positive pregnant women.

Nevirapine syrup is said to reduce the chances of a newborn acquiring the virus from the infected mother. It is given to babies within 24 hours of birth up till 45 days.

What is Nevirapine?

Nevirapine is a prescription medicine for the treatment of HIV infection in adults and children. It is said to prevent postnatal HIV infection. Nevirapine is always used in combination with other HIV medicines.

- (By Akshatha J)


"
43,"Soon, test to measure amount of HIV virus in patients’ blood",2017-12-01T01:14:54+05:30,"MUMBAI: Following years of protest, the Centre is set to roll out the viral load-testing for HIV/AIDS patients in the next six months across the country. The test essentially tells whether the treatment regimen is working or not by measuring the amount of HIV virus in a patient’s blood.

The National Aids Control Organisation (NACO) has already shortlisted laboratories across the country that would be scaled up to carry out the tests. However, it may be a while before every patient on antiretroviral therapy (ART) qualifies to undergo the expensive test, which costs between Rs 6,000 and Rs 8,000 in a private laboratory.

In 2013, the WHO had recommended the viral load-test be carried out within six months of starting an individual on ART and be repeated at the end of that year. Subsequently, it should be carried out annually. People living with HIV and NGOs have since been fighting for the test to be made routinely available and more accessible.




“From February onward, 532 ART centres across the country will have the viral load-testing facility. In the initial phases, it will be offered to children below the age of five years, people taking treatment for five years and those suffering from HIV-TB co-infection. They have been chosen keeping the criticality of their condition in mind. The test will subsequently be available to all 1.2 million people on ART treatment in the country,” said Dr R S Gupta of NACO’s Care, Support and Treatment division. The civic-run KEM and Nair hospitals are likely to be the centres in the city.

Currently, the test is selectively offered at the state-run JJ Hospital, where patients have to go through the stringent scrutiny of a committee.

“The body takes between four and six months only to decide who will undergo the test. It’s unfortunate that in the absence of a viral load-test, the programme solely relies on CD4 count,” said Ganesh Acharya, a member of the Mumbai Aids Forum (MAF). CD4 is an indicator of the body’s immune system. “But it’s only part information about what the virus is doing with the immune system. A high viral load in the body will usually, but not always, mean a low CD4 count,” said infectious disease expert Dr Om Srivastava, who recommends viral load-testing every six months to one year.

“Because of the unavailability of the test, patients also often don’t realize when they have become resistant to the first line or second line drugs,” said Poonam Patkar, secretary of MAF.

Medecins Sans Frontieres (MSF) India that offers viral load-testing to KEM patients as a special model, run in collaboration with the Mumbai District Aids Control Society (MDACS), said they have got great results in picking treatment failures early and improving outcomes by addressing non-adherence in patients. The MSF data collated from KEM has shown that 90% of the patients were responding to the treatment offered under the national programme as their viral loads were suppressed.


"
44,HIV patient claims Bengaluru hospital denied treatment,2018-11-11T06:07:06+05:30,"BENGALURU : A 47-year-old HIV positive man from Chintamani in Chikkaballapur district was allegedly denied treatment by the governmentrun Institute of Nephro Urology (INU) in Victoria Hospital campus. However, the hospital has dismissed allegations of discrimination.




For the past three years, the man has been undergoing treatment in Bengaluru to avoid the stigma he might face in his native town. Earlier this year, he was diagnosed with renal failure and was put on dialysis at INU in May 2018. However in July, he was told to seek treatment at his native place or in any other hospital.


He was a construction labourer and as he’s suffering from tuberculosis and kidney disorder, he’s unable to work now. His homemaker wife is also an HIV patient. Their only son is pursuing graduation in Chintamani.


His wife told STOI they’re facing discrimination everywhere. “I approached the government hospital in Chintamani also, but considering his HIV status, they said as it’s a high-risk case he needed a separate machine for dialysis However, doctors claimed all patients who come to INU are initially treated here as it’s a peripheral centre. Later, they are advised to go back to their native places for further treatment as these facilities are available in all districts now.


“It’s not a case of discrimination. I will look into the issue,” said institute director Dr Shivalingaiah. He said over 80 patients undergo dialysis every day and had to be taken to INU only. We went to INU last week, but the hospital is not treating him,” she alleged.


She said from May to July, he was put on dialysis thrice a week. But it stopped since July. When his condition worsened a week ago, INU refused treatment. The family tried its luck with other government hospitals in Bengaluru, but was turned away on the grounds that he required a special machine for dialysis.



"
45,"Doctors delaying treatment to HIV patients, claims NGO",2017-12-01T05:30:00+05:30,"Mysuru: ‘Right to Health’ is the theme for the 2017 World Aids Day, which falls on December 1. However, some people living with HIV in Mysuru feel stigmatized as people in the medical profession themselves are looking at them as ‘aliens’ by delaying treatment.

Sources in Ananda Jyothi Positive Network, an organization of positive people working for the welfare of community members, claimed that doctors are avoiding treating HIV patients. They claim to have come across two cases wherein HIV patients were asked to wait for some time to get treatment after the doctors learnt they were HIV patients.

The first patient, who had a heart ailment, was asked to come back after a few weeks. The second patient, a woman who was suffering from uterine prolapse, was told there were no beds at the hospital, they said.

Deepa, a non-community coordinator, claimed that doctors do not deny providing treatment but delay it. “They also ask for proof whether they had given them in writing that they wouldn’t treat them. We have intervened and in talks with authorities concerned to get them treatment,” she added.

Treatment for co-infection like tuberculosis is easily available and it is not the case for co-morbidities like tooth ache, heart and kidney problems, claim sources. After the National Community Care Centre scheme, which reserved 10 beds for HIV patients and offered free treatment, was scrapped in 2012, treatment for HIV patients has taken a beating, sources add.

AIDS programme Officer (in-charge) Dr C Suvarna admitted that the issue of delayed treatment was raised at a meeting but specific instances were not brought up to them. “No one can deny treatment and in such a case one can complain to us,” she said. The officer however claimed that for medical reasons treatment could have been delayed or postponed. “Moreover, surgeries have to be done under extra care and it would take some time. We can analyse if the case was brought to us and whether it is ‘willful’ delay or not,” she said.

Stats:

** A total of 18,175 persons have been affected with HIV in Mysuru district. Of them 14,470 are registered with the ART centre at KR Hospital, 2,624 with Asha Kirana Hospital and 1,081 with JSS hospital.

** HIV prevalence is 0.7 % in Mysuru. Of the 1.38 lakh people including 44,811 pregnant women who were tested in 2016-17, 951 people and 33 pregnant women were found to be HIV positive. This year, the figures stand at 580 and 24 respectively.

** Mysuru has 24 Integrated Counselling and Testing Centres and one Mobile ICTC centre.

** Mysuru has 3 ART centres - KR hospital, Ashakirana and JSS hospital

** 9 Link ART Centres: Nanjangud, Hunsur, T Narasipura, Periyapatna, KR Nagara and HD Kote public health centres, Bannur community health centre, SVYM, Sargur and Ananda Jyothi Positive Network Link ARTs

** As many as 30 children were infected through their mothers between 2010 and October 2017.

** As many as 3,012 female sex workers and 1,821 male sex workers are being educated continually by an NGO Ashodaya under targeted intervention programme

** As many as 68 red ribbon clubs have been formed in degree colleges to create awareness about HIV. Students in 28 high schools are also being educated about HIV.

** Free blood: The district has 11 blood banks and blood donation camps in association with KR Hospital, JSS Hospital, Jeevadhara Blood Bank, Rotary, and Chandrakala Hospital, where HIV positive persons can get free blood.

** Shortage of blood: Though two pints of blood have to be given free of cost to HIV patients, but of late only one pint is given and they are charged for the second unit. (No attribute or source given)

HIV helpline number: 1097

Housing scheme yet to catch up in district

Ananda Jyothi Positive Network facilitates HIV people to get facilities like treatment, pension, nutritious food, blood and other benefits. It has received 372 applications from HIV patients under a government housing scheme. While houses have been provided under a group housing scheme in Bengaluru and Chamarajanagar, it is yet to be realized in Mysuru. 


"
46,Computer simulations can predict the spread of HIV: Study,2018-08-03T13:11:57+05:30,"Researchers have found that computer simulations can accurately predict the transmission of Human Immunodeficiency Virus (HIV) across populations, aiding in preventing the disease.


The study, published in the journal Nature Microbiology, found that the simulations were consistent with actual DNA data obtained from a global public HIV database.

""We looked for special genetic patterns that we had seen in the simulations, and we can confirm that these patterns also hold for real data covering the entire epidemic,"" said lead author Thomas Leitner from the Los Alamos National Laboratory in the US.

HIV is particularly interesting to study in this manner as the virus mutates rapidly and constantly within each infected individual, the researcher said.

The changing ""genetic signatures"" of its code provide a path that can be followed in determining the origin and time frame of an infection, the study found.

The rapid mutational capability of the virus is useful for the epidemiological sleuthing, but is also one of the features that makes it so difficult to tackle with a vaccine.

For the study, the researchers used phylogenetic methods, examining evolutionary relationships in the virus's genetic code to evaluate how HIV is transmitted. 

The research team found that certain phylogenetic ""family tree"" patterns correlated to the DNA data from 955 pairs of people, in which the transmitter and recipient of the virus were known.

""These HIV transmissions had known linkage based on epidemiological information such as partner studies, mother-to-child transmission, pairs identified by contact tracing, and criminal cases,"" the researchers said.

The researchers also plan to develop public health computational tools to help the agencies track the disease and allocate resources for targeted prevention campaigns.


"
47,Prisoners to undergo HIV test in state,2018-02-22T09:44:35+05:30,"JAIPUR: Inmates of jails across the state will undergo testing for HIV as Rajasthan State AIDS Control Society (RSACS) and Rajasthan Prisons headquarter, Rajasthan signed MoU for providing HIV prevention and treatment services for prison inmates in the state on Tuesday. 

Recently in Udaipur's prison, the health authorities conducted screening of 2119 inmates and 40 of them were tested positive for HIV. Besides, more than 15 were intravenous drug users. 

According to the RSCACS officials, national HIV counselling and testing services guidelines by NACO in 2016 states that HIV screening/ confirmation should be included as an integral component of the health-care service package being offered to the inmates living in prison settings. 


"
48,"HIV+ woman denied surgery at Kolkata hospital, says son",2018-10-23T09:17:19+05:30,"KOLKATA: The son of an HIV-positive patient has alleged denial of medical care by state-run NRS Medical College and Hospital (NRSMCH). The 63-yearold woman was admitted to the hospital with a fractured femur, for which she needs to undergo surgery. While the son claimed doctors had suspended treatment after learning that she was HIV positive, hospital authorities denied the charge and said the treatment had got prolonged due to other health issues of the woman.




The patient, a Beliaghata resident, was admitted to Unit-V of the orthopaedic surgery department on October 5 after she fell down at her home.

“All investigations prior to the surgery were done. But the doctors stopped her treatment after they came to know about her HIV status. They do not want to take up the surgery,” alleged one of her sons.

The hospital refuted the allegations and said the patient was being tended to with conservative treatment. According to the doctors, the patient needs hip replacement surgery that must be done under anesthesia. But the patient has other health issues, including chest ailment and psychiatric problems. “We have to wait for anaesthesia clearance due to these conditions,” a doctor said.

“The allegations are baseless. We conduct surgeries on HIV-positive patients on regular basis. So why we would we deny medical care to this particular patient. The reasons for the delay in the surgery are technical and has nothing to do with her being HIV positive,” said Dr Dwipayan Biswas, deputy medical superintendent at NRSMCH.

The patient’s family had lodged a formal complaint on October 12 with the hospital authority. The hospital administration claimed that the family was explained about the delay in taking up the surgery.

“My mother is lying on a hospital bed without any treatment. Doctors have told us to take her back home after they came to know that she is HIV status positive,” alleged her elder son.

"
49,Naco develops app to bust myths around HIV/AIDS,2017-12-22T13:46:12+05:30,"VISAKHAPATNAM: The National AIDS Control Organisation (Naco) has developed a mobile application with support from Unicef to provide detailed information on HIV/AIDS and related services.

The app will help dispel various myths related to the disease. It can also be used to evaluate one’s risk of contracting HIV as well as locate HIV-related facilities nearby.

Explaining about the app, programme manager of District AIDS Prevention Control Unit (DAPCU), KVR Sailaja said: “Anyone can download this app on their smartphones and get various information pertaining to HIV/AIDS risk factors. In case they have had unsafe sex, they can get their risk quotient evaluated and guidance for getting tests done.

They can also get queries answered. The answers to these is in the affirmative.” Usually people fear that HIV/AIDS can spread through hugging or holding hands, eating together, sharing clothes or house with an infected person, which is not true. HIV virus also does not stay alive more than a few minutes. The social protection portal section is a searchable database on social welfare schemes relevant to most at risk populations. Facilities related to HIV include information of counselling and testing services – ICTCs, ART (anti-retro viral) centres, blood banks, Suraksha clinics (for treatment of sexually transmitted infections), and for treatment of opoid injecting drug users.

"
50,"HIV, TB intervention programme in Odisha prisons launched",2018-05-10T22:03:27+05:30,"BHUBANESWAR: The state government on Wednesday launched a programme to test and treat prisoners with HIV, tuberculosis (TB). It will create awareness among them about the disease. The project will cover all the central jails, selected sub-jails/district jails and other closed settings like rehabilitation centres in the state.

Health department sources said people living in prisons and other closed settings like Swadhar, Ujjawala and state-run homes are at an increased risk of HIV infection because they lack access to preventive and care services, making these settings a high-risk environment for HIV transmission.

The National AIDS control organization (NACO), under its national AIDS control programme, categorized prisoners as one of the ‘special groups’. Section 31 of the HIV/AIDS (prevention and control) Act, 2017, stated that every person in the care and custody of the state shall have right to get HIV prevention, testing, treatment and counselling services.

Besides this, NACO is also expanding the services to women living in other closed settings such as Swadhar, Ujjawala and state-run homes.

Saathii, a non-profit organization, will implement this project with an objective to improve access and quality of HIV prevention, care and treatment services for people living in prisons and other closed settings.

About the activities of the programme, health department sources said HIV testing and counselling services will be provided through mobile Integrated Counselling and Testing Centres (ICTC) and health camps in the prisons and other closed settings. This project will facilitate provision of HIV treatment, including antiretroviral therapy (ART), care and support to people living with HIV by establishing link with ART centres.

It will also work for creating facilities for prevention, diagnosis and treatment of tuberculosis (TB). “This programme will create awareness among the prisoners and people living with other closed settings,” said Pramod Kumar Meherda, state health secretary. 

"
51,Lactating mothers test HIV +ve at Rajasthan milk banks,2018-02-01T09:45:40+05:30,"JAIPUR: Milk donation banks in Rajasthan have found that many lactating mothers in the state may have unknowingly passed the deadly HIV virus to their offspring while breastfeeding.

Out of the 16,578 women who donated milk to banks during 2017, the milk of at least 1.57% tested positive for HIV. Experts say this could be the tip of the iceberg as not all lactating mothers give milk to banks.

""The women, who donated their milk to the milk banks in 2017, were unaware that they were HIV positive or that they had Hepatitis A. They came to know about it only after they donated their milk to the bank. Before distributing milk, we have a system of testing the same,"" said Yog Guru Devendra Agarwal, state advisor of the government's Aanchal Mothers' Milk Banks.

Rajasthan is the only state to have established 11 milk banks, with seven more in the pipeline.





"
52,"20,500 got HIV through blood transfusion in 11 years: Data",2018-02-08T06:45:32+05:30,"CHENNAI : A day after reporting how 21 people in Uttar Pradesh got infected with HIV due to use of unsafe medical device, TOI has sourced government records that show 20,592 people across the country contracted HIV due to blood transfusions since 2007.

National AIDS Control Organisation (Naco) data shows Gujarat has the largest number of HIV positive cases due to blood transfusion. In the state, which is above national average in terms of prevalence and seventh in the country in general prevalence, nearly one in every five cases reported is recorded as caused due to blood transfusion. Tamil Nadu, which stands 11th in general prevalence, has reported 1,134 cases due to blood transfusion, coming sixth in the category.


‘3rd gen testing kits slow in HIV detection, must upgrade’
The data is based on information provided by patients at Integrated Counselling and Testing Centres (ICTCs) run by the National AIDS Control Organisation (Naco). Experts said that there could be misreporting as patients tend to give blood transfusion as the reason to hide unsafe sex.

Doctors said a person could contract HIV through blood transfusion if the blood bank is not equipped with fourth generation (ELISA) testing kits.

“Third generation kits used in government health centreshave the ability todetect the infection only after 8-12 weeks. Fourth generation kitscan detectit as early as from the fourth week,” said Dr A Sathish Kumar from Solidarity and Action Against HIV Infection in India (SAATHI), an organisation working with HIV patients across the country.

There have been instances where individuals have donated blood without knowing that they are HIV positive. The fourth generation kit detects infections in thewindow period and blood donated by them can be rejected straight away, said a former AIDS Control Society Official. “Naco has been allocated close to ₹1,600 crore. Authorities should procure the latest testing kits,” he said.

Kerala has in January announced that these stateof-the-art devices would soon be installed in its hospitals after a nine-year-old tested positive for HIV after blood transfusion. Private labs equipped with latest kits and charge ₹300 - ₹1,000 for HIV screening.


"
53,"HIV pulled them down, love gave hope",2017-12-01T11:05:29+05:30,"An infected needle turned Arun’s* life upside down. In another part of the country, a blood transfusion brought Radhika’s* dreams crashing down. But instead of letting their HIV+ve diagnoses fill their lives with negativity, they decided to stay positive. Brought together by a twist of fate and the late Dr Suniti Solomon, the pioneer of AIDS research in India, the couple is now proud parents to a 16-year-old, and productive members of society.

""When I was first diagnosed with HIV, I was terrified,"" says Chennai-based Arun, who was referred to Dr Solomon of YRG CARE. ""She reassured me that I could still lead a normal life as long as I took medication, and adopted a healthy lifestyle. Getting to know other people living with HIV helped me overcome my fears,"" says Arun, who gave up smoking and drinking.

Two years later, when Dr Solomon asked him if he was looking for a life partner, Arun was ready to take the next step forward. ""I hadn’t told my parents or siblings that I am HIV+ve so they were keen to see me married. I wanted a companion but didn’t want to spoil the life of another person, so I decided to marry a woman who was also HIV+ve,"" says Arun, an engineer.

Dr Solomon, who documented the first cases of HIV in India in 1986 among sex workers, took voluntary retirement in 1993 to establish YRG Care. In the latter part of her career — as people began living longer with generic anti-retroviral medications and faced the same pressure at home to get married — she began helping healthy patients find life partners. Though the centre has played ‘matchmaker’ for 30 couples so far, Arun and Radhika’s was the first success story.

With Dr Solomon’s encouragement, Arun decided to meet prospective brides. That’s when Dr Solomon heard about Radhika, a young woman from Maharashtra. And once Arun met her and her family, he was quick to make up his mind. 

Radhika, who takes tuitions at home, was also willing to take the plunge. ""I didn’t want to be alone for the rest of my life, and wanted the emotional support a partner can give,"" she says. The next hurdle was convincing his parents who were still unaware that he is HIV+ve. Arun’s family was quick to come around and the only barrier was language.

But there was another, bigger challenge ahead. The couple, who got married in July 2001, discovered that Radhika was pregnant in September. ""We were scared but both of us were on medication and our son, born in 2002, is HIV-ve,"" says Arun.

Till today, they have not disclosed their HIV+ve identity to friends, Arun’s family, or their son.

""There is still some stigma attached to the disease as people have misconceptions about it,"" says Radhika. ""But there is nothing to fear. We take our medicines every day, eat healthy and go to the hospital every six months to check our CD4 (white blood cell counts) and viral loads,"" says Radhika.

Arun says getting married and having a child has given direction to his life. ""If you live on your own, you can get depressed. My outlook to life changed after marriage, and now I have a son to live and work for, which gives purpose to my life,"" he says.

He has just one word of advice for people. ""If you are in the high-risk group, do go to the doctor and get an HIV test done. With timely and regular treatment, you can lead a normal life."" 

(*Names have been changed to protect identity)


"
54,"20,500 got HIV through blood transfusion in 11 years: Data",2018-02-08T01:35:46+05:30,"Chennai: A day after reporting how 21 people in Uttar Pradesh got infected with HIV due to use of unsafe medical device, TOI has sourced government records that show 20,592 people across the country contracted HIV due to blood transfusions since 2007.

National AIDS Control Organisation (Naco) data shows Gujarat has the largest number of HIV positive cases due to blood transfusion. In the state, which is above national average in terms of prevalence and seventh in the country in general prevalence, nearly one in every five cases reported is recorded as caused due to blood transfusion. Tamil Nadu, which stands 11th in general prevalence, has reported 1,134 cases due to blood transfusion, coming sixth in the category. The data is based on information provided by patients at Integrated Counselling and Testing Centres (ICTCs) run by the National AIDS Control Organisation (Naco). Experts said that there could be misreporting as patients tend to give blood transfusion as the reason to hide unsafe sex.

Doctors said a person could contract HIV through blood transfusion if the blood bank is not equipped with fourth generation (ELISA) testing kits.

“Third generation kits used in government health centres have the ability to detect the infection after 8-12 weeks. Fourth generation kits can detect it as early as from the fourth week,” said Dr A Sathish Kumar from Solidarity and Action Against HIV Infection in India (SAATHI), an organisation working with HIV patients across the country.

There have been instances where individuals have donated blood without knowing that they are HIV positive. The fourth generation kit detects infections in the window period and blood donated by them can be rejected straight away, said a former AIDS Control Society Official. “Naco has been allocated close to Rs1,600 crore. Authorities should procure the latest testing kits to reduce chances of HIV transmission through transfusion,” he said.

Kerala has recently (January 2018) announced that these state-of-the-art devices would soon be installed in its hospitals. This decision was taken after a nine-year-old patient at Regional Cancer Centre, Thiruvananthapuram tested positive for HIV after blood transfusion . 

On the other hand, most private medical labs in the country are equipped with these latest kits and charge Rs 300 - Rs 1,000 for HIV screening.


"
55,‘85% Raj rural women don’t know about HIV/AIDS’,2017-06-19T13:29:46+05:30,"JAIPUR: High migratory population in the state makes Rajasthan vulnerable to HIV/AIDS. But a matter of even more serious concern is that the percentage of women with comprehensive knowledge of HIV/AIDS is quite low here. 

According to the National Family Health Survey (NFHS) -4 (2015-16), only 19.1% of women have comprehensive knowledge of HIV/AIDS. The situation is even worse in rural areas, where only 14.7% of women (age 15-49 years) have comprehensive knowledge of HIV/AIDS. 

Over the past few years, the National AIDS Control Society has cut down funds given to AIDS control society across the country. It could be one of the reasons of lack of comprehensive awareness of HIV/AIDS among population of the state. 

In 2005-06 (NFHS-3), it was shown that 17.3% of woman had comprehensive knowledge of HIV/AIDS in the state. It means that the situation has not improved significantly over the past ten years. 

Among males, the situation is slightly better. According to NFHS -4, there are 37.4% of males having comprehensive knowledge of HIV/AIDS. 

Ten years ago (NFHS-3), 33.4% of males had comprehensive knowledge of HIV/AIDS.

"
56,HIV+ man cleared of killing son he thought was infected too,2018-08-18T05:53:16+05:30,"MUMBAI: A 51-year-old HIV-positive man was recently acquitted of murdering his minor son in 2016 after his wife, the complainant in the case, turned hostile. Police alleged that the accused killed the child after suspecting that he too was HIV positive like his wife, daughter and himself. 

The woman denied telling the cops earlier that her husband had called her up after disappearing with their son and said that he had killed him. The child was found drowned in a nullah along the railway tracks.

 Observing that the homicidal death of the child was not proved, the sessions court also did not find the alleged motive convincing. ""It is not believable that when his wife and daughter are suffering from HIV and they were taking treatment at a civil hospital in Jalna, then merely on suspicion that the deceased might be suffering from HIV, he would take such a drastic step of taking the life of his son,"" the court said. 

The accused and his wife had six children. The accused had been in jail from July 11, 2016. The prosecution stated that on July 5, 2016, the son was crying so the accused took him out. The prosecution said after there no trace of the father and the son, the woman appproached the police at 4am the next day, and later the accused called her on her phone and said he had killed their son. 

Pointing to her statement during the trial, the court said her evidence showed that her son was missing, so her husband went to search him.


"
57,Rap for blood banks over negligence with HIV+ donors,2017-10-10T03:19:16+05:30,"MUMBAI: Several blood banks in the city may be faltering in one of their basic, yet crucial, responsibilities, which is to refer donors to HIV/AIDS clinics if they are found to be infected with the virus.

It was recently found that while 489 units of blood were found to be HIV positive in 2016-17, only 230 donors were subsequently referred to the Integrated Counselling and Testing Centres (ICTC).

Failure of blood banks to link HIV-infected patients with ICTC centres—where the infection is confirmed and further management of the disease facilitated— could not just lead to the individual going without antiretroviral therapy, but also infecting others inadvertently.

At a review meeting held by the Mumbai District Aids Control Society (MDACS) in July, the findings were discussed with blood banks, who have now been asked to be more diligent in linking donors.

HIV positivity in the city in 2016-17 was found to be 0.3%, which is lower than the national average of 0.136%. While the overall HIV positivity in blood units collected in the city has been decreasing, it seems that the infection rate at the National AIDS Control Organisation-supported blood banks has remained stagnant for the last four years. An average of 480 units of HIV-infected blood is detected every year. Interestingly, HIV positivity in non-NACO blood banks has been showing a steady decrease.

A third of the 61 blood banks in Mumbai are supported by NACO and most of these are in public hospitals. 

Dr Shrikala Acharya, assistant project director of MDACS, said as per National Blood Transfusion Council (NBTC) guidelines blood banks should collect information about donors in case they need to be contacted for counselling or treatment in the event of their reports indicating positive for an infection. “It’s a part of the pre-donor counselling that is supposed to be done before blood collection. It is not mandatory, but it is a part of the guidelines,” she said.

Acharya added, “Often blood units are collected through camps, where a person may or may not have given his contact details. This is why we are strengthening referral systems.”

"
58,National conference on HIV/AIDS held,2018-02-17T10:08:33+05:30,"CHANDIGARH: Chandigarh State AIDS Control Society organised the National Conference on HIV/AIDS for the seventh consecutive year at the Indian Medical Association auditorium on Friday. 

The conference was inaugurated by Anurag Aggarwal, secretary, health, Chandigarh administration. NACO representatives Dr Naresh Goel and Dr R S Gupta outlined the targets of achieving 90:90:90 by 2020 and ending AIDS by 2030. The global partner was represented by Dr Nicole Seguy, team leader, communicable disease, WHO India, Dr Savina Ammassari, senior strategic information advisor, UNAIDS and Dr Bitra George. They outlined the policies to end AIDS by 2030. 


"
59,HIV wanes in Maha but rages in high-risk groups,2018-01-08T01:52:01+05:30,"MUMBAI: The recently released HIV Sentinel Surveillance (HSS) report has some good as well as worrying news for the state. The good news is that the deadly viral disease continues to be on a decline among general population. The worrying part: In certain pockets of the state, the disease is raging among high-risk populations like female sex workers.

According to the HSS, Maharashtra is 16th in terms of HIV prevalence, a positive shift of four places since the last survey in 2014-15. From 0.29%, the prevalence has reduced to 0.26%. An official from the Maharashtra State Aids Control Society (MSACS) said it was a significant drop as the HIV prevalence is now lower than the national average of 0.28%.

But experts say it’s still not time to rejoice as certain sites catering to high-risk populations such as men having sex with men (MSM), injecting drug users and female sex workers have shown a significant prevalence. Though Maharashtra is one of the states to record less than 5% HIV positivity in female sex workers, there are four sites where the prevalence has been found to be 5%. At one site, it was around 10%. Among the female sex workers in the state, the prevalence (3.48%) is more than double the national average (1.56%).

Nagpur-based NGO Indian Red Cross Society (IRCS) that has been working with female sex workers said migration has emerged as a major challenge over the years. “Commercial sex workers have started migrating and moving out of traditional pockets making it difficult to track, test or treat them. It poses a direct threat to the general population,” said Hemlata Lohave from IRCS. She added that dwindling financial resources, too, have made their job difficult. “Often we are working without funds for months. Even now, for instance, we haven’t received money for the last quarter. We regularly lose trained workers as we can’t pay salaries,” she said.

Among MSMs, the state is fifth on the national chart with the prevalence hovering around 4.69%, which is higher than the national average of 2.69%. However, in HSS 2014-15, the HIV prevalence among female sex workers was 7.4% and 4.9% among MSMs.

Mumbai, too, is one of the sites with high HIV prevalence among truckers. There were nine sites with more than 1% HIV prevalence among long-distance truckers, including Mumbai with 1.2% prevalence. 

The MDACS official said the state is working on newer strategies. “We are aware that infections are still high in metropolitan cities. In high-risk pockets, we are testing at the community level. We are also looking at multi-month dispensation of antiretroviral drugs so that a patient can come to us once in three months rather than every month,” he said.


"
60,Infected syringe jabs and dialysis push 100 into HIV death jaws,2018-02-08T08:03:45+05:30,"HYDERABAD: Contaminated syringes and blood products, blood transfusion and dialysis are inflicting scores of people with the dreaded HIV as they walk out hospitals, diagnostic labs and blood banks in Telangana.

State health department officials said 72 people had contracted the virus in 2017, while 100 were afflicted with it in 2016 through reuse and exposure to contaminated syringes, blood transfusion and exposure to blood products.






An official, however, privately admitted that the figures could be much more as several patients remain unaccounted due to poor screening methods as well as HIV infection through dialysis, which is not taken into account in state figures.

“Patients, who undergo haemo dialysis, are highly vulnerable to hepatitis C, B and HIV, if adequate aseptic measures are not in place during dialysis. There is a high percentage of patients battling these deadly infections in the city,” pointed out Mujtaba Hasan Askari, president Helping Hand Foundation, an NGO which works with HIV patients.

Recently, over 50 people were found to be infected with HIV in Unnao in Uttar Pradesh due to use of unsafe medical devices. Experts say mushrooming of blood banks, improper screening of blood and lack of checks were to be blamed for the spread of HIV.

“The Telangana State Aids Control Society (TSACS) data may not reflect the true picture of new cases being infected through syringes and blood transfusion. Also, the fact that blood transfusion standards are not maintained as many private blood banks have mushroomed. Absence of checks, regulations and safety protocols make matters worse,” Askari pointed out.

Interestingly, the latest and most-updated technology available to detect HIV, nucleic acid test (NAT), is not available in majority of the blood banks in the state.

Currently, ELISA (enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay) test as well as manual screening is carried out in majority of blood banks in the state, but these test have their limitations.

“For ELISA test to detect HIV, the virus should have been active for at least 40 days before the test. Also, the manual testing method (for ELISA third generation) has the possibility of the virus not getting detected at all due to human error. Though NAT is the safest (can detect the virus if it has been in the body for seven days), it is a costly affair,” T Vishnu Vardhan, chief executive officer, NTR Trust Blood Bank, said.

Of 136 blood banks in the city, 43 facilities, including state-run blood banks, were being supported by National Aids Control Organization (NACO). And, less than five actually conduct NAT. NACO currently supplies the third generation manual ELISA kit to supported blood banks. “The ELISA test is followed by almost all government as well as private sector blood banks. While one possibility is that the basic antibody test that we are doing does not detect HIV as the antibody has not yet been developed, the possibility of erroneous blood banks, negligence and a small possibility of re-use of syringes cannot be ruled out,” Dr V Rajasekhar, project director, TSACS, said. “So far, no incident of blood banks totally avoiding blood screening has come to our notice,” he added.

Also, once blood banks discover that a patient was HIV positive, they should inform, counsel and inform the TSACS and send the patient to the Integrated Counselling and Testing Centre (ICTC) in the district. “Usually, the blood banks do not take it to the logical end when they find a patient is positive, they tend to wash their hands off,” say insiders.

"
61,AIDS control trust to reach out to HIV+ blood donors,2018-06-08T03:42:09+05:30,"MUMBAI: Considering that some donors at blood banks test positive for HIV but don’t return for counselling and treatment, Mumbai District AIDS Control (MDACS) has introduced a system to reach out to them.


Every donated unit of blood is tested for diseases such as HIV and hepatitis viruses. The ones with infections are called, counselled and put through another round of HIV-testing. But in Mumbai there is a gap between numbers who test positive and those who return for counselling and treatment, said MDACS officials.

In 2016-17, 0.29% of the blood from banks was positive for HIV. Given the new WHO call to put every HIV-positive person on treatment at the earliest to ensure a better quality of life, MDACS increased efforts to find HIV-positive persons and start them on treatment.

It issued a circular on June 5 advising blood banks on how to take the history of blood donors and how to counsel them. Blood banks have to retest any blood unit that tests positive for HIV and call the donor for a retest and counselling session at the nearest government-run Integrated Counselling and Testing Centre (ICTC). “But in practice, such donors never return to the centres. There is a significant gap between positive sample detected and donors who return for a confirmation,"" said asenior doctor.

MDACS additional project director Dr Shrikala Acharya has written that in collaboration with American Center’s for Diseases Control, India has initiated an exercise to assess reasons for this discordance. “It has also been decided that such donors should be referred to any ICTC they are comfortable to visit,"" said Dr Acharya.

"
62,Six Jind jail inmates found HIV+ve,2018-07-26T09:39:09+05:30,"By: Vijender Kumar

JIND: A health check-up conducted in the jail here has found six inmates to be HIV positive. Jind civil surgeon Dr Sanjay Dahiya said a district health department team had examined 435 inmates at a camp held in the jail from July 19 and 24. He said 16 inmates were found positive for hepatitis C virus and six were suffering from venereal disease related to sexual infections.






The health department conducted the camp in association with the Jind jail administration under the supervision of CMO and two other doctors, including a lady doctor. Dr Dahiya said out of the six HIV positive cases, one was an old patient already undergoing treatment while the other five had been lodged in the jail recently. 

The CMO also about 40 to 50 women inmates were also screened during the camp and found to be free from any ailments. He said 300 inmates were yet to be examined by the health department. 

He said the HIV positive inmates would have to get their treatment card made from PGIMS, Rohtak, while the district health department would start their treatment in the jail.

“Earlier, the HIV positive patients had to go to the antiretroviral (ART) centre in the PGIMS for treatment but now the district health team started providing the facility to them in Jind. Our unit is now linked with the ART centre of the PGIMS,” Dr Dahiya said.

He said the department was concerned about the health of jail inmates and would continue conducting such checkups in future. Dr Dahiya said he was not sure about how the inmates contracted the HIV-positive illness.

Jind jail superintendent Harinder Singh said they used to organize such health check-up camps earlier as well. “Those who were found to be HIV positive were lodged in the jail only recently. We will look after these inmates,” he stated.



"
63,World is winning the fight against HIV,2017-12-01T09:27+00:00,"The last one and half decade had been crucial for the world in its fight against deadly HIV. While there are 36.7 million people worldwide who are living with this scourge, the good news is new infections are on decline and so are deaths due to it. On World AIDS day, a look at how far world has progressed in its fight against HIV since 2000.
 


"
64,Tamil Nadu loses track of 1 in 5 born with HIV,2018-05-07T13:43:48+05:30,"CHENNAI: At 18 months, Saravanan* tested positive for HIV — a diagnosis that led his mother to take flight with the child to Madurai from their village near Namakkal. Nine years later, she can’t bury the report anymore: The boy, who looks half his age, has tuberculosis, a common disease among people living with HIV.


Saravanan’s case is among those that have exposed the state government’s poor follow-up mechanism for children who test positive for HIV at birth. Statistics from Tamil Nadu State AIDS Control Society (Tansacs) show that of the 200 new cases of mother-to-child transmission detected in 2017, most were in the age group of 10 to 15.




The data correlates with a study published last year by the National Institute for Research in Tuberculosis. Researchers surveyed 656 children in Tamil Nadu in the 5-14 age group who registered for HIV care in 43 centres that offer antiretroviral (ARV) therapy. One in five of these children were lost to follow-up in a year.

Children less than 15 years old constitute 7% of the HIV-infected in India. More than 90% of these cases are the result of mother-tochild transmission (MTCT). Doctors can say with certainty by the 18th month if an infant has got the virus from an infected mother, HIV specialist Dr S Sundar said. “The state loses its first opportunity of preventing transmission by putting infected mothers on ARV prophylaxis too late,” he said. Adequate ARV can reduce risk of MTCT to less than 2%. It misses a second opportunity after a child is diagnosed, Dr Sundar said.

“In some instances, they may not show symptoms. There are chances that they will infect others as adults,” he said.

Doctors say early diagnosis and initiation of ART in children less than two years of age is important as failure to do so may result in early mortality. As for the rest, a study published recently by doctors from the Institute of Child Health, Egmore, offers a telling picture.

The team studied 100 children (18 months to 12 years) who were diagnosed with HIV in a government medical college in Salem: About 20% of children under the age of four died due to complications related to the disease, 25% of them had tuberculosis, 12% of them had problems with their central nervous system and 16% had blood-related disorders. Only 22 of them were asymptomatic.

Dr Murali Thandavarayan, one of the authors, said besides clinical manifestations, a majority were malnourished. “HIV in children has faster progression because of immature immunity. Early identification and management is crucial,” he said.

Officials say reasons for the loss to follow-up include unaccounted deaths, healthy children whose caregivers do not perceive the need to visit the ART centre, distance to these centres as well as the stigma involved.

“Sometimes we find it difficult to track these children as the mothers deliver in their parents’ homes,” said Dr E Suresh, who heads the ART centre in ICH.

Tansacs officials said they stepped up surveillance in the past six months. If children do not attend on the scheduled date, the outreach workers immdiately contact the family.

*name changed

"
65,62% jump in HIV/AIDS deaths in city in one year: Health ministry,2018-05-19T00:49:46+05:30,"Mumbai: Deaths due to AIDS (acquired immuno-deficiency syndrome) have increased significantly in the city over the last three years, according to data available with the central health ministry’s Health Management Information System. While 27 HIV-positive people died in Mumbai in 2015-16, the number rose to 72 in 2016-17 and further to 116 in 2017-18, showed the data.

“There has been a 62% increase in deaths due to the HIV/AIDS epidemic in the last one year alone,” said RTI activist Chetan Kothari, who compiled the data. Between 2015 and 2016, the deaths rose by 166%.

The HIV/AIDS epidemic, that had peaked in the nineties, has become manageable due to availability of medicines called antiretroviral treatment (ART); a fatal disease was soon transformed into a chronic condition manageable with drugs. Number of deaths fell as a result even as the number of fresh HIV infections began to show a decline in the last few years.

In this backdrop, the sudden spurt in deaths is worrisome, said doctors. A senior doctor, who didn’t want to be identified, said, “Deaths occur in poor patients in whom the current mode of treatment has failed.” Patients for whom the first line of ART no longer worked due to years of use, needed second- or third-line drugs. “However, these new medicines are expensive and not easily available in the government-run programme. The poor cannot afford to buy them,” the doctor added.

However, city authorities in charge of the HIV/AIDS control programme said there is a simple explanation for the increase: A sharper public health programme that has managed to track more patients.

 Dr Shrikala Acharya of the Mumbai District AIDS Control Society (MDACS) said the organization had carried out intensive loss-to-follow-up drives as per central government directives to track patients who were lost to follow-up. “This drive helped us update the actual number of deaths. It could also be the reason for the increase in reported deaths,” she said, adding that the rise isn’t necessarily an actual increase in the number of deaths.

Incidentally, the HMIS data shows that the number of AIDS deaths has been steadily decreasing across Maharashtra. From 1,426 deaths in 2015-16, the figure fell to 1,390 in the following year and further to 1,327 in 2017-18. A doctor said that HIV care has improved so much that very few deaths are recorded in the private sector, where patients pay for the latest medicine and get updated care. 


"
66,Government’s treat-all policy not an instant hit with HIV patients,2017-12-02T05:45:47+05:30,"MUMBAI: In the last six months, over 25,000 people living with HIV, including 9,400 from the state, have been added to the national programme under the treat-all policy. The process of initiating every HIV positive individual on antiretroviral treatment (ART), however, has been fraught with difficulties ranging from refusals and adherence issues to side-effects.

In Maharashtra, around 33,500 people were identified in the pre-ART category that includes those who are positive but not in immediate need of medicines due to good immunity levels. Out of that, the state has managed to contact around 21,000 people and initiate less than half on treatment. Earlier, ART would be given only after the CD4 levels dropped to 500.

“Those with higher immunity levels are reluctant to take medicines daily on the ground that they do not suffer from any symptoms. We are reaching out to them through our social workers and NGOs,” said Parimal Singh, project director of Maharashtra District Aids Control Society (MSACS). The WHO had recommended the treat-all policy so that people living with HIV could lead healthier lives and cut down transmissibility.




The Mumbai District Aids Control Society (MDACS) has been facing similar issues. Around 1,400 patients from the city have been added under the treat-all policy. “Adherence is a problem that we are trying to tackle. Under the treat-all policy, even those with higher CD4 levels are started on treatment. Some of them have stopped treatment after suffering side-effects. Their contention being they were healthier before starting ART,” said Dr Shrikala Acharya, assistant project director of MDACS. “However, to prevent problems of drug resistance, we have started rigorous counselling before initiation of treatment,” she said.

Meanwhile, United States Agency for International Development (USAID) administrator Mark Green, while speaking at an event on Friday, said, “New HIV infections in India have reduced by 66% since 2000. Today, nearly one million people are on ART and that is an extraordinary achievement you should celebrate.” He added the body would continue to provide financial support and technical expertise to the programme.

(Inputs by Rajdeep Sinha)


"
67,Rajya Sabha passes bill to ensure rights of HIV and AIDS patients,2017-03-21T20:07:35+05:30,"NEW DELHI: The HIV and AIDS (Prevention and Control) Bill, 2014, aimed at ensuring equal rights while seeking treatment, education and job by people living with HIV, was passed by the Rajya Sabha on Tuesday. 

The Bill also assumes significance as it protects such people from specific acts of discrimination by the state, or any other person. It also lays down penal provisions for any discrimination practised against a person with HIV/AIDS and breach of confidentiality.

Under the Bill, central and state governments are obliged to provide for anti-retroviral therapy (ART) and management of opportunistic infections (infections that take advantage of weakness in the immune system and occur frequently).

The protection mandated in the Bill extends to the fields of employment, healthcare services, educational services, public facilities, property rights, holding public office, and insurance.

Though the Bill was initially introduced in the Parliament by the UPA government, the amendments to the HIV and AIDS (Prevention and Control) Bill, 2014 were revived by the Modi government in July last year.

Since then the health ministry has made various changes to the original Bill to address several concerns raised by the HIV community as well as state governments.
For instance, the Bill now makes anti-retroviral treatment a legal right for all HIV/AIDS patients. It has also adopted “test and treat” policy which means any person testing positive will be entitled for free treatment by the state and central government. Earlier, this was restricted by a CD4 count rate.

It also provides for confidentiality of HIV-related information and makes it necessary to get informed consent for undertaking HIV tests, medical treatment and research. The Bill, moved by health minister J P Nadda, was passed in the Upper House by a voice vote.

During the debate on the measure, many members suggested amending the Section 14(1) of the bill, to remove the phrase “as far as possible” for providing medical treatment by the Centre and the states to those infected with HIV and AIDS.

In his reply to the debate, Nadda said “I would like to inform the House that while making the rules, we will ensure that nobody is denied treatment and we are committed to provide medical treatment to all those living with HIV or AIDS. We are going with an aggressive policy.”

However, civil society organisations raised concerns against the “as far as possible” clause and said this will “dilute” the provision and allow state governments to deny treatment to many patients.

Stessing the government's commitment to the issue, the Nadda said “India will treat anyone with HIV and AIDS.”

He added the rules will have provision to provide justification for denying treatment to the patients.

A large number of members were of the view that the phrase 'as far possible’ would defeat the purpose of the bill as it provides a leeway to the Centre and the states.

The section says: “The measures to be taken by the Central or State Governments under Section 13 shall include measures for providing as far as possible, anti-retroviral therapy and opportunistic management to people living with HIV or AIDS.”

On the members concern over insufficient allocation for National AIDS Control Programme, Nadda said Rs 2,000 crore has been allocated for this year and there is no question of reducing funds for this central scheme.

Congress member Jairam Ramesh had said during the debate that the government has provided Rs 2,000 crore for the scheme for 2017-18 which should be raised to higher levels.

On the issue of infection from blood sourced from various blood banks, Nadda said the government is giving special attention to this issue and the number of such cases have come down drastically.

The Bill also provides for fast tracking of cases relating to HIV positive persons by courts on a priority basis. In any legal proceeding, if an HIV infected or affected person is a party, the court may pass orders that the proceedings be conducted (a) by suppressing the identity of the person, (b) in camera, and (c) to restrain any person from publishing information that discloses the identity of the applicant. When passing any order with regard to a maintenance application filed by an HIV infected or affected person, the court shall take into account the medical expenses incurred by the applicant.

"
68,Discrimination of HIV+ patient: NGO files complaint,2018-08-30T07:26:56+05:30,"PANAJI: Human touch foundation, a voluntary organisation, has complained to health minister Vishwajit Rane about the discriminatory treatment meted out to an HIV+ patient at Goa Medical College (GMC), Bambolim. 

The complaint states that the sign affixed to the patient’s bed displayed ‘insensitivity and stigma’ towards the patient. The letter, written by the organisation’s founder and CEO Peter Borges, states that “this is completely unbecoming, inhuman and unexpected in the healthcare setting. This will not only increase stigma and discrimination, but also deter thousands of people living with HIV from accessing treatment”. 

Borges said people, including those with HIV, expect from GMC healthcare services that are decent, respectful and free of prejudice and stigma. The plaint has also been sent to the project director of Goa state aids control society, GMC dean Dr Pradeep Naik, its medical superintendent, Dr Shivanand Bandekar and director of health services, Dr Sanjeev Dalvi.

The complaint attached TOI’s August 29 report headlined ‘GMC reveals identity of HIV+ man, kin in trauma’. The story, which this newspaper carried on its frontpage, reported that GMC had affixed a board on the hospital bed of an HIV+ patient, thus discriminating against the patient and causing much trauma to the family.


"
69,State implements ‘test and treat’facility for HIV positive people,2017-07-13T01:00:00+05:30,"PATNA: Human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) positive patients will not have to wait for treatment at antiretroviral therapy (ART) centres in Bihar till the time their immunity drops to the level of being called people with AIDS. Following the Centre’s guideline, the state health department will make available ‘test and treat’ facility to the people from the day they are detected HIV positive. 

HIV targets and destroys CD4 T cells that strengthen immunity in a person. HIV positive patients, whose CD4 cell count is below 400, are treated free of cost at ART centres in Bihar. Patients with a CD4 count below 200 are susceptible to develop serious illnesses. 

“Now, as soon as a person is tested and found HIV positive, s/he will be eligible for ART irrespective of his CD count or clinical stage. This will help save patients from many opportunistic infections. Patients will be monitored after every six months,” said Bihar State Aids Control Society’s (BSACS) care and support treatment’s joint director Dr Basuki Nath Gupta. 

“Although all HIV positive patients, irrespective of their CD4 count and asymptomatic infection will now be eligible for ART, all the treatment protocols will be followed. Before we start ART, we test the patient to rule out all opportunistic infections. If the patient is suffering from any sort of infection, in most cases it is tuberculosis, then we treat him for that infection first before starting ART,” said Dr Mukul Kumar of the ART centre at Patna Medical College and Hospital.

He said early treatment increases immunity and the longevity of the patient and reduces the chances of getting opportunistic infections in future.

Dr Diwakar Tejaswi, who is the medical director of Regional AIDS Training Centre and Network and a member of International AIDS Society, said although this strategy had been implemented by WHO and other internal societies 3 years back, the Indian government move is welcomed.

“Early treatment reduces the morbidity and mortality rate significantly. Treating a patient early means we may be able to keep the person immune from TB and fungal infections. Also, the viral load becomes nearly undetectable in the blood, thus reducing the transmission to almost zero,” said Tejashwi. He said the patient would be getting treatment even before he suffers any illness due to HIV. “It is cost effective and suppresses the disease from spreading” he added.


"
70,HIV-positive woman in labour denied admission at UP govt hospital,2018-08-30T12:58:14+05:30,"BIJNOR: The district hospital in Bijnor allegedly refused to conduct caesarean section of an HIV-positive woman in labour when she was brought there on Wednesday. Despite repeated pleas to the chief medical superintendent (CMS), the woman was referred to a higher centre.

After the woman was brought to the district hospital, tests indicated she was HIV-positive. After this, hospital staff allegedly refused to conduct the surgery. The woman and her family members pleaded to the staff, but they did not relent.

“I am in unbearable pain. I requested the CMS to give me admission, but she refused. I am from a poor family and can’t afford expensive treatment,” said the woman, a resident of Nagina area in Bijnor, at the premises of the district hospital. She was taken to Meerut Medical College in critical condition and is still in labour at the time of filing of this report.

“The woman is a native of Mumbai and married a Nagina man a few years ago. Her husband works in Delhi and they are financially deprived. The husband is not HIV-positive,” said a district hospital staff with access to the woman’s medical record.

Hospital authorities on the other hand cited lack of adequate facilities as the reason for turning the woman away. CMS Dr Abha Verma said, “We have only one operation theatre and the mattress on which the operation is conducted needs to be destroyed after surgery on an AIDS patient. Besides, all surgical equipment also gets contaminated. The sterilisation process takes at least four days, which means the operation theatre needs to be shut down for that period. Our hospital has to conduct 7-8 deliveries per day. It is mandatory to carry out ceasarean section if the woman is HIV-positive. It is done for the safety of the newborn. Meerut Medical College was suitable for it, therefore we had to refer her there.”


"
71,"GMC reveals identity of HIV+ man, kin in trauma",2018-08-29T05:17:10+05:30,"PANAJI: In a blatant violation of confidentiality over the status of an HIV positive patient, Goa Medical College on Tuesday afternoon affixed a ‘Universal Precaution’ board on the patient’s bed, causing much distress to the family besides casting stigma.

The board invited curious stares and subjected the family to humiliating questions. No sooner they found out about the board, the patient’s children decided not to dare enter the ward for fear of being discriminated at the educational institutions where they study. Other members of the family were in tears trying to fend off unwanted questions.



TimesViewDiscriminating against and victimising an HIV/AIDS patient is not only condemnable, it is also criminal. This single insensitive act by the state’s premier hospital will only serve to dissuade others from seeking treatment. Under the central law that provides for stiff punishment against all actions that may lead to hostility against HIV patients, both, the person who ordered the placing of the board on the patient’s bed and implementor, must be punished. Also, the state government must immediately see to it that all staffers of GMC, medical and otherwise, are apprised about the proper ethics to be followed in treating HIV patients and the consequences in case of failure to do so.

“The doctors, nurses, attendants and even those who bring food and clean the patient know about the health status. It is clearly written in all the papers appended in the treatment file too. I can’t understand why this board was put,” a close relative of the patient said.

“The hospital should be helping such people who may not live for long. If they did not want us here, then they should have given us a special room or sent us away,” she said. The patient has been admitted at GMC in the past but this is the first time the family says such a board was affixed.

“The staff did not think about the repercussions on the family. The ward sister was actually fixing the board near the patient’s head, but later put it at the foot of the bed. Were instructions given by the doctor to put the board? When the other patients ask the nurses about the board, won’t they reveal the health status?” she asked.

“Even the few people who are coming to visit the patient will stop once they come to know about the health status. Neighbours are also coming to visit and are asking about the board. It’s a big shame for us. I’m going mad,” she said.

The board was removed on Tuesday evening after a non-governmental organisation, Human Touch, working to end discrimination and provide care and support to people living with HIV raised the issue with the hospital authorities.

Dean of Goa Medical College Dr Pradeep Naik said circulars were issued in the past asking the staff members to avoid any such terminology.

“We have given strict instructions to all wards not to engage in any discriminatory behaviour against patients. From the preliminary report which I have received, it is not clear who put up the board. I have sought a detailed report by Wednesday. We will repeat the circular that we had issued earlier. This will never happen again,” he told TOI.

“Universal precautions are necessary, but should not be displayed publicly on the patient’s bed,” CEO of Human Touch Foundation Peter Borges said.

“This is not an isolated case. Such incidents will lead to more stigma and discrimination for those living with HIV. Such attitude of those working in medical space is unbecoming and will create hardships for those trying to access healthcare services in public hospitals. We will never be able to end the stigma if it exists in medical settings,” Borges said.


"
72,NHRC notice to UP govt over spread of HIV among prisoners in jails,2018-03-07T19:16:31+05:30,"LUCKNOW: The National Human Rights Commission (NHRC) has taken suo motu cognizance of a media report that twenty-four prisoners have tested positive for HIV in the last four months at Gorakhpur District Jail in Uttar Pradesh. They include 21 undertrials and three convicts, including a woman.

Reportedly, during the tests conducted by the Uttar Pradesh State AIDS Control Society in 70 jails of the State, 265 prisoners were tested HIV positive till December last year. These cases have been reported from the jails in Bareilly, Allahabad, Gorakhpur, Lucknow, Faizabad, Agra, Meerut, Varanasi and Kanpur.

The Commission has issued notices to the chief secretary and IG (Prisons) of Uttar Pradesh calling for detailed reports in the matter within six weeks along with the steps taken to deal with the menace.

It has also observed that the contents of the news report, if true, indicate towards sorry state of affairs in the jails of Uttar Pradesh. Seemingly, there is an urgent need to conduct a probe into the matter to determine the cause of the spread of HIV infection among prisoners. It is also necessary to take immediate preventive measures so that other prisoners do not fall prey to the infection and those, who are suffering are provided necessary medical treatment.

According to the media report, carried on February 28, 2018, the jail administration has claimed that the infection did not spread inside the jail and the prisoners were already infected when they arrived. Most of them have been jailed under the Narcotic Drugs and Psychotropic Substances Act. As reported, in the month of October last year, on the initiative of Uttar Pradesh State AIDS Control Society, a camp was started to conduct blood tests on the prisoners to detect HIV in which, more than half of the prisoner lodged in the jail were tested. 

"
73,"HIV+ patients lose match, win over discrimination",2017-10-29T22:11:55+05:30,"ALLAHABAD: A team of HIV positive and AIDS patients posed a tough challenge to the team of administrative officials, during a cricket match organised at Madan Mohan Malviya (MMM) Stadium to create awareness about the disease on Sunday.

Batting first, the team of government officials — Administration IX — managed to set a target of 122 runs after losing four wickets in 12 overs. The chief development officer (Allahabad) Samual N Pal’s unbeaten 58 helped the team to put up a tough challenge for their opponents.

The team of HIV positive and AIDS patients could manage to score only 38 runs and were bowled out at the end of the match. However, the prize money for the match was given to the team of HIV positive players.

The participating government officials said the cricket match sends a clear message that people diagnosed with HIV or AIDS are competent enough to do whatever they want in their lives.

The match was organised by the District Aids Prevention & Control Unit (DAPCU) with the support of the district administration on Sunday and plans to organise more such tournaments.

District programme manager of DAPCU, Dr Rohit Pandey said, “It’s a small effort which indicated that HIV+ people should not be discriminated against with and the society should support them. Sports especially cricket could be a great medium to create awareness among masses and bust myths associated with co-habitation with AIDS\HIV patients.”

The 11-member team of HIV+ patients was selected by the Uttar Pradesh Welfare for People Living with HIV/AIDS Society (UPNPplus), an organization which works for the welfare of people living with HIV/AIDS (PLHIV). 

A DAPCU official, preferring anonymity, said, “If equal opportunities are given, people living HIV and AIDS can excel in any field. While interacting with them, we advised them to take their medicines regularly and lead a normal life.”

“There is a strong need to do away with the misconceptions about AIDS and the stigma and discrimination asosciated with people diagnosed with the condition. Sunday’s match will set an example of the love and courage displayed by HIV positive patients. It will show the society that we are able to achieve our dreams like others.” said an HIV positive player, who participated in the match.

"
74,18 preliminary HIV+ cases identified at 'gram samvedana',2018-02-18T14:11:43+05:30,"KOLHAPUR: The District Aids Prevention and Control Unit (DAPCU), Kolhapur has identified as many as 18 preliminary HIV positive cases in the on-going 'gram samvedana', an awareness campaign being conducted across 65 villages from February 6. 

DAPCU programme officer Deepa Shipurkar said that as many as 12,000 screenings have been conducted in the last 11 days in the rural and remote areas of the district. Shipurkar said those cases, which have been tested positive, have to undergo further tests to get the accurate result. 

She added that these patients will be counselled at an integrated counselling and testing centres (ICTC) before starting any treatment.

According to Shipurkar, Kolhapur district has 3-4 major industrial areas besides the textile business of Ichalkaranji. These industrial enterprises are major hubs of employment generation. People from at least 100km periphery migrate to Kolhapur in search of jobs, most of who are HIV positive. 

Another aspect unique to Kolhapur district is the seasonal migration of sugarcane cutters from Marathwada, north Maharashtra and Karnataka between October and April. DAPCU conducts regular awareness campaigns and screenings to find out prevalence of sexually-transmitted diseases among the sugarcane cutters, she said.

At least one lakh people, mostly men, migrate to Kolhapur during the sugarcane cutting season. Previous reports have pointed out that unconventional working hours, heavy load, liquor consumption and unprotected sexual activity among a host of other factors others make them vulnerable to HIV.

Shipurkar further said during Gam Samvedana, it has been found that people who travel to metro cities in search of work, contracted the virus there.

She added all HIV positive patients should opt for Antiretroviral Therapy (ART) which they can avail at the four hospitals in the district. Patients are counselled at ICTCs before being administered treatment. After a range of blood tests, the patient whose CD4 count is less than 500, he has to take treatment throughout his life. 

However, the norm has been relaxed now. The CD4 count is an indicator of how well the body's immune system is working.

She added that it is a growing concern that the disease is more prevalent in the remote areas of the district. Awareness campaigns will be increased in the coming days.


"
75,Matrimony site for HIV-positive people launched at IIM-A,2018-08-22T05:25:54+05:30,"AHMEDABAD: It’s Cupid for people with HIV. A website, launched at IIM-Ahmedabad (IIM-A) by Surat-based organizations Sri Rama Krishna (SRK) Group and Gujarat Sate Network of People Living with HIV/AIDS (GSNP+), will connect persons with HIV/AIDS across the globe.

An initiative of GSNP+, the website has financial support from SRK Knowledge Foundation and technical support from IIM-A. IIM-A director Errol D’Souza said the website represented a progressive step. He said that field surveys indicate that the number of people living with HIV is higher than official estimates.Daksha Patel, the founder of GSNP+, said that about 16 lakh people live with HIV in India. “In Gujarat, 68,000 persons regularly visit ART (antiretroviral therapy) centres,” she said.

“The actual number — including those taking treatment at private centres —might be higher. With the rise in longevity thanks to modern treatment, there has been an increase in demand for matrimony services. However, this matrimony service works way differently from the standard ones.” GSNP has so far organised six major meetings for prospective brides and grooms living with HIV and has been instrumental in 245 weddings in about a decade. The registered members for matrimony are about 1,900.


Onerous challenges face patients

It was Rasik Bhuva’s case that became instrumental in starting the matrimony service and eventually the website for GSNP+. “I was diagnosed with HIV soon after my engagement. I was quick to break the relationship off citing health issues,” said Bhuva. “When I started counselling HIV patients, I met a girl from Navsari and we tied the knot.”

He admitted that even today many prefer not to disclose their positive status to their close family members. “We have made it a norm to at least involve one senior family member from both sides to avoid any trouble later,” he said. “The problem is more acute in rural areas where we go to the patient’s home as bank or government officials to administer medicines.”

"
76,Clinics of 73 quacks sealed in HIV affected Bangarmau,2018-02-11T12:22:01+05:30,"BANGARMAU: Health authorities have taken action against 73 quacks by sealing their clinics in various localities of Bangarmau tehsil in Unnao district following spread of HIV in three villages due to alleged treatment by a quack.

“As many 73 clinics of alleged quacks have been sealed. An FIR is being registered against three quacks while notices are being served to 44 others, who have been unable to produce degrees or relevant documents for running clinics,” Unnao chief medical officer (CMO) Dr S P Chowdhary told TOI on Saturday.

“If ‘doctors’ are not registered with the Medical Council of India, they have no right to practice medicine. We are taking action on complaints of quackery,” the CMO added.

An official spokesman said while some of these quacks were operating from their houses, others had opened clinics.

“Officials have been asked to verify the credentials of the quacks who run advertisements on local TV channels in the district. The health department teams will also request cable operators to stop advertisements promoting tantriks and quacks,” he added.

Meanwhile, HIV affected people of the three villagers of Bangarmau — Prem Ganj, Chakmir and Kirmidiyapur — have demanded setting up of an antiretroviral therapy (ART) link centre at Bangarmau community health centre (CHC) to facilitate cheap and affordable treatment.

At present, patients are being treated at the ART centre of Ganesh Shankar Vidyarthi Memorial (GSVM) medical college in Kanpur. ART is a therapy that improves the life quality of HIV patients with treatment that maximally suppresses the HIV virus. 

“My 10-year-old daughter is HIV positive,” said Vinay (name changed), describing how his entire family makes a three-hour-long journey from Premganj where they live to the medical college in Kanpur every month. 

“My daughter depends on antiretroviral therapy given at the ART centre to keep living. We can’t afford the fare any longer. It would be better if the authorities establish a link centre at Bangarmau CHC itself,” said Vinay.

His views were echoed by Sudarshan (name changed), a truck driver and a father of a 12-year-old HIV positive son. Residents of Chakmir, Sudarshan and his wife travel to Kanpur every month for treatment of their son and the bus ride costs Rs 800 per trip. 

“The amount spent on travelling to the nearest ART centre should be reimbursed. Moreover, the government should set up a link centre here, else I would have no option but to skip treatment,” he said.

Local social activists said what is worrying is that of the total 58 HIV positive cases identified so far during screening in the three villages, only 25 have visited the ART centre.

“ART treatment can’t cure HIV/AIDS. There is still no outright cure for the disease, and it does not go away by itself. But ARTs do slow down the damage that the virus does to the immune system, and allow people to live long, productive lives like everyone else, without succumbing to the disease,” said an activist.

A senior health official at ART centre, meanwhile, said there were several reasons why patients avoid medication. “They usually do not want to reveal their condition to their near and dear ones. Many skip the treatment out of the fear that others will find out about their condition,” he said. 

At least 58 persons tested positive for HIV in Bangarmau after a quack allegedly used infected syringes to treat scores of his patients. Of these, 33 were detected at a blood donation camp on February 3 while 25 had come to light last year.


"
77,Experts to spread HIV awareness,2018-09-19T09:00:17+05:30,"GUWAHATI: The state government is roping in experts from the health and education department to make youths aware of responsible and safe sexual behaviour to check the spread of HIV. India HIV Estimations 2017 show a significant rise in the number of cases in the region in recent years. The government initiative, under the Adolescence Education Programme (AEP), is expected to address this burning issue. 

The study report- released by the National AIDS Control Organisation (NACO) on Friday-stated Mizoram, with at 2.04% cases, had the highest number of adult HIV cases in the country followed by Manipur at 1.43% and Nagaland at 1.15%. According to the report, new infections in Assam have increased by 37%, while new infections have declined nationally between 2010 and 2017. Among the northeastern states, new infections in 2017 in Arunachal Pradesh increased by 65%, in Assam by 37%, Mizoram by 18% and Meghalaya by 10%.

Project director of Assam State AIDS Control Society (ASACS), Anurag Goel, said every selected school should have a male and female teacher for the implementation of the programme. The Centre had launched the initiative in 2005. ""It is our prime responsibility to teach our youth the importance of safe behaviour,"" he said.


"
78,HIV-hit people of Unnao now seek change in village name,2018-02-14T07:45:53+05:30," BANGARMAU (UNNAO): Linking their village name with HIV/AIDS after detection of many cases has upset people of Prem Ganj who have now demanded a name change to avoid social stigma. 

They are also angry at the media coverage and 'canard' spread by local health officials about the area being a hub of sex trade.

At least 58 people were found to be HIV positive in three localities of Bangarmau town, including Prem Ganj, Chakmir and Kirmidiyapur, after a quack allegedly used infected syringes to treat scores of his patients.

Of them, 33 were detected at a blood donation camp on February 3 while 25 had come to light last year. Barely 3 km from Lucknow-Agra Expressway, things were quite normal in Prem Ganj, a sleepy pocket and one of the three HIV affected localities of Bangarmau. But Prem Ganj got a new identity, ""AIDS wala mohalla"" as maximum number of HIV positive cases were reported from there.


"
79,Condoms distributed on eve of Valentine's Day to fight HIV/AIDS,2018-02-13T23:57:30+05:30,"NAVI MUMBAI: On the eve of 
Valentine's Day, several youngsters distributed over 7000 free condoms to citizens outside Vashi railway station in order to promote public health and safety. The event was organized by AHF-Jyothis Charitable Trust, which has its centre at Kalamboli sector 11.


A giant condom caricature was also put up outside the railway station. “We are looking after several HIV positive patients, many of whom are poor and homeless. Hence, it is better to take precaution and care, before being struck by such a deadly disease,'' said Sister Neelima of the Kalamboli care centre.




The youngsters of LEO Club and other groups supported the cause by chanting slogans like 'Zingadi melegi na dobara' (You won't get life again) as they cheerfully distributed the free condoms. They also advised the people to avoid risque sexual behavior and to romance safely on V-Day and in fact all the other days of the year.

"
80,"Fearing boycott, locals use fake names at counselling",2018-02-13T08:56:28+05:30,"KANPUR: The locals of Bangarmau have started faking their identity at Integrated Counselling and Testing Centre (ICTC) fearing that if tested positive for HIV, either their employers would fire them or they would face ostracism by the villagers.

The issue came to fore on Friday when nearly seven locals from Bangarmau reached ICTC Hasanganj and got themselves enrolled for the blood test.

“It was when all the seven persons were tested negative, they disclosed to the ICTC staff that they had faked their identity owing to social stigma,” said a staff of ICTC.

“They said that not only they fear social boycott from the locals but even by their employer, who might ask them to look for work elsewhere,” he added.

To overcome the issue, the health department in the three villages will soon start an awareness drive to identify HIV positive persons in collaboration with UPSACS (UttarPradesh Aids Control Society), said a senior health official.

“We have come to know about people faking their identity through ICTC staff. Though it is a bit disturbing, but we will try to convince them. We will create awareness through street plays, graphics and pictures, which are easy to understand as most of them are uneducated,” said nodal officer AK Rawat.

“Usually, the field workers mingle with the people and seek their help to get friendly with the suspected HIV positive cases. Once they are identified, they are told how HIV spreads, and that it is not something to hide or be ashamed of. We will guide them about the ways to keep them and their near and dear ones fit,” said the nodal officer.

Elaborating about functioning of the ICTC, a health officer told TOI that the staff members fill up a form with personal details such as home address so that the person can be tracked for treatment in case he/she does not turn up after testing HIV positive.

Thereafter, doctors ask them about any illness they may have, and give them medicines.

Later, paramedical staff collects the person’s blood samples, the results of which come out in halfan hour.

He further said each of the six men is taken to the counsellor who advises them on the use of condoms and tells them to visit an ART clinic in case they test positive.

A CD4 count is then taken at the ART Centre, and if it is less than 500, the patient is treated as per the standard norms, he added.


"
81,Over 500 patients in Maharashtra contracted HIV via infected needles in 5 years: RTI,2018-02-09T06:02:26+05:30,"MUMBAI: Transmission of HIV through infected needles doesn’t seem to be restricted to villages in Uttar Pradesh alone. Patients in Maharashtra too have, over the years, claimed to have contracted HIV through infected needles or syringes.

An RTI response from National Aids Control Society (NACO) showed that over 500 people in the state have got HIV through infected needles. Between 2012-13 and 2016-17, 512 disclosed at Integrated Centres for Testing and Counselling (ICTCs) that exposure to infected needle was responsible for the infection, said RTI activist Chetan Kothari. Numbers suggest an average 70-200 people get HIV through infected needles every year. In 2017-18, 69 people, including 29 women, contracted the infection. 




But the numbers have been highly debated by state agencies working towards controlling the disease. Parimal Sinh, who heads the state Aids control society, said less than 0.5% of new infections are due to infected needles. Over 90% of the infection in the state happens through the heterosexual route. 

“More importantly, the needle-infection numbers are based on voluntary disclosures made by people during counselling sessions before and after they are tested for HIV in ICTCs. Often, patients tend to suggest blood transfusion and infection through needles as possible mode of transmission. While our counsellors try to find out the exact reason, we also have to keep in mind the mental state of the patient.” 

Medically too, a single needle usage may not necessarily mean transmission of HIV. Eldred Tellis of Sankalp Rehabilitation Trust, that has been working with intravenous drug users (IDUs), said the virus could survive for three hours in the bore of a needle as there is vacuum, but otherwise it would die within 10 seconds. “But since HIV is a weak virus, the viral load of the infected person has to be really high for transmission. Studies suggest that one in 10 persons will get HIV if the needle is infected.” 

 Interestingly, the highest HIV prevalence (7%) in the country is among IDUs, who use addictive substances through injections by exchanging needles. “In most cases, they pull out blood and put it back in the syringe to extract maximum of the drug and inject into veins contributing to high HIV infection,” he said. Tellis added that the authorities must also think of hepatitis C infection as that transmits more efficiently than HIV. “In Mumbai IDUs, hepatitis prevalence is around 35%, whereas HIV is 9.5%,” he said.


"
82,Relief for HIV patients: They can now take home 3 months’ drugs,2018-08-08T12:03:50+05:30,"MUMBAI: For people living with HIV, receiving medicines is as much of a challenge as keeping the virus in check. Every once a month, the person must seek leave from the workplace, arrive early in the morning to a hospital, beat the crowds and queue up for hours to collect the antiretroviral medicines. 

 For a section of people living with HIV, this situation will soon change. In a first, the National Aids Control Organisation (NACO) has decided to give patients the medicine stock for 90-days at a time. Currently, most patients are handed stocks for a month, and in rare instances, for two months. People living with HIV have long wanted this option, which has been tried with success in several African countries.

 Termed as Differentiated Service Delivery Model (DSDM), it has already been rolled out at ten centres across the country, including KEM Hospital in Parel. Patients, though, will have to meet several criteria to be eligible for DSDM. “Primarily, it will be given to those who have been on treatment for at least a year and have 95% adherence rate. The individual has to be clinically fit and free of any side-effects and opportunistic infections (such as tuberculosis) at the time of enrolment,” said Dr RS Gupta, deputy director, NACO. “Besides making it easier for patients, it will also help to decongest the ART centres,” he added. 

 At KEM, over 500 patients have already been identified and enrolled into the programme. The Parel hospital caters to over 1500 people living with HIV. “Patients often have problems seeking frequent leaves from their workplace. This initiative will save them repeated visits only for drug refill. It will also save travel costs,” said Dr Srikala Acharya, assistant project director at the Mumbai District Aids Control Society (MDACS). She added that only patients on the first line of treatment and CD4 count (a vital parameter) of more than 500 will be considered for DSDM. 

 Besides Mumbai’s KEM, centres at Ahmedabad, Hyderabad, Kolkata, and Benaras, and designated hospitals in Manipur, Bhagalpur and Raipur are rolling out the initiative. Talking to TOI, a person living with HIV hailed the model and said it was long-awaited and will go a long way in making life easy for patients. “Most HIV-affected people continue to live in anonymity. It, therefore, becomes difficult to explain in offices why one needs to leave every month on fixed days,” said the 42-year-old central Mumbai resident. 

 Members of the civil society too have welcomed the decision but cautioned that support systems have to be strengthened for the model to succeed. “It’s a great initiative particularly for patients who have to visit resource-strapped health facilities. In Mumbai, 17 ART centres cater to nearly 35000 patients. Decongestion of these centres will allow counsellors to spend more time with patients,” said HIV activist Ganesh Acharya. However, he said for DSDM to succeed, counselling facilities must be enhanced.

 Echoing the same, Sachin Awasthi from Vihaan, a patients’ group that works towards improving adherence, said that the monthly meeting with counsellors and caregivers play an important role. “We have to ensure that patients don’t start taking their regimes casually,” he said.
"
83,‘HIV patients fail to follow up on therapy’,2018-11-30T13:24:36+05:30,"PANAJI: The Goa Medical College’s Antiretroviral Therapy (ART) centre has lost over 500 patients registered with it for treatment.



An official said the centre is facing a major challenge with follow-ups as many avoid the therapy fearing side effects while many others feel that there is no need to take the treatment continuously when they are fit. The biggest fallout of this is that when patients finally turn up with opportunist infections, it is too late to do anything for them.

“They come to us and beg to be saved from dying. At that stage, we are really helpless,” he said.

At the centre, patients on therapy are counselled to continue with the treatment regime, as non-adherence has high chances of them developing resistance to drugs.

An official said that while drug resistance can occur even among patients, who have been on ART for a long period, skipping the therapy without a consultant’s advice will also do no good. The ART centre has about 200 cases of first-line failure and about 15 cases of secondline failure.

He said when a patient develops resistance to drugs, it complicates matters even for the doctor, adding some patients simply disappear after starting the therapy.

“To avoid follow-up, they do everything possible to stay away. They change their contact numbers and even residence,” he said.

The centre’s staff has now stopped tracing such patients following a directive of the National AIDS Control Organisation.

A positive development for the centre is that it no longer needs to send blood samples to JJ Hospital for detecting a viral load of HIV/ AIDs persons. They get samples tested at an independent laboratory in Mumbai and results are received on mail the very next day, while a hard copy is received within a month. This, he said is a major relief for patients developing drug resistance as drugs can be altered without much delay.

In the past, he said persons failing to respond to ART had to visit the Mumbai centre to get their drugs but now they can avail it here except those who are on thirdline regime.

"
84,"Naco mandates viral load test for HIV patients, says it will check mortality",2018-02-06T11:07:30+05:30,"BENGALURU: In what could be a game changer in treating HIV patients, the National AIDS Control Organization (Naco) has decided that all patients registered for anti-retroviral therapy (ART) will undergo viral load testing. It will measure the quantity of HIV virus in patients and help doctors decide their treatment regime.

Hitherto, the test was conducted only after the first line of drugs failed, which would happen after 5-7 years of patients being diagnosed with HIV, and result in them losing golden time in starting new medicines.

On Saturday, Naco instructed all state governments to get patients to undergo routine viral load tests and check mortality rate. A staggering 80,173 people have died of HIV over the past decade in Karnataka, according to the death audit conducted by Karnataka State AIDS Prevention Society (KSAPS). 

A total of 3.1 lakh people living with HIV (PLHIV) have registered for ART in the state. Across the country, an estimated 21 lakh HIV positive patients are registered with 525 ART centres. Bengaluru has seven such centres. 

While 3,16,252 people living with HIV have registered for ART treatment in Karnataka as on December 2017, only 1, 65,917 of them actively turn up for follow-ups. The rest are either dead or don’t visit the centres.

The practice till date was to get a patient, whose blood tests positive for HIV, to undergo a CD4 count before starting anti-retro viral drugs. CD4 count is a prognostic indicator where a higher number indicates a stronger immune system. Henceforth, the patient will have to undergo a viral load test too while registering for ART treatment.

“The cost of viral load test in the private sector ranges from Rs 4,000-6,000 and not all can afford it. The government will be spending Rs 1,200 per test,” said an officer from KSAPS. 

This Naco move will be implemented from February 8 through M/s Metropolis Healthcare Limited under a public-private partnership (PPP) project. In the first year, the agency will conduct 2.1 lakh tests. The remaining patients will be covered in a phased manner.

“Currently, the programme was using targeted viral load testing to confirm suspected treatment failure owing to clinical or immunological failure of the patient. From now on, patients on ART will be monitored via viral load test at regular intervals. The result will allow early detection of potential treatment failure,” a senior officer in KSAPS said. 

Naco had also set a timeline to be followed while conducting viral load testing. “For patients on the first line of treatment, the test should be done twice in the first year, once every six months. From the second year onwards, it should happen once a year. For second/third line patients, it must be conducted once every six months after the patient’s initiation on ART,” said KSAPS officers.

However, NGOs closely working with people living with HIV (PHIV) in creating awareness have questioned the government’s partnership with a private entity. “There is a HIV law in place and the rules are likely to be framed by April 2018. Even before formulating the rules, why has the government tied up with a private party? Besides, if the private agency conducts tests only on 2.1 lakh of the total 21 lakh people registered for ART treatment in the country, it will cover only 10%. What about the rest? Instead, viral load tests should have been mandated for all HIV patients once every six months,” said David Bodapatti, who has been working with PLHIV.

HIV positive people on active ART care

Adult males: 69,376

Adult females: 84,409

Transgenders, Transsexuals: 373

Male children: 6,443

Female children: 5,316

Total: 1,65,917

Source: KSAPS (figures as on Dec 2017)


"
85,‘Challenge is to get HIV+ cases to zero’,2017-12-02T12:39:33+05:30,"PANAJI: With HIV positive cases on the decline, the challenge before the state is to detect new infections and eventually bring HIV cases down to zero, Dr Jose D’Sa, project director of the Goa State Aids Control Society (GSACS) said on Friday.

The decline has been sharp over the years, where there were more than 1,000 HIV positive cases were detected during each of the years between 2003 and 2008, D’Sa pointed out while presenting the figures. The multi-pronged strategy adopted by the government and increased surveillance has helped bring down the numbers and detect more cases. By the end of this year, a total of 70,000 people will have been tested for HIV, D’Sa said.

No sooner it is discovered that a mother is HIV positive, she is immediately put on treatment, and this has greatly helped halt the transmission from mother to child, this drastically bringing down the number of cases.

Goa was the first sate in the country to introduce a legislation for screening of blood at the blood bank, D'Sa said. 

There are facilities available at all primary health care centres to ensure pregnant mothers are screened for HIV, D'Sa said. Goa Medical College (GMC) also has two CD4 testing machines where HIV positive people can get their immunity tested.

The anti-retrieval therapy centre at GMC has also been recognised for providing first and second line of treatment. There are only a handful of patients, around four, who have to travel to J J Hospital, Mumbai to avail of the third line treatment.


"
86,"HIV on the decline, syphilis cases up",2017-08-04T11:22:51+05:30,"When a 30-year-old came to him with an unhealed sore and swelling in his armpits and groin, Dr M Balasubramanian, a physician in Tambaram, had a hunch. He had become familiar with the symptoms while undertaking a survey in the Western Ghats in the late 70s. Two tests later, he was proved right. The man had syphilis, a sexually-transmitted disease the septuagenarian white-coat thought he wouldn't see again.

A once common STD in the pre-antibiotic era, the prevalence of syphilis was brought down from 8% of the population to less than 1%. In 2011, the National Aids Control Organsiation (NACO) had announced that the country is on the verge of eliminating the bacterial infection. However, six years on, doctors say they are seeing a rise in those testing positive for syphilis among other sexually transmitted diseases, even as the prevalence of HIV is on the decline.

Data accessed by TOI from Tamil Nadu State Aids Control Society (TANSACS) has shown that from 2014 to 2016, the number of those who tested positive for HIV went down from 16,708 to 11,395 ­ a 30% decline, with the number of new cases detected decreasing by half from around 2,700. The second most common STD was Herpes genetalis -marked by genital pain and sores in some, and no symptoms in most --which, too, went down by close to 40% from 2014-2016. The biggest surprise for officials was the increase in syphilis cases from around 1,300 in 2014 to 1,700 the following year.

“This could be because of better awareness and surveillance,"" said Dr K Senthil Raj, TANSACS director, adding that many of these cases were picked up in Chennai, Salem and Nammakkal. Researchers say syphilis is on a gradual incline across the country along with other STDs like genital infection caused by human papillomavirus (HPV) and, in some pockets, Herpes genetalis.

“And in some groups like men who have sex with men, the prevalence of syphilis is significantly high,"" said Dr R R Gangakhedkar, director-incharge of National AIDS Research Institute. He said the prevalence of HIV has decreased across the country because of better intervention by Anti-Retroviral Therapy centres.

""While these centres cut the HIV transmission by 93%, a lot of other STDs go missed,“ he added. While the transmission efficiency of HIV is low, varying between one in 100 to one in 1000, syphilis occurs in one in 30 people who has come in contact with a carrier. On the brighter side, he said most of those with STDs come at an early stage because of better awareness and hence treated before complications set in.

India records 30 million episodes of STDs annually, of which the government treats about 10 million.

While government facilities target high-risk groups like the transgender community, female sex workers and homosexual groups, private labs say they have been seeing a steady increase in those reporting with STDs among the general population, especially in the 18-35 years age group.

“We have seen a 20% rise of cases of HPV and Herpes. Some of the STDs are detected when the person presents with infertility-related problems,“ said Dr Anita Suryanarayan, vice-president, operations (south India), Metropolis Healthcare Ltd. While the government has several targeted interventions for promoting safe sex, awareness is relatively low among youngsters from the middle and upper class, she felt.


"
87,"TB kills most HIV-positive people, but Tamil Nadu has no clear count",2017-09-13T08:59:09+05:30,"CHENNAI: The good: Tamil Nadu has halted and reversed the HIV/AIDS epidemic after being on the high prevalence map for seven years. The bad: More people living with the infection are dying now compared to previous years.

Statistics sourced by TOI shows that 4,397 people infected with HIV died in 2016. While from 2009 to 2013, the average number of deaths every year has stood at around 2,192, from 2014 onwards, this has gone up to 3,744 – a 70% jump. The figures were shared by Tamil Nadu State AIDS Control Society (TANSACS) after officials initially refused to share data to an RTI query on HIV-related deaths stating that the information is “highly sensitive”.

While a section of officials attributed the increase to death of people who form the “backlog group” – those diagnosed as being HIV positive 10-15 years ago, another section said there has also been a substantial rise in the number of people reporting at an advanced stage, resulting in poor treatment outcome.

A senior TANSACS official said the department did not have specifics on the cause of death among those infected with the virus. “Most of the time, the antiretroviral therapy centres get to know about the death of patients through outreach workers or other positive patients,” he said, adding the data available also included those who had died of reasons that were not directly linked to HIV, like suicide and accidents. 

TANSACS field officers say at least 60% of the deaths were because of opportunistic infections like tuberculosis – the biggest killer, followed by meningitis, pneumonia or diarrhea owing to lowered immunity level caused by HIV. “We need general physicians at ART centers to test for these infections. We lose at least 20% of our patients as they go directly to hospitals. They often don’t return to the ART centers after that,” said a field officer in Salem, among the high-risk districts. At present, ART medical officers only provide ART drugs and monitor the CD4 count – an important laboratory indicator of the immune function and the strongest predictor of HIV progression. 

According to the last India HIV Estimation report compiled by the National AIDS Control Organisation, Tamil Nadu has 1.43 lakh people living with HIV as on 2015. The number of new cases being detected have gone down over the years from 25,572 in 2009 to 11,345 in 2016. 

Another field officer in Trichy said almost 70% of the cases that come to the ART clinic at an advanced stages with a CD4 count of less than 250. “Late detection has always been a problem as AIDS is asymptomatic. People can live for 7-10 years without any symptoms. But we are seeing a marginal increase in these people,” he said, adding it could be because of the decline in awareness programmes. If detected late, death usually happens in the first six months since initiation of ART. The mortality rate, he said, is higher among males, aged 18 and above, among illiterates, and those residing in rural areas.

Another section of officials said most of the deaths are among those diagnosed with AIDS a decade ago. “In early 2000 the average survival rate of those infected was around five years, but with the advancement of drugs and better intervention it is around 10-15 years. Those people who were diagnosed back then could be dying now,” said an official from Vellore, adding that the death would decline too with lesser new infections.

Dr R R Gangakhedkar, direct-in charge of National AIDS Research Institute said the death rate was significantly high even if this included the ageing cohort. “This calls for further investigation to see if this increase is across the duration of antiretroviral therapy,” said Dr Gangakhedkar, adding that he also found it surprising that people were reporting with lower CD4 counts as the national average of the count among patients reporting in ART centers is on the rise. 

Some experts TOI spoke to also pointed out the discrepancy in numbers. “NACO report shows a 60% decrease in HIV-related deaths. The numbers keep differing in various platforms – it shows poor surveillance and data-keeping,” said Vijay Raman from Voluntary Health Services who undertake projects related to HIV/AIDS among the transgender community.

Activists have also pinned the trend to lesser awareness programmes with many international donors pulling out of the state and the Centre cutting funds.

"
88,HIV+ve woman dies denied permission in hospital,2018-07-28T08:16:02+05:30,"CHANDIGARH: Haryana health minister Anil Vij on Friday ordered a probe into the allegations that an HIV positive woman was initially denied admission by the Post Graduate Institute of Medical Sciences (PGIMS), Rohtak, even as the hospital authorities rubbished the charge.

The woman, a resident of Sonipat, died at the hospital on Wednesday, days after she was admitted following the intervention of the district child welfare committee and social organisations.

“I have given the orders for a probe into the matter. The incident will be examined and only after that any action can be taken,” Vij told reporters here.

The woman had been sitting outside the emergency ward of the hospital since July 10 along with her HIV positive husband and two children, one of whom is also HIV positive. On July 14, her husband passed away, reports said.

She was allegedly not given admission to the hospital for the next eight days and she continued to sit outside the hospital, the reports said. She was finally admitted on July 22.

The social organisations blamed the alleged delay by the hospital in granting admission to the woman for her death.

PGIMS Rohtak director Prof Nitya Nand, however, denied that there was any delay in admitting the woman or any callousness shown towards her.

“Her husband was brought on July 14 to the antiretroviral therapy (ART) centre, but the doctors declared him brought dead. The ART centre collected money and arranged for his funeral,” Nand told PTI.


"
89,Digital tracking of Tamil Nadu HIV patients in works,2018-01-08T07:59:21+05:30,"CHENNAI: Medical records of HIV patients in the state will now go digital. The Tamil Nadu State AIDS Control Society (TANSACS) will initiate the project on a pilot basis at the antiretroviral therapy centres in Madras Medical College and at the Institute of Obstetrics and Gynaecology, Egmore, which have around 5,000 HIV-positive patients enrolled in the state programme.

K Senthil Raj, TANSACS project director, said the patients will also be given a login id, so that they can access their records, including lab results and next appointment with doctors, through their phones. “Starting from the counsellor to the staff nurse and then finally the doctor, details of the patients will be fed into the system. The doctors will have a dashboard with the patient’s medical history,” he said. 

 At present, 1.2 lakh people with HIV are on the antiretroviral therapy programme run by the government.

Officials say once a patient tests positive for HIV, the ART centre maintains a ‘white card’ with the patient’s details, while the patient is given a notebook that carries information on their drugs intake and their CD4 count – an important indicator of the immune function and the strongest predictor of HIV progression. A doctor at an ART centre here said many of these cards are simply discarded. “Walk into any of these centres and you will see these cards lying in some corner, gathering dust. We usually refer to the notebooks these patients bring. Mostly we go by the information they provide,” admitted the doctor.

The TANSACS director, too, said poor documentation was a problem. “We also have duplication. A patient who registers at an ART centre in one district later moves to a centre in another district and enrolls as a new patient,” he said, adding that maintaining electronic records will do away with this challenge. “We will also be able to track them better.” 

Tamil Nadu has AIDS testing centres at all district headquarters with more than 55 ART centres and 750 Integrated (Voluntary) and Confidential Counselling and Testing Centres (ICTC) under the National AIDS Control Programme at district level government hospitals and medical colleges across the state. Patients, who are confirmed HIV-positive, visit ART centres at least once a month for drugs and testing. 

While NGOs and experts working with people living with HIV have welcomed the move, they said digitalisation could also raise concerns on privacy. “Many of them lie low as they don’t want people around them to know they are infected. They will be wary if they know their details are available online. The state needs to assuage this by holding awareness camps,” said Vijay Raman from Voluntary Health Services which undertakes projects related to HIV/AIDS among the transgender community.


Online team to take questions

In an effort to fight misinformation on sexually transmitted infections and diseases, the Tamil Nadu state AIDS control society will soon revamp its website to make it more interactive. Public can clarify doubts about condom use, STDs and STIs by emailing a group of counsellors dedicated for this. The website will be launched on January 11.

"
90,NMC to provide free bus pass to HIV patients,2018-07-23T13:18:09+05:30,"NAGPUR: The Nagpur Municipal Corporation is set to provide free bus passes to HIV and AIDS patients to enable them to travel free to the anti-retroviral therapy (ART) centres for medication. NMC transport department’s proposal to this effect will be tabled before the transport committee on July 23. The move may benefit thousands of patients taking treatment in Government Medical College, and Indira Gandhi Medical College.

As per the proposal, NMC will issue free smart card pass — that will be renewable every year — for Red bus service for those who can’t afford to travel to ART centres. The beneficiaries can travel in NMC buses six times a month using the pass.

After sending the list of registered persons to the transport department, the free pass or smart card will be submitted to respective district collector, and district AIDS prevention and control squad, Nagpur. After getting administrative approval for the proposal, the transport committee and NMC will prepare a policy on this.

The transport department has also submitted income and expenditure statements for three months (April-June) of this current fiscal. As per the statement, the department generated Rs16.06 crore through sale of tickets as against expenditure of Rs39.41 crore.

Meanwhile, standing committee chairman Virendra Kukreja on Thursday gave a nod to civic administration’s proposal to procure modular furniture and air-conditioning for the Smart City office to be set up on the seventh floor of NMC’s new administrative building. For both works, NMC will spend over Rs1.50 crore. The panel also gave a nod to health department proposal to pay Rs20.85 lakh to a firm supplying cow dung cakes to NMC crematoriums.

Other proposals cleared include Rs28.95 lakh for construction of a damaged bridge on Ring Road at Kamgar Chowk, Rs39.36 lakh for renovation of Indira Gandhi Hospital in Corporation Colony, Rs51.83 lakh for construction of a nullah on Risaldar Road to Adarsh School, and Rs92.88 lakh for construction of stormwater network in Jogi Nagar Bhim Nagar area.


"
91,"After blood transfusion at government hospital, 6-year-old tests HIV+",2018-01-13T06:35:27+05:30,"DEHRADUN: A six-year-old boy from Kaithal district in Haryana who underwent several blood transfusions to treat thalassemia in government hospitals in two states has tested positive for the HIV virus. The family found out about their child contracting HIV earlier this month after blood tests at Civil Hospital, Roorkee, where he was being treated for the blood disorder since August 2017, revealed the infection. Since then, the aggrieved family has been running from pillar to post, trying to find out details of the blood samples that were used for transfusion.
 
Both parents have tested negative for the virus, which the family said confirmed their fears that the boy had most likely been administered HIV-infected blood. The last blood transfusion the patient underwent was at the Roorkee hospital on January 2. The hospital has declined to provide the family details of blood units used for transfusion citing National Aids Control Organization (NACO) guidelines on protecting identity of donors.

 The uncle of the boy provided TOI with a copy of the letter which the family wrote to the chief medical superintendent (CMS) of the hospital on January 10. The letter read: “Our child was transfused blood on August 28, September 9, October 7, November 17, November 29 and January 2 at your hospital. In the recent blood test it has come out that he is suffering from HIV infection. Please provide us details of blood donors (sic).”

 The uncle said, “We are shocked at the non-cooperation of hospital staff. They have just handed us a sheet of paper which states that the blood units used in the transfusion were infection-free. What use is it? We want those responsible for ruining the life of a child to be punished and to ensure that no other innocent lives are destroyed.”

 Dr Arvind K Mishra, CMS, Civil Hospital, Roorkee, maintained that the blood units used for transfusion were “absolutely safe”. “Our staff has verified that the blood used for transfusion was infection-free. The family was refused details of blood units as we cannot share details of blood donors according to NACO guidelines,” Mishra said.

 A health department official, however, said that the hospital was asked to share details of blood samples with the family. Pradeep Hatwal, assistant director, Uttarakhand State AIDS Control Society, said, “We spoke to the hospital authorities on Thursday and had asked them to provide details of the blood unit such as the lot number, etc, after withholding the name of donors.”

 Meanwhile, the CMS of the Roorkee hospital has also hinted that the child may have contracted the infection in Kaithal where he underwent over 40 blood transfusions in hospitals before the family moved to Roorkee. The boy’s father works in a private transport firm in Roorkee and his wife and child shifted to the city in August 2017.

 The traumatized family said that they would now approach Civil Hospital, Kaithal, to seek details of the blood used during transfusions.

 TOI spoke to principal medical superintendent of Civil Hospital, Kaithal, Dr Mukesh Kumar, who said that the hospital was willing to share details of the blood used during the procedure.

 “Our hospital tests all donated samples. There is no question of transfusing infected blood to anyone. We will certainly provide the family with details of blood transfused to the child,” Kumar said.

 The family of the patient said that their circumstances had forced them to shift to their village in Kaithal where nobody was aware that the child was HIV-infected.

 “The boy will have to live with the stigma of being an HIV patient if we stay in Roorkee as the local residents know of our situation. We have no other option but to go back to our village,” the uncle said.
"
92,Abbott ties up with Chennai-based YRGCARE to study HIV infection patterns in India,2018-01-11T10:22:15+05:30,"CHENNAI: Multinational healthcare company Abbott has tied up with Chennai-based Y R Gaitonde Centre for AIDS Research and Education to study India's viral diversity to improve accuracy of diagnositc tests. 

While Abbott will provide study protocol and diagnostic equipment, YRGCARE will help in screening and sequencing rich patient data from infected populations in India.

HIV and viral hepatitis are among the biggest public health threats in India today as they can produce many genotypes (genetic constitution of an individual organism), which keep combining to form recombinant strains or mutations making detection trickier. Understanding the distribution of genotypes and recombinants is critical to development of diagnostic tests.

India has the third largest HIV incidence in the world -- more than 2.1 million people. Many of them are co-infected with hepatitis C virus (HCV). 

People, who inject drugs, and sex workers are identified as key affected populations. Dr Sunil Suhas Solomon, chairman, YRGCARE, said drug-using populations in India bear a disproportionate burden of HIV and HCV, and it is critical to understand the transmissions in this group. 

""Sequencing data in these affected populations will help us understand the evolutionary nature of the viruses enabling optimal treatment interventions to maximize impact,” he said. 


"
93,'HIV is a sin that needs to be tackled by God's rule',2018-11-19T19:16:32+05:30,"AIZAWL: Mizoram has the highest prevalence of HIV among adults in the country. But the Zoram Thar or New Mizoram, a spiritual group fielding candidates for the Mizoram polls headed by evangelist-turned politician Reverend Zaichhawna Hlawndo has a different take on the problem and its solution.
 

Hlawndo said that the problem of HIV in Mizoram is a sin that can only be tackled when God’s rule is established.

""I am telling people that when people disobey God, they commit sins. You and I can do nothing to tackle the problem of HIV. But only God can eliminate the menace of HIV. For this to happen, our duty is to make sure that people who will rule are godly men and women,” said

Hlawndo, who returned from UK in 2017 and joined the electoral fray as a 'divine call'.

He added that the path of evils brings down the afflictions like HIV.

According to National AIDS Control Organisation’s 2017 estimation, Mizoram at 2.04 per cent has the highest HIV prevalence rate in the country, followed by Manipur (1.43 per cent) and Nagaland (1.15 per cent). At the national level, the prevalence rate is 0.22 per cent and it is said to be declining.

Mizoram’s population is about 11 lakh and about 18,081 were found to be HIV positive between October 1990 and August this year. In Mizoram, the trend of HIV positive cases is on the rise.

""Therefore if we have to make things right, our minds and hearts have to be right. I mean we have to shun the path of evil and embrace the path of God,"" Hlawndo said, adding that his party is for bringing in moral transformation, rather than material reforms.

Hlawndo’s party has fielded 24 candidates for the 40-member assembly polls on November 28. Hlawndo is contesting from two seats--- in Serchhip he is pitted against chief minister Lal Thanhawla and in Aizawl West-I.

He prefers to call his party candidates including himself as 'apostles' of ""moral transformation"" for Mizoram. Among the 24 candidates who are contesting as Independents, there are three women, including Hlawndo's two daughters.

In his meetings, Hlawndo says his part's intention is not to be the rulers, but servants of God. ""God is going to make the nation. We will serve as his servants,"" he said. As an evangelist, Hlawndo has a strong followers in the Christian-majority state.

If Hlawndo has the theological solution to the problem of HIV, the ruling Congress and the opposition Mizo National Front (MNF) have virtually failed to make it a major health issue in the current election.

""Our manifesto focuses on the health issues in a comprehensive way which also includes HIV. If we come to power, the problem of HIV will be dealt with in an effective way,"" Congress spokesperson, Lallian Chhunga said.

MNF chief and party's chief ministerial candidate, Zoramthanga said it was Congress government’s failure to check the spread of HIV. ""HIV issue is a serious one. We will deal with it seriously when we are in power,"" Zoramthanga said.

"
94,Puducherry stands first in country with zero prevalence of HIV,2017-12-30T12:57:27+05:30,"PUDUCHERRY: The Union territory of Puducherry has achieved zero prevalence of HIV and secured first place in HIV control and prevention among all other states and Union territories in the country, said director (health and family welfare services) K V Raman.

Speaking to reporters on Friday, Raman said 800 pregnant women (as a representative of the general population) were tested randomly for HIV in Puducherry and none tested positive. Hence, the Union government officially announced that ‘Puducherry has zero prevalence in HIV and stands first among all other states and Union territories of India’. At present, the HIV prevalence in India is 0.28%.

While prevalence is the actual number of cases with the disease during a period of time or at a particular date in time, incidence is the rate of new cases of the disease reported in a period of time e.g., per month or per year.

The survey was a part of the Union government’s HIV sentinel surveillance conducted once in two years through the National Aids Control Organisation, New Delhi, in all the states and Union territories of India. In the previous 2014 HIV sentinel surveillance, Puducherry was placed 10th with a prevalence of 0.13%.

Puducherry also stood first with least HIV prevalence of 0.2% in “the men having sex with men” (MSMs) among all states and Union territories. The prevalence in India is 2.69% among the MSMs. Puducherry was ranked fourth with a prevalence of 1.21% in the previous 2014 HIV sentinel surveillance.

Puducherry was eighth in the country with HIV prevalence of 0.27% among the female sex workers. The prevalence in India is 1.56%. Puducherry was ranked 16th with a prevalence of 1.21% in the previous 2014 HIV sentinel surveillance.

"
95,21 Haridwar jail inmates found to be HIV positive,2017-12-25T11:28:39+05:30,"HARIDWAR: A recent survey conducted by the Uttarakhand State AIDS Control Society found 21 jail inmates of Haridwar district jail to be HIV positive. The Haridwar jail houses 1,175 prisoners, including 60 women, and samples were collected from all of them, including 450 undertrials, in July 2017.
 
 The jail administration on Sunday said that all the affected inmates are undertrials and most of them are accused in theft cases. The administration, however, added that the virus didn’t spread inside the jail and the undertrials were already affected.

 Jailor of Haridwar district jail, S M Singh, said, “The 21 male inmates, aged between 25 and 27, were already affected with HIV. However, they didn’t know that they were carrying the virus. Seven of the 21 are, at present, out on bail and 14 others are being treated by the AIDS control society. They are all small burglars and were arrested in various cases of thefts. All are uneducated and belong to poor families.”

 He added that most of them are drug addicts, and in all probability, they got infection through intravenous (IV) drug use.

 Meanwhile, the district administration has asked the jail authority to take proper measures in the matter. District magistrate Deepak Rawat said, “It is a serious matter and all possible steps are being taken to check the spread of the infection within the jail. Proper medical treatment is being administered to all the affected inmates. The narcotic bureau of Dehradun has also examined the report.”

 The use of IV drugs such as heroin, cocaine and crystal methamphetamines have increased in the past couple of years in Haridwar, especially in the slum areas of the district.

 Social worker Vishal Garg said, “IV drugs are easily available at every other medical store in Haridwar. The health department is also not taking any measures to curb the use and sale of the drugs. Earlier, mostly homeless youths used IV drugs but now youngsters living in the slums have also started buying these drugs, which is a major cause of HIV spread.”

 Amarjeet Singh, SHO of Jwalapur police station, said, “A packet of IV drugs is sold for Rs 250 and because of its easy availability and low cost people are buying it. We had recently taken action against two medical stores in Jwalapur area for selling intravenous drugs used by addicts. Three people were also arrested.” 
MS Nawaz
"
96,An ‘Austrian home’ for children with HIV/AIDS,2017-10-08T13:11:33+05:30,"JAIPUR: Austrian Magdalena Malzner celebrated her 50th birthday in Nevta area of Jaipur district on Saturday as proof of her special bonding with the Pink City.

The place where she celebrated the birthday was not a hotel but a care home for children living with HIV/AIDS. The building was constructed with funds Malzner raised over the past five years from Austria to give a permanent residence to 40-odd children, who lost their parents to HIV/AIDS. These children have been living rented homes for the past 12 years and forced to shift at least 15 times.

The birthday celebration was made special as the new building for the care home was inaugurated on the same day. “I will never forget this birthday,” Malzner told ToI.

Malzner raised 60,000 Euros on her own and persuaded an organisation called Karibu World, which chipped in with 60,000 Euros for the care home. “I raised 60,000 Euros and Karibu World also contributed an equal amount. Since Karibu World receives funds from the Austrian government, we can say that the government too helped in the construction of the building,” she said.

It was a challenging task for Malzner to raise funds in her country. “I faced problems initially. But then I showed them my presentation, why I was doing it and they developed trust in me,” said Malzner.

Malzner has a restaurant and also a shop in Hirschbach Im Mühlkreis, Oberosterreich, Austria. She also had many friends in the restaurant business. On her request, they agreed to donate amounts ranging from one Euro to five Euros per soup sold at theier establishments to Malzner.

“I also sold scarfs in Austria which I took from India. The margin I got was donated to for the cause. I also organised parties, including dance events and food festivals, and asked participants to contribute,” Malzner said.

She had first come to Jaipur in 2013 as a volunteer with an organisation to teach English to children in Katputli Nagar. “I came here in 2013 to do some community work for four weeks. It was not my aim to construct a building for such children. But, after spending four weeks in Kotpulti Nagar, I wanted to do more good work. So, I decided to work for these children,” said Malzner said, dressed in an Indian saree.

“The child welfare committee (CWC) has inspected the house and given permission for shifting the children,” said CWC member Nisha Pareek.

The children are being taken care of by the NGO, Aashray Care Home. “Our organisation was registered in 2006. Since then, we had to shift from at least 15 homes. It was difficult for us to get homes on rent for HIV children,” said, Sushila Mordiya, superintendent Aashray Care Home.


"
97,Most new HIV infections detected in 2016-17 were from Maharashtra,2017-08-23T07:14:57+05:30,"Mumbai: Maharashtra detected the highest number of new HIV infections among states in 2016-17, accounting for 16% of the country’s 1.84 lakh fresh cases. Among the infected were 1,567 newborns who probably didn’t get the preventive drugs on time, while 200 adults got the disease due to transfusion with infected blood.

This is the second year in a row when the state held on to the dubious distinction of reporting maximum cases after occupying the second and third positions through the last decade. Maharashtra, Andhra Pradesh and Karnataka were the only states to report 20,000-plus new infections in 2016-17.

RTI data obtained from the National Aids Control Organisation (NACO) showed while the state is recording a year-on-year decline, the rate is less than many other high-prevalence states. The state also reported the most mother-to-child transmissions in the country. In the last five years, at least 10,449 newborns got the infection despite the availability of the triple-drug regimen that cuts chances of transmission by 99%. 

Head of state-run JJ Hospital in Byculla, Dr Ashok Anand, said they have not delivered a single HIV-positive baby in the last three to four years. “Giving anti-retroviral to babies soon after birth as well as putting the mother on anti-retroviral therapy early has proved to be very effective,” he said. Chetan Kothari, who filed the RTI said, “It is shameful that even today babies are getting the deadly disease when drugs are readily available.” 

Parimal Singh, who heads the Maharashtra State Aids Control Society (MSACS), defended the programme and said not just mother-to-child transmission but HIV among general and high-risk populations has been on a decline. “It must be taken into consideration that we came to the top spot only after Andhra Pradesh was divided. As far as babies getting HIV is concerned, today HIV+ mothers are no longer afraid of giving birth and this is the programme’s achievement,” he said. MSACS’ data shows from 2009-10 when HIV positivity in general population was around 5.23%, it has dropped to less than 1% today. 

State’s public health minister Dr Deepak Sawant added Maharashtra is in a vulnerable position given the huge load of migration. Data also shows a dip in transmission of the disease among homosexuals, bisexuals and transgenders. A few stakeholders however contest intervention to contain HIV in the state has lost steam. Arup Mukherjee, secretary general of the Nagpur-based Indian Red Cross Society, said a fund crunch has been hampering the project for the last two years. “The attrition rate is huge as NGOs are struggling to pay salaries on time. Often testing kits are not available,” he said. Sawant said NACO is responsible for providing 75% of funds. “The state is doing its bit,” he said. 

Singh added Maharashtra and Mumbai are role models for their HIV control strategies. Of course, even after three decades, both the state and city remain hotbeds for the infection.

"
98,"HIV+ve man, 2 daughters end lives in Kushinagar district",2018-07-15T09:46:13+05:30,"GORAKHPUR: A man and his two daughters committed suicide in Barwalia Buzurg village under Kubersthan police station of Kushinagar district. 

Ramnath Singh (50) and his married daughter, Jyoti (21) had tested positive for HIV, while his second daughter Roli (12) had been unwell and Ramnath suspected that she was also HIV positive. On Saturday morning, villagers found the three hanging from the ceiling hook in their home and informed police.

SP Ashok Kumar Pandey, SDM Sadar Ajay Narayan Singh reached the spot along with police force and sent the bodies for post-mortem.

Ramnath Singh was HIV positive as was his wife who died few years ago. Jyoti got married this year but when her in-laws found that she was also HIV positive, they send her back to her father's house a month ago. 

""The facts will be known when we get post-mortem report,"" said SDM Sadar, Ajay Narayan Singh.


"
99,HIV patients celebrate festival with enthusiasm,2018-09-19T22:00:51+05:30,"Nashik: Yash Foundation and Mahindra Group held a special Ganeshotsav event for women and children suffering from HIV.More than 130 people, installed the idol, worshipped Lord Ganesha for six days and also participated in the immersion procession enthusiastically. Personalities from various walks of life from Nashik city visited this special Ganeshotsav event. This was the 8th year of the six-day Ganeshotsav that concluded on Tuesday evening. “Celebrating festivals together helps in developing a bond of companionship towards children living with the HIV. Such celebrations bring new ray of hope for them. It helps in rehabilitation as well as in treatment as it develops positivity,” said Ravi Patil, founder of Yash foundation. Patil said that the Ganeshotsav of Yash Foudnation has been receiving increasing response for the last eight years. “Not only kids, but people living with HIV from all ages, working women and members of our rehabilitation centre attend this celebrations. Number of social workers, doctors, professionals visiting our puja pandal and participating in processions is also increasing. This is a sign that people have started developing positive attitude towards AIDS patients,” he added. Members of Yash rehabilitation centre said that they enjoy this Ganeshotsav even more than the one at their native place. “I am here for eight years now. As I am earning now, my family is ready to welcome me, especially during festivals. But, I hardly visit them now. This rehabilitation centre has become my first home,” said one of the woman inmate of the rehabilitation centre.The rehabilitation centre has trained 56 HIV positive women in various skill-based professions. Many of them completed their education from the Yashwantrao Chavan Maharashtra Open University (YCMOU), and some of them jobs in various companies, schools and government departments. Some of them have started their own shops, stalls, while some have engaged themselves in social work."
100,"20,500 got HIV through blood transfusion in 11 years: Data",2018-02-10T07:40:27+05:30,"CHENNAI: A day after reporting how 21 people in Uttar Pradesh got infected with HIV due to use of unsafe medical device, 
TOI has sourced government records that show 20,592 people across the country contracted HIV due to blood transfusions since 2007.

National AIDS Control Organisation (Naco) data shows Gujarat has the largest number of HIV positive cases due to blood transfusion. In the state, which is above national average in terms of prevalence and seventh in the country in general prevalence, nearly one in every five cases reported is recorded as caused due to blood transfusion. Tamil Nadu, which stands 11th in general prevalence, has reported 1,134 cases due to blood transfusion, coming sixth in the category.





‘3rd gen testing kits slow in HIV detection, must upgrade’

The data is based on information provided by patients at Integrated Counselling and Testing Centres (ICTCs) run by the National AIDS Control Organisation (Naco). Experts said that there could be misreporting as patients tend to give blood transfusion as the reason to hide unsafe sex.

Doctors said a person could contract HIV through blood transfusion if the blood bank is not equipped with fourth generation (ELISA) testing kits.

“Third generation kits used in government health centreshave the ability todetect the infection only after 8-12 weeks. Fourth generation kitscan detectit as early as from the fourth week,” said Dr A Sathish Kumar from Solidarity and Action Against HIV Infection in India (SAATHI), an organisation working with HIV patients across the country.

There have been instances where individuals have donated blood without knowing that they are HIV positive. The fourth generation kit detects infections in thewindow period and blood donated by them can be rejected straight away, said a former AIDS Control Society Official. “Naco has been allocated close to ₹1,600 crore. Authorities should procure the latest testing kits,” he said.

Kerala has in January announced that these stateof-the-art devices would soon be installed in its hospitals after a nine-year-old tested positive for HIV after blood transfusion. Private labs equipped with latest kits and charge ₹300 - ₹1,000 for HIV screening.

"
101,Drastic reduction in mother-child HIV transfer cases,2017-12-08T11:44:24+05:30,"Ludhiana: HIV transfer cases from pregnant mother to child have decreased drastically to less than 5%, with awareness and fixed doze combination — a combination of three medicines — given in pregnancy to an HIV-positive mother from the time of diagnosis.

Dr US Sooch, district programme officer of HIV-AIDS prevention, said: “Imparting awareness to mothers to openly discuss their problems with doctors is helping a lot. As such mothers are motivated, they take medicines regularly, and the fixed dose is continued for a lifetime. When a baby is six weeks old, an HIV test is done. If it turns out to be negative, then the test is done again at six months, and again at 18 months if it is negative. If even after 18 months, the test comes out negative again, then the child is declared HIV-free. Now, if the test turns out positive in six weeks, then the medicine (single dose) is started, and after the HIV test at six months, if it is positive again, then a final test is done at 18 months, and if it is positive again, then the medicine is given for a lifetime.” 

Sooch further said that earlier, HIV positive women and children were given a single dose at the time of delivery. But now, the treatment is started in pregnancy itself, if the woman is declared HIV-positive, and the medicine for a pregnant mother is a fixed dose combination, but for a child, the single dose continues as earlier. So, less than 5% cases of transfer of disease from mother to child are found, whereas the rest 95% newborn are all safe. 

CURRENT TREATMENT 

Treatment during pregnancy: One tablet — a combination of three ARV (anti-retro viral) medicines — is given to a pregnant mother at night after meal. Treatment for HIV-positive mother is life-long. 

Test done for child/newborn: First at six weeks, then at six months, and then at 18 months. The medicine, however, is started right from birth itself.

Fall in number of cases: With this new fixed doze combination of medicines, chances of an HIV-positive child being born has come down from 10-20% to less than 5% where mothers took the treatment.


"
102,They home-deliver psychosocial and medical support to 600 HIV families,2017-12-28T02:11:20+05:30,"MUMBAI: When Shabina Khan found out in 2008 that she had HIV, she considered it a life sentence. The health of her husband, who was also HIV positive, was deteriorating. Doctors told her his death was imminent. So, the Bandra (E) reside-nt spent the next five months nu-rsing her bedridden husband, worrying about the HIV status of their three daughters and dipping into the family’s meagre financial reserves to fund their treatment. “I was sick of living,” recalls Khan. “I even tried committing suicide by drinking phenyl.” Khan agreed to TOI using her name and photo. 

That’s when another HIV patient who saw her crying directed her to Committed Communities Development Trust (CCDT), an organization committed to developing and implementing a home-based care programme for families living with HIV or AIDS. Today, the organization, which has been around since 1990, caters to 600 families across Mumbai by providing psychosocial, nutritional, educational, legal and medical support. “When we started this work, we found that lots of children with HIV positive parents were institutionalized because their parents could no longer work and look after them,” explains Poonam Patkar, who has been with CCDT for 10 years. “So, we decided to provide home-based care in order to strengthen the capacity of the family.” 

Khan was initially hesitant to approach CCDT fearing her privacy would be breached. But it turned out to be the best decision she’d made. “Since my husband was bedridden, I’d given up hope of continuing my children’s education in a good, private school,” she recalls. “But CCDT helped me with the fees.” They also took her husband to a hospital and got him treatment. It turned out his symptoms were more a result of tuberculosis than HIV. He’s now back at work. “People from my community wouldn’t help me because of the stigma surrounding my illness,” says Khan, “but CCDT took me in as one of their own.” 

CCDT teaches families about the importance of taking antiretroviral drugs regularly and what do in case a HIV positive family member gets a cut or has an open wound. “We give them a first aid kit and teach them to use gloves,” says Patkar. “If families can’t afford gloves, we tell them to use plastic bags.” They also provide information about treatments. For instance, Khan had no idea that government hospitals provided free antiretroviral treatment and used up all her savings at a private hospital. 

Most families that CCDT works with have a monthly income of about Rs 5,000-6,000 and are daily wagers. This makes CCDT’s nutritional kit of 13 items, including jaggery, peanuts, oil and soyabean, a godsend because it helps supplement their diet when they have to stay home from work because they aren’t feeling well.

To help patients recover hope after being diagnosed, CCDT has set up family support groups that meet every month. “When I joined CCDT’s support group I heard other people sharing their stories and after such a long time…I began to feel hopeful about the future,” CCDT quoted Khan as saying in a press release. Today, Khan wows her family with her sunny outlook and derives satisfaction from counselling new CCDT entrants, who are struggling with their diagnosis.


"
103,School life gets a little easier for HIV students,2017-08-08T03:09:02+05:30,"KOLKATA: State board students up to Class X, who stay with HIV-positive parents or carry the virus themselves, will now be classified as “belonging to (a) disadvantaged group”, which will make them eligible for all facilities that students belonging to Scheduled Castes or Tribes get under the Right to Education Act.

Students belonging to “disadvantaged groups” get a host of benefits, including reserved seats in institutions as well as grants, scholarships and hostel facilities.

The state government recently issued the notification to all heads of schools, affiliated to the West Bengal Board of Secondary Education, asking them to pass on the benefits of “disadvantaged group” students to HIV-positive parents’ children and HIV-positive children. 

Bengal joins other states, like Kerala, Puducherry, Goa, Punjab, Tamil Nadu and Karnataka, in following a Supreme Court directive asking state governments to consider issuing such a notification.

“The change of rules will ensure these students get the same facilities that SC, ST students and those classified under minority groups get under the provisions of the RTE Act, 2009. They will get government grants, reservation, scholarships and hostel facilities like the other disadvantaged students. The notification has already been sent to all WBBSE schools,” a senior school education department official said.

The SC order came after a Delhi-based NGO, working with HIV/AIDS patients, submitted that children living with HIV-positive parents or affected by HIV were suffering segregation and, in many cases, were being compelled to leave school even though there was zero risk of transmission of the disease. The apex court then asked state governments to consider issuing this notification.

“We got some cases, mainly from Howrah, South 24-Parganas and Murshidababd, where schools were under pressure from guardians of other students to ostracise HIV-positive students,” an official said.

A recent National Aids Control Organisation report says nearly 22,000 children in Bengal (out of the 1.45 lakh under-15 population) are suffering from HIV. “This number is huge and increasing. The government’s concern for these students will help them,” Subhashgram Nabatara Vidyalaya headmaster Anupam Roy said.


"
104,"‘Denied treatment’, HIV+ man goes on hunger strike",2017-12-06T08:21:56+05:30,"LUDHIANA: A 22-year-old HIV-positive youth went on a hunger strike at civil hospital on Tuesday morning after being “denied treatment for five days”. Soon, other HIV-positive patients, too, joined him to protest against the hospital staff.

Talking to the TOI, the youth said, “I had recently got an implant in my left leg, which was giving some trouble. When I went to Dr Davinder, orthopaedic surgeon of civil hospital, he refused to admit and treat me. He asked me to go back to my hometown in UP from where I got the implant.”

Dr US Sooch, district programme officer, HIV/ Aids prevention, said, “The patient came to me with a complaint and I told Dr Davinder to admit him. The patient also gave a complaint to Dr Meenu Singh, deputy director, Punjab State Aids Control Society. But he was not admitted.”

“It was only after I went on a hunger strike and an NGO, Dr Kotinis, offered help that the hospital admitted me,” the youth added. Dr Inderjit from NGO Dr Kotinis said, “The HIV-positive patient has been complaining for the past five days that he is being denied treatment. Left with no option, he went on a hunger strike and didn’t even take his HIV medicine. Then, the senior medical officer came and the patient was admitted. Many other HIV patients joined him in his protest and complained about doctors and nurses’ misbehaviour.”

The protest, which started at 10am, was called off at 2pm. While refuting the allegations, senior medical officer (SMO) Dr Kulwinder Singh said, “Dr Davinder gave him antibiotics for five days, and he was asked to come for further treatment after the dose. We had asked the patient for his medical records. As he could not give the records, he was asked to take treatment from the doctor who did the implant.

“He was never denied treatment. Every day so many HIV and hepatitis-C patients are treated, why will he be denied treatment? Moreover, he was checked in OPD and given antibiotics. But the patient wanted to be admitted, but we can’t do that unnecessarily.”

"
105,Aurobindo gets approval for HIV drug,2018-09-18T21:37:19+05:30,"HYDERABAD: City-based pharma player Aurobindo Pharma Limited on Tuesday said the company has received approval from the South African Health Products Regulatory Authority (SAHPRA) for its HIV drugs -- Dolutegravir, Lamivudine and Tenofovir Disoproxil Fumarate (DLT) tablets.


“Aurobindo is now among the first few companies which has received approval for this product. This approval demonstrates our commitment towards HIV patients and enables the company to participate in South African HIV tender as well as launch in the private market,” the company said in a release.

Prior to SAHPRA’s approval, Aurobindo received tentative approval for the drug from the US Food and Drug Administration and launched it in Sub-Saharan African markets.

"
106,New way to stop HIV in its tracks found,2017-12-04T16:39:58+05:30,"WASHINGTON: Researchers have discovered the protein that helps HIV to evade the body's defence system, an advance that may help stop the deadly virus in its tracks. When HIV-1 infects an immune cell, the virus travels to the nucleus so quickly there is not enough time to set off the cell's alarm system.

Now, researchers at Loyola University Chicago in the US have discovered the protein that helps the virus travel so fast. The researchers found that without this protein, the virus became stranded in the cytoplasm, where it was detected by the viral defence system.

""By preventing its normal movement, we essentially turned HIV-1 into a sitting duck for cellular sensors,"" said Edward M Campbell, an associate professor at Loyola University Chicago Stritch School of Medicine. HIV-1 infects and kills immune system cells, including T cells and macrophages that were used in the study.

This cripples the immune system, making the patient vulnerable to common bacteria, viruses and other pathogens that are usually harmless in people with healthy immune systems.

After HIV-1 enters a cell, it has to work its way through the cytoplasm to the nucleus. Once inside the nucleus, HIV-1 takes control of the cell and makes additional HIV-1 copies. However, getting through the cytoplasm is not easy. Cytoplasm consists of fluid that is thick with proteins and structures such as mitochondria.

""Something the size of a virus cannot just diffuse through the cytoplasm,"" said Campbell, corresponding author of the study published in the journal PNAS. ""It would be like trying to float to the bathroom in a very crowded bar. You need to have a plan,"" said Campbell.

HIV-1 is able to get to the nucleus quickly via tubular tracks called microtubules. The virus attaches itself to a molecular motor called dynein, which moves down the microtubule like a train car on tracks.

Campbell and colleagues discovered the ""ticket"" HIV-1 needs to get on the train - a protein called bicaudal D2. HIV-1 binds to bicaudal D2, which recruits the dynein molecular motor. The dynein then transports HIV-1 towards the nucleus.

The finding raises the possibility of developing a drug that would prevent HIV-1 from binding to bicaudal D2, thus stranding the virus in the cytoplasm. This would not only prevent infection but also give the cell time to turn on antiviral genes that would protect it and neighbouring cells from infection. 

"
107,HIV directly impacts brain in early stages: Study,2017-12-01T17:34:19+05:30,"JOHANNESBURG: Human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) directly impacts the brain in the early stages of the infection, according to a study.

It has long been known that many people with HIV also experience negative cognitive symptoms, such as depression and forgetfulness, researchers said.

However, it was unclear whether it was caused by such patients' physical illness, or whether the virus had a direct effect on the brain, they said.

""Our research shows that HIV does have an impact on the brain and that these low-grade cognitive symptoms are likely not just function loss due to patients feeling sick, tired or depressed,"" said Stefan du Plessis, from Stellenbosch University (SU) in South Africa.

Using functional magnetic resonance imaging (fMRI) technique, researchers compared the brain activity of people with HIV to those without HIV while they performed certain tasks designed to stimulate specific regions of the brain.

HIV-positive study participants were in good physical and mental health, did not abuse drugs, and had not yet started on antiretroviral treatment (ART).

The researchers found that these participants had a decreased blood flow in the striatal region of the brain while performing tasks involving higher motor functions.

They also observed little action and blood flow to the nucleus accumbens of HIV-positive patients while performing a task involving a monetary reward.

This section of the brain is involved with aspects concerning motivation, apathy and enthusiasm for life.

""The fMRI scans show how the HI virus affects important parts of the brain involved with motivation,"" said Du Plessis, lead author of the research published in the journal AIDS.

""We theorise that this could happen to such an extent that patients are often simply not motivated enough to take their medication, or even get out of bed,"" he said. 

"
108,HIV stigma keeps off students from aganwadi,2017-11-29T08:27:09+05:30,"KANNUR: The world is prepares to observe the 'AIDS Day' on December 1 in order to extend solidarity to people who are HIV positive and instil awareness about the disease in the society, but the stigma associated with the disease remains.

Take the case of a woman from Mayyil panchayat in Thrissur who has been facing discrimination just because her husband has been tested positive for HIV.

According to the woman, whose identity has not been disclosed, ever since her husband has been tested positive for HIV more than one and a half year ago, she has been facing ostracism and the local residents have not been sending their kids to the anganwadi, where she works. Though the authorities have permitted her to work there, she has been finding it difficult to tackle discrimination, the woman said.

Mayyil panchayat president P Balan, admitted that despite repeated efforts parents have been reluctant to send their children to the anganwadi. ""The panchayat and the AIDS Control Society have taken steps to sensitise people and make them aware that nobody gets infected by physical contact with an HIV infected person. Moreover, it has not been confirmed whether she has been infected or not,"" he said.

District collector Mir Muhammed Ali said the authorities have been trying to find an amicable solution instead of making a hasty decision, and added that it was unfortunate that a literate and progressive society was reinforcing discrimination towards those tested positive for AIDS.

""First of all, we cannot force her to undergo a medical examination to confirm whether she has been infected. At the same time, we have to operate the anganwadi. We are planning to appoint an additional staff and retain her,"" said the collector at a press conference in connection with the World AIDS Day.

Such cases reflect the society's attitude and cannot be approved, said district panchayat president K V Sumesh, who urged the authorities to take initiatives to sensitise the society.

On the World AIDS Day, the department has been planning to strengthen awareness campaigns, said deputy DMO A T Manoj, nodal officer of HIV related activities in the district. He said all efforts would be taken to convince the woman to undergo a medical examination to ascertain whether she has been infected, so that she could be provided medical support.

""We want to make sure she faces no discrimination but what is even more important is to provide her medical assistance in case she has been infected with the virus. But for that she has to voluntarily come forward to undergo the medical examination. Hence, we are in the process of providing her counselling apart from sensitizing the society,"" he said.

District medical officer (DMO) K Narayana Nayak claimed stigma attached to the disease has been slowly coming down as also fresh cases of infection.

"
109,French film on HIV bags top honours,2017-11-29T06:43:36+05:30,"PANAJI: Beats Per Minute, a French film by Robin Campilo, was declared winner of the Golden Peacock at the closing ceremony of the 48th International Film Festival of India. The film, which also won a cash purse of Rs 40 lakh, narrates the story of activists in 1990s France, fighting to draw government’s attention to the HIV/AIDS stricken. The best actor (male), which carries a Silver Peacock and prize money of Rs 10 lakh, also went to the film’s lead, Nahuel Perez Biscayart.

 Malayalam language film Take Off, was the other production that emerged a big winner, taking home a Silver Peacock each for special jury award and best actor (female) for the lead, Parvathy. The special jury award was handed to the director Mahesh Narayanan along with a cash prize of Rs 15 lakh.

Take Off tells of the plight of nurses from Kerala stuck in war-torn Iraq in 2014. “I dedicate the award to all the nurses from Kerala serving in war-torn regions. They should be respected as much as our armymen are,” Narayanan said. 

Beats Per Minute and Take Off beat 13 other films from across the world to win the awards, chosen by the international jury headed by Muzzafar Ali.

Accepting the Lifetime Achievement Award, which carries a scroll and cash prize of Rs 10 lakh, legendary Canadian filmmaker Atom Egoyan, said, “You have no idea how the cinema of India has influenced my career. I accept this award in the spirit of friendship between the two countries—India and Canada. We have a huge huge Indian community in Canada.”

Vivian Qu won the best director award, which carries a cash prize of Rs 15 lakh and Silver Peacock, for the Chinese film, Angels Wear White on child sexual abuse. The award for best debut feature film went to Kiro Russo for his Bolivia-Qatar film, Dark Skull. The award includes a cash prize of Rs 10 lakh. 

“I am nervous but honoured to win this award,” said Manoj Kadam, after his Marathi film Kshitij—A Horizon bagged the prestigious ICFT-Unesco Gandhi Medal for having a strong ethical component and artistic excellence, beating eight other films. 

Salman Khan, Akshay Kumar, Karan Johar, Katrina Kaif, Sushant Singh Rajput, Sidharth Malhotra and Papon were among the others celebrities at the closing ceremony, performing and presenting awards.


"
110,Kerala opts for latest Elisa test kit for HIV detection,2018-01-29T09:40:22+05:30,"THIRUVANANTHAPURAM: Kerala State AIDS Control Society (KSACS) has decided to go with 4th generation Elisa test, instead of nucleic acid-based test, to detect HIV in the window period. A study conducted by the society has found that the Elisa test was more effective than nucleic test.

HIV screening had become a matter of concern following the detection of the virus in a kid, who underwent blood transfusion at Regional Cancer Centre. Now, National AIDS Control Organisation has informed that it would supply Elisa test kits to the state.

""For the time being, we have supplied enough kits to all government medical college hospitals and Regional Cancer Centre. Moreover, Kerala State Medical Services Corporation (KMSCL) has also been asked to procure the kits, which will be supplied to all the blood banks and hospitals with blood banks,'' said Dr R Ramesh, managing director of KSACS.

As per the study, in the nucleic test the virus could not be detected even for a week after the blood is collected. ""But Elisa test gives more accurate result even during the first one week window period,'' said Dr Ramesh.

In the past one year, KSACS collected 4 lakh blood units, of which 300 were detected with HIV using the third generation Elisa test. ""In the past four years, we might have collected about 25 lakh blood units and only in one case it has gone undetected (in the RCC incident). Hence our testing facilities are accurate. With this 4th generation test, we can assure 100% safety and accuracy,'' he pointed out.

Now, KSACS has decided to go for a wide-spread campaign for voluntary blood donation since it is the only safe way for collecting the blood units. 

""We have achieved only 60% in voluntary blood donation and the remaining is still replacement blood donation. The latter is always risky,'' he said.

Catch 25, a campaign to encourage youths in the age group 18 to 25 for voluntary blood donation will be launched by KSACS. 

""We have found that most of high-risk groups are above 30 years and hence it would be safe if we could promote voluntary blood donation among youngsters below 25 years,'' said Dr Ramesh.


"
111,Extra marital affairs spike HIV cases,2017-11-23T09:02:39+05:30,"TRICHY: Incidence of people tested positive for HIV has witnessed a major change in Trichy. Going by the Data of District Aids Prevention and Control Unit (DAPCU), of late, there has been an increase in cases between the age group of 40 to 49 years. Experts say the major reason for the change in trend in the viral disease is due to extramarital affairs. 

District Program Manager (DPM) of DAPCU, Trichy Dr SM Manivannan says, “The trend has changed after 2011. Analysis shows that the trend is a consequence of illicit affairs among married people. But on the whole, the prevalence of HIV-AIDS is declining.”

Earlier, the incidence was prevalent among people in the age group of 30 to 39 years, due to the unawareness of the high risk behavior groups - Female Sex Workers (FSW), Men Sex with Men (MSM) and transgender (TG). “HIV positive was high among the risk behavior groups, but after 2011 the trend declined and common people too have been tested positive,” said Dr Manivannan.

Stating that the number of infected people is under control in Trichy district, the DPM said that currently 5,500 people were on Anti-Retroviral Therapy (ART) treatment here. The number included FSW, MSM, TG and normal people.

Few years ago, there was a panic among HIV-infected people that the viral infection was the end of their life. Now, doctors term it as a chronically manageable disease. “If a patient is regularly on ART, the life expectancy of the patient will not decrease,” said Dr R Sharmila at ART Centre inside Mahatma Gandhi Memorial Government Hospital (MGMGH). ART is a tablet which was prescribed to those who had CD4 count below 300. However, the tablet has been made available to all infected people irrespective of their CD4 count. 

“The regular follow-up on patients and intake of ART tablet increases the longevity of the patients. If anyone was missing out on treatment, the Target Intervention (TI)-NGOs will keep track of them and bring them back on track for treatment,” he said.


"
112,Provide jobs to people with HIV/AIDS: CM to companies,2017-12-02T13:26:38+05:30,"PUDUCHERRY: Chief minister of Puducherry V Narayanasamy on Friday asked industries and commercial establishments in the Union territory to provide jobs to people affected with HIV/AIDS, so that they take active part in the society without facing discrimination.

In his message on the occasion of World AIDS Day, he said due to the strenuous efforts taken by the Puducherry AIDS Control Society (PACS), the Centre had declared Puducherry as a Union territory with low prevalence of HIV or AIDS.

Narayanasamy said Puducherry government was providing a monthly financial assistance of Rs 1,500 to children and adults suffering from HIV or AIDS.PTI


"
113,Children’s home guard not guilty of sodomising HIV+ boy,2018-11-15T03:02:02+05:30,"NEW DELHI: Terming it a “classic” and “unsolved” mystery, the Delhi high court acquitted a security guard of a children’s home of the charge of repeatedly sodomising a minor orphan boy who is HIV positive.


Justice C Hari Shankar reversed the trial court’s verdict awarding 10-year jail to the accused, saying it would be a ""travesty of justice"" to convict him of having committed such an “unsolved” crime. The high court, in its 69-page judgement, noted that while the child was HIV positive, accused Amardeep Kujur tested negative and noted that there were allegations that the child was sexually assaulted multiple times. It underlined that the possibility of non-transmission of the HIV virus to the accused would be remote and disagreed with the trial court’s finding that it was not necessary that the HIV virus would, in every case of sexual contact, be transmitted from partner to partner.

Justice Shankar observed that the trial judge “ignored the above two facts, apparent from the evidence, i.e., firstly, that the child had suffered mucosal tears in the private parts and, secondly, that the man was alleged to have repeatedly sexually assaulted the child. Sexual contact is, it is well known, the primary mode by which HIV virus is transmitted.”

In the judgement, the high court said the mystery of how the assaulter entered the room where the minor was sleeping, and sodomised him day after day, remained unanswered. “The situation, in the present case, remains a classic, and unsolved ‘locked room mystery’, even while the man stands convicted and sentenced (by the trial court). This is entirely impermissible in law,” HC noted.

While the child's father was in jail, his mother had died of HIV and, as there was not nobody to look after him, he was sent to the children home for boys.


"
114,"Prison inmates to be screened for HIV, TB",2018-09-09T09:03:07+05:30,"TRICHY: The prison department has decided to screen all prison inmates for HIV and tuberculosis and has signed a memorandum of understanding (MoU) with social welfare department and the Tamil Nadu AIDS Control Society as part of the national programme. 


In Trichy, the initiative will cover Trichy Central Prison, Special Prison for Women and nine sub-jails under the control of the central prison.

Officials from the health department said that though the prevalence of HIV and TB is not high among inmates in the prisons in Trichy, since they are considered to be a special group and vulnerable to diseases, the initiative would check the spread of the diseases. 

Sources from the department said that around six inmates in Trichy prisons are HIV positive, while around five have TB. Such prisoners are put-up in separate cell blocks. While there are 1,263 inmates in central prison currently, around 70 are in special prison for women and 75 in sub-jails. Three medical officers are deputed to central prison and two for women’s prison, while doctors from the respective primary health centres inspect the inmates in sub-jails. 

Trichy programme manager of district aids prevention and control unit (DAPCU), Dr S Martin Manivannan, said that the main goal behind the initiative is to spread awareness about HIV and TB among prisoners and curb the spread of diseases within the prison and after their release. “We would give sensitisation programmes to inmates on possibilities on spread of HIV. Apart from this, tests would be done for those with HIV symptoms so that they are given timely treatment,” he said.

Deputy director of medical services, TB control, Dr S Savithri told TOI that sputum samples of all the inmates with TB symptoms would be collected over the next few days and cartridge-based nucleic acid amplification test (CBNAAT) would be performed to detect TB. 


"
115,Fight stigma against people with HIV: CM Pinarayi Vijayan,2017-12-02T11:56:15+05:30,"THIRUVANANTHAPURAM: Chief minister Pinarayi Vijayan has urged everyone to join the global conversation to raise awareness about HIV. ""HIV is one of the most destructive pandemics in the history of humanity. Millions of people are infected with HIV worldwide. 

The search for an HIV vaccine has been so far unsuccessful, but recent advancements in the field have renewed hope in defeating this fatal illness,"" said the chief minister in a statement issued here on Friday on the occasion of World AIDS Day.

He said World AIDS Day was an opportunity to show solidarity with the millions of people who were living with the disease. 

""It is also a time to fight against the stigma prevailing in the society. Let us pledge on this AIDS day that we will not indulge in actions or thoughts that will make life more difficult for the victims, he added.

Health minister K K Shylaja, who inaugurated the state-level World AIDS Day observance said the society should be compassionate towards the HIV positive people. The government was striving hard to bring these people back to the mainstream and ensure a proper rehabilitation of them, he said.

The minister said all these would succeed only if the society also supports these patients and give them the confidence to come back to normal life. 

"
116,"459 HIV patients, 10 deaths but no therapy centre in city",2017-12-02T02:20:10+05:30,"NOIDA: While the number of HIV-infected patients in Gautam Budh Nagar has reached 459 in 2017 and as many as 10 deaths from AIDS reported in the past five years, the district still lacks an antiretroviral therapy (ART) centre. 

Patients who go to neighbouring Ghaziabad for ART treatment say all the sampling facilities are not available there. An ART facility in GB Nagar district hospital in Sector 30 was closed in 2014 after a centre was opened in Ghaziabad’s MMG Hospital. ART is an effective treatment of HIV patients which slows down the rate of the virus copying itself, using a combination of several anti-retroviral medicines.

Absence of all sampling facilities and only one designated day in a week for screening at MMG Hospital, patients from GB Nagar often go to Lal Bahadur Shastri Hospital (LBSH) in Delhi.

“We do not have too many HIV patients in the district and since, Ghaziabad is the nearest district, it was considered that it can cater to the neighbouring districts of Gautam Budh Nagar and Hapur too. In case, the patients feel that the facility in the neighbouring district requires to be enhanced, we will write to the state government through the senior officials about it,” said additional chief medical officer Shireesh Jain.

According to India HIV/AIDS Alliance, which is working on two projects, including Wajood and Samarth, to help the LGBT community in NCR fight with the high prevalence of the infection, it has identified as many as 36 people from the community infected with HIV at their own screening centre.

“We have screened as many as 36 HIV patients from our community after which they underwent a test at the integrated counselling and testing centre (ICTC) of the district hospital in Sector 30. However, they require as many as 11 more tests till their ART treatment is prescribed by a doctor,” Deepak Kumar, chief manager (UP and NCR), Samarth, told TOI.

“For the crucial CD4 count (test for measuring the CD4 cells in the blood) on which the number of medicines provided under the ART treatment depends, is available at the MMG Hospital once a week. However, patients are not ready to go to Ghaziabad due to the distance, they usually prefer to go to Delhi,” he said.

When contacted, Dr JK Tyagi, chief medical superintendent, MMG Hospital, said while the hospital has staff to see around 400 patients, they have around 1,300 patients undergoing treatment at the centre. 

“We have written to the state government multiple times to increase the staff strength so that the number of days for examination be increased,” he said.


"
117,HIV-infected kids being cured by traditional medicines: Former min,2017-11-30T05:30:00+05:30,"Mysuru: Ananta Bharatha Charitable Trust chairman and former minister S A Ramdas said HIV-infected children were being cured by practicing ayurveda, yoga, agnihotra, siddha and traditional medicines.

At a press meet here on Wednesday, Ramdas said the trust, in association with Asare Foundation, is treating HIV-infected children at its research centre ‘Amma Mane’.

“Due to the treatment provided at the centre, children’s health is improving. They have also increased their food consumption to around 400 grams. Their blood samples will be sent to Veda Research Centre in London for examination,” he said.

Ramdas said the HIV-infected children usually wake up around 4.30 am and practice yogasana, agnihotra and prayers. Later, they are given food made of millets (siridhanya). The treatment goes on for five years, but results can be seen within three years, he said.

On the Chamundi Hills trek which has been organised by various organisations at 6.30 am on December 1, he said: “Around 20 children from Amma Mane along with other children will participate in the trek. They will visit the temple and pray for good health of all the children.”


"
118,HIV-infected Thailand man accused of raping scores of teenagers,2018-11-09T10:12:05+05:30,"BANGKOK: Police in Thailand have arrested an HIV-infected soldier who allegedly blackmailed and raped more than 70 teenage boys.


Police said in a statement they received a complaint that the suspect was using fake social media profiles on Facebook and the gay dating app Blued to win the trust of his victims so they would send him nude photos before agreeing to meet him. When they found out he was not who he pretended to be online, he would threaten to make their nude photos public if they refused to have sex with him.

Police Lt. Col. Nacharot Kaewpetch said the police discovered medicine for treating HIV when they arrested the 43-year-old suspect, Sgt. Maj. Jakkrit Khomsing, at his home Wednesday in the northeastern province of Khon Kaen. They said tests confirmed he was infected with HIV.

So far police have determined that Jakkrit had more than 70 victims between the ages of 13 and 18.

""Even though the suspect is a soldier, this behavior and I've consulted with army commanders is a personal issue, not an organizational one,'' police Maj. Gen. Surachate Hakparn said.

Police said they are widening their investigation and attempting to contact other victims who have not yet filed charges.

Police have so far charged Jakkrit with six offenses, including sex with a minor under 15 with or without their consent, punishable by 4-20 years in prison; indecent assault of a minor under 15 using threats, punishable by up to 10 years in prison; separating a minor under 15 from their parents without reason, punishable by 3-15 years in prison; blackmail, punishable by up to 3 years in prison; and coercing minors to conduct inappropriate acts, punishable by up to three months in prison.

"
119,HIV positive man gets 10 years in jail for raping stepdaughter,2018-11-04T11:51:04+05:30,"SURAT : A local court convicted a 52-year-old man for raping his minor stepdaughter for six years and sentenced him to 10 years in jail on Saturday. The convict is HIV-positive and unemployed. He used to rape the girl when her mother went to work. The minor girl has not contracted HIV despite being raped by an infected person from 2008 to 2014 in their house in Sachin area of the city. The convict had divorced his wife to get married to the rape survivor’s mother. 


He started raping the girl when she was a student of class VI. The girl’s mother was forced to work to support the family because the convict was unemployed. She used to do textile- related job work at home and then went out to sell textile products. The woman’s younger son used to be in school when the convict raped his stepdaughter. He threatened her if she told anyone about it. The girl did not complain to her mother until November 25, 2014 when the convict slapped her alleging that she was having an affair with a man. The girl told her mother that the convict has been raping her since 2008 when she was 10-year-old. The girl’s mother took help of a social worker and approached police, who after registration of the complaint arrested the man and sent him to jail.

“The 52-year-old man was convicted for raping his minor stepdaughter and sentenced to 10 years in jail. The convict is an AIDS patient. Fortunately, the infection has not been transmitted to the girl,” public prosecutor Digant Tewar said. 


"
120,‘AIDS is no longer a death sentence’,2017-02-15T11:19:08+05:30,"A lot of queries, myths, stigma surround HIV/AIDS. The human immuno-deficiency virus is still considered synonymous with death. There are around 35 million HIV positive people in the world and around 50% of them are unaware that they are positive, according to WHO. In 1986, the first AIDS patient surfaced in India. Padmashree Dr Kutikuppala Surya Rao, a noted general physician and HIV/AIDS doctor replies to frequently-asked questions regarding HIV-AIDS. 


Is HIV and AIDS one and the same?

HIV is the name of the causative agent Human Immuno-deficiency Virus. When a person is HIV positive, it means he/she is lodging the virus. AIDS is the disease and manifestation of HIV infection over a period of being infected with the virus.


By merely looking at people can we identify or say that someone has HIV/AIDS? 

No, not possible. Normally, there are no visible signs of HIV/AIDS. Some persons develop HIV symptoms shortly after being infected. Moreover, the first indication of HIV, including fever, fatigue and muscle aches, flu like symptoms may only last for a few days or weeks. For others, it can take up to 10 to 12 years for symptoms to appear during which period they look totally fit. But they can infect their sexual partners and others via blood contact. This asymptomatic phase is very dangerous in spreading the infection silently. Hence, it is very tough to know if someone has HIV without being properly tested clinically or conducting relevant blood tests. Still is HIV a death sentence? No, not at all. That fear was in early ’80s. With appropriate medical care and treatment, positive people can have a normal life span of 75 years. Since 1995-96, with the advent of highly active antiretroviral therapy (HAART), a person with HIV can expect to live a normal life span, so long as they take the advised HIV medicines. Now, positive persons can go for marriage as the latest advanced therapy can prevent 98 to 99 percent of HIV transmission from positive husband to negative wife and vice-versa.

What’s the survival chance now with HIV/AIDS?

As a result of advanced researches in AIDS treatment, now the patients can be given a substantial life and death can be postponed dramatically. The average life expectancy of AIDS patients on a quality treatment is around 71.5 years. It is also proved that impact of starting Antiretroviral Therapy (ART) late would end up to 15 years reduced life expectancy.

Does every HIV case lead to AIDS?
HIV is the infection that causes AIDS. But it doesn’t mean that all HIV-positive individuals will essentially develop AIDS. With current available advanced therapies, if a positive person consults HIV experts promptly after HIV diagnosis, HIV infection can be controlled and kept low, maintaining a healthy immune system for a long time and thereby preventing opportunistic infections and ending in the stage of AIDS.

If someone is tested negative for HIV soon after sexual exposure with a positive partner or accidental blood contact of a positive source, can they have unprotected sex? 

No, because it takes about six weeks to three months to test positive for conventional antibody tests usually based on the source of exposure and the level of viral loads. This is called window period during which also potentially they are infectious. RNA PCR /DNA PCR and fourth generation tests can detect the virus earlier even after 72 hours. Therefore, timing is important to detect the virus after exposure and the type of the test asked for.

When both partners are HIV positive, should they practice safe sex? 

Yes, they have to use a condom as there are different HIV strains. Say wife has HIV- 1 and husband has HIV-2 or wife has sub type C and husband has sub type B, by having unprotected sex the possibilities of mixed infections and complications escalate and possibilities of drug resistance enhance.


When is the right time to start ART drugs?

It’s recommended by WHO to start ART irrespective of CD4 counts once a person is confirmed HIV positive. There’s a great risk of excess mortality due to delay in initiation of ART after HIV diagnosis. However, still there is controversy on when to offer anti-retroviral therapy.


What is PrEP? 

PrEP (pre-exposure prophylaxis) is a medication that can prevent HIV infection in advance. Several studies found that it is effective at preventing HIV infections. However, it doesn’t protect against other sexually transmitted diseases or infections and protection is recommended. The pill approved by the US Food and Drug Administration (FDA) for daily use as PrEP for people at very high risk of getting HIV infection is called Truvada, which is a combination of two HIV medications (tenofovir and emtricitabine). 


Can HIV positive couple beget HIV negative children?

Yes, with the advent of HAART (Highly Active Antiretroviral Therapy) positive couples who are planning to have a child can have 99.99% negative children provided they are under the guidance of an expert/ART centre. To prevent mother-to-child vertical transmission, appropriately administering ART is universally accepted.

What’s the latest research related to HIV cure and HIV vaccine?
Stem cell therapy and gene therapy are now being pursued actively by global scientists towards HIV cure.

"
121,"After WHO approval, India to evaluate allowing HIV self-test",2016-12-01T10:52:46+05:30,"The World Health Organisation (WHO) for the first time has recommended HIV self-testing in the privacy of one's home using HIV kit, a move that may result in a major breakthrough in HIV treatment by improving access to diagnosis. Though India now does not allow HIV self-test, the UN agency's guidance has even prompted the health ministry here to evaluate the proposal.

“We will certainly look at WHO's recommendations and evaluate how it can be adopt ed,“ said C K Mishra, secretary to the health ministry.

The move assumes significance as the lack of HIV diagnosis is a major obstacle to reducing the burden of the infection worldwide because it hinders the government and public health agency to offer anti-retroviral therapy or other treatment options to those suffering from the disease.

Estimates show around 87% of HIV-infected people in India are not even aware that they are suffering from the disease and may be unknowingly spreading the virus. Globally , around 40% of all people with HIV or over 14 million remain unaware of their status.

Self-testing will be particularly relevant for those people who may find it difficult to access testing in clinical settings and might prefer self-testing as their method of choice.

HIV self-test can be done by individuals by using oral fluid or blood-finger-pricks to discover their status in a private and convenient setting. Results of the test can be seen within 20 minutes or less.Those with positive results are advised to seek confirmatory tests at health clinics. WHO recommends they receive information and links to counselling as well as rapid referral to prevention, treatment and care services. A senior official said, India may initially adopt the UN agency's suggestions for self-testing among high risk communities where the incidence and chances of spread is higher. “Millions of people with HIV are still missing out on life-saving treatment, which can also prevent HIV transmission to others,“ said Dr Margaret Chan, director-general, WHO. “HIV selftesting should open the door for many more people to know their HIV status and find out how to get treatment and access prevention services.“

Estimates by National Aids Control Organization, which works under the ministry of health and family welfare, show over 2.2 crore people were tested during 2013-14, of which 2,40,234 people were found HIV positive. In 2015, the total number of people living with HIV in India were estimated at 21.17 lakh, whereas 86,000 new cases were found.Though incidence of HIV in India has declined substantially since 2000 by around 66%, lack of accessibility to testing and the stigma attached to HIV poses a challenge for uptake of HIV diagnosis.


"
122,Steady drop in HIV positive cases,2016-11-30T11:21:33+05:30,"NASHIK: The overall awareness about HIV/AIDS is reflecting in the drop in the number of HIV positive cases in the district. This year, only 0.68% people tested out of the total suspected cases at various government medical facilities across Nashik district were diagnosed HIV positive. 

Officials of the District AIDS Prevention and Control Unit (DAPCU) said the graph of HIV positive rate has shown a steady decline over the past seven-eight years. They attributed the drop to the rising awareness among people about HIV infection and the facilities available at various government centres. 

Yogesh Pardeshi, district programme officer of DAPCU, said, “Earlier, there used to be special private care centres for HIV positive cases. Over the years, the need of such centres is no longer felt as the people are directly admitted to the government facility for further treatment. The stigma attached to the disease is also fast vanishing.”

He said HIV testing facilities were available at the two general hospitals, four sub-divisional hospitals, 24 rural hospitals and 104 public health centres, urban health hubs, four corporation hospitals, various sub-centres and council hospitals in the district. 

Over the past few years, DAPCU has increased the rate of checking people and pregnant women. 

“The general client testing has been witnessing the drop since 2009, when the rate of HIV positive cases was 4.50%. It dropped to 1.60% in 2012 and 1% in 2014. In 2015, the rate was 0.77%,” he said. 

Even the HIC positivity rate among women has been on a decline since 2006. This year, till October-end, DAPCU has recorded only 0.03% HIV positive women from the total 1,18, 211 checked. 

Nonetheless, six HIV positive babies were identified this year compared to three such instances in 2015. Pardeshi said a new programme has been launched, wherein an HIV positive pregnant woman is immediately brought under treatment that eliminates the chances of transmission of the disease do the baby during pregnancy, delivery or breast feeding. 

“The check on babies is done only after 18 months of birth. The new medication programme was started in 2014 and we will start finding the results from this year. We are hoping for a zero-HIV- infection transfer from the mother to the child,” an official added.


"
123,"In 2018’s first trimester, 1 HIV+ person detected per day",2018-06-04T10:07:25+05:30,"PANAJI: Ninety-two people tested positive for the human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) in Goa in the first three months of 2018, translating into one case being detected each day. This is a significant improvement from a decade ago, when over two HIV+ cases were recorded per day.




While men constituted 60% of the total number of HIV+ cases in the first trimester of this year, no transgenders and transsexuals were detected with the condition for the second year in a row. 

Mormugao continued to be the taluka with the highest number of HIV+ cases (27%), while Salcete came in second at 16%. Bardez, the taluka that had in the past years reported the second-highest and, sometimes, highest number of HIV+ cases in the state, accounted for only six of the total cases in the first three months of 2018. No new cases were reported from Sattari, Sanguem and Canacona.

The predominant mode of transmission of HIV has continued to be the sexual route, with over 90% of such cases reported. Transmission modes involving infected syringes, needles, blood and blood products have been negligible in the state.

Although five deaths due to acquired immune deficiency syndrome (AIDS) were reported in January and February this year, chief medical officer of the Goa State AIDS Control Society (GSACS), Dr Chandrakant Parab, said the launch of the ‘test and treat’ policy last April is expected to reduce the number of AIDS-related deaths further. Under the policy, anyone diagnosed as an HIV+ patient is put on antiretroviral therapy (ART), irrespective of the clinical stage or CD4 count—a snapshot of how the patient’s immune system is functioning. In the past, ART, which suppresses the activity of the HIV retrovirus, was recommended only in cases where it was considered necessary.

Since the implementation of the ‘test and treat’ policy, more than 370 HIV+ persons have been put on ART in a phased manner in the state. 

“ART, which can slow down the rate at which HIV weakens the immune system, is now administered to everybody: Men, women, adolescents and children,” Parab said, pointing out that the move is expected to keep their immune system strong and healthy and improve their longevity and quality of life. 

Parab said the elimination of stigma is vital to ensure that people who have the slightest doubt of their status voluntarily come forward to get tested and seek treatment. “Those indulging in risky behaviour must also protect themselves, as HIV is 100% preventable,” he added.


"
124,50-bed facility for HIV positive people in Bihar,2018-10-13T11:42:49+05:30,"PATNA: The state health department on Friday signed a non-financial memorandum of understanding (MoU) with a Spain based Médecins Sans Frontières (MSF) to run a 50-bed hospital in Patna for people detected HIV positive.

Under its ‘Integrated care of complex opportunistic infectious diseases’ project, the MSF will set up the facility at Guru Gobind Singh hospital in Patna. The state health department has provided the space for that while the MSF will bear all its logistic and staff cost.

The state government will provide only the required policy and administrative support for the smooth functioning of the state-of-the-art facility.

“There is no dedicated centre in Bihar to provide holistic care (medical, psychological, nutritional and palliative care) for HIV positive people. The immune system in HIV positive people weakens and they are at risk for opportunistic infections (OIs). Bihar government is committed to providing special care for HIV and comorbidity treatment in the state,” a health department official said.

He said the partnership is expected to develop the capacity to treat immunocompromised people in the state with opportunistic infections. “The main purpose of the collaboration is to provide holistic care for severe infectious diseases in immunocompromised conditions. With this new initiative, the institute at Guru Gobind Singh hospital will become a centre of excellence in the state,” the official said.


"
125,UP asks Centre to revive HIV counsellors training stopped since 2014,2017-02-24T17:03:15+05:30,"LUCKNOW: An evaluation of counselling services under the National Aids Control Programme has revealed that no refresher training for counsellors has taken place since April, 2014. There was no induction training for newly appointed counsellors either. 

Meanwhile, 180 new integrated counselling and training centres have come up in the state. Staff engaged in these centres is first posted at established anti-retro viral therapy (ART) centres so that they are be initiated to the nature of work. 

The review was undertaken by director of UP State Aids Control Society Alok Kumar in the wake of the suicide by a young couple reportedly depressed over their HIV positive status. The couple were diagnosed at ART centre of King George’s Medical University between February 11 and 15. They committed suicide on February 21. 

“The government has written to National Aids Control Organisation (NACO) to continue and sustain induction and refresher training for counsellors to make the service meaningful and practically useful,” said Kumar. 

Counselling is the backbone of HIV management. Counsellors provide information about HIV/AIDS and facilitate behaviour change communication in the client. In addition, they provide psychological support required to address HIV/AIDS-related stigma and discrimination against people living with HIV. 

“Quality training is essential for building and sustaining the capacity of counsellors to provide relevant information and psycho-social support to clients. Till 2013-14, NACO initiated Project Saksham by Tata Institute of Social Sciences with the support of global funds to fight AIDS, tuberculosis and malaria. The counsellors need induction training on priority basis,” read UP government’s letter to NACO. 

Founder of UP Welfare for Persons Living with HIVAIDS Society and HIV issues trainer Naresh Yadav said, “The counselling process and parameters will have to be reworked as they address primary issues but not related questions. For example, a counsellor tells you to eat medicines come what may, but have almost nothing to say if you talk about side effects. Similarly, they talk about what to do but not how to cope with it.”

"
126,AIDS control funds fail to trickle down,2017-04-08T07:31:31+05:30,"The survey by Helping Hands on discrimination faced by HIV/AIDS patients also revealed serious lapses in the AIDS control programme in the state. The Telangana State AIDS Control Society (TSACS) was not able to utilise funds. While a total of 70 crore was sanctioned, 7 crore was unspent. 

Most patients have not been getting the 35-kg rice entitled to them under the 'Antodaya Anaj Yojna', from 2009 onwards, the survey said. It also found 45% of the respondents were not receiving monthly 1,000 support under Aasara scheme. Facilities such as 26 mobile vans purchased by erstwhile AP AIDS Control Society (APSACS) have also also lying defunct. These vans, bought for 18 lakh each and using up 80,000 a month towards operational costs, were to help high risk groups. 

When contacted, commissioner, family welfare, Karuana Vakati refuted allegations of corruption in TSACS.

"
127,Help starts pouring in for HIV-positive youths,2018-03-06T04:46:48+05:30,"KOLKATA: At least three house owners in the city offered to rent out portions of their houses and several others offered donation to 10 HIV-positive teenagers — in pursuit of their entrepreneurial dream — on Monday, a day after TOI reported how scores of property owners refused to offer a space on rent to them to run a café once they learnt about their physical condition.

“I have been receiving calls and emails since morning from several Good Samaritans in the city who are willing to offer space. After months of rejection, this feels like a whiff of fresh air and finally, it feels like the youths can dream big. We have lined up appointments to see the spaces over this week and hopefully, we can finalise a place by the end of this month,” said Kallol Ghosh, the founder of Anandaghar, a shelter for the HIV-positive youths at Narendrapur.

TOI had reported on Monday that the group of 6 young boys and 4 girls have undergone training in baking, sandwich-making and coffee and mocktail-making and aspired to start their own coffee shop named ‘Café Positive’. However, months of making rounds of several properties in some of the prominent locations in south Kolkata — like Lake Road, Dover Lane, Hindusthan Park, Gol Park and Ballygunge — yielded no result. The moment the house owners came to know about the medical condition of the youths, they started distancing them from the project and refused to offer the space on rent citing “problems to be caused by the neighbourhood and family”.

“Everywhere, we were turned down and at one point of time, we felt like our dream can never come true. But then, things started to change from Monday morning. Our teachers at the Home have said several people are calling us up to offer space on rent. This news itself is special for us,” said Sathi Biswas (name changed), a Class XII student who specialises in sandwich-making and baking cookies.

As per the plan, the youths want to set up a café on a 750 square feet ground floor space. The food and beverages will be served on disposable plates and there would be no sharp cutleries or glass items that can cause bleeding or cut injuries. “There will be a corner in the café where people can even make their own coffee. We will also have a space where people can make their own food items and sell it from our outlet by paying us a portion of the sales. There will also be regular gigs and space for budding musicians in the city. And of course, there will be posters and tent cards, making people aware of the disease and the myths surrounding it,” said Sanmit Das (name changed), another Class XII student.

Among the many who have offered space to them is a woman from Salt Lake and two from south and north Kolkata. “The lady from Salt Lake has asked us to go immediately and see her space. Another house owner has even promised us to offer the space at a discount. But we have said that we do not want any concession,” said Ghosh.

Another city-based doctor, Anindya Kar, has mentioned the youths as “young warriors” in a mail to the NGO and has offered them necessary donations to fund the project.


"
128,Drawing youth attention to HIV/AIDS epidemic,2017-01-17T13:54:15+05:30,"CHANDIGARH: Young people are often the world’s strongest advocates researches have shown that they people are more vulnerable to HIV/AIDS. Young People between the ages of 15-24 are the group most affected by HIV/AIDS accounts for 40% of all adult HIV infections. National Youth day was celebrated reminding the crucial role that young people play in the global response to HIV/AIDS.

Chandigarh State AIDS Control Society CSACS to mark National Youth Day organized various awareness programmes in collaboration with NSS wing on ThursdayToday in the city schools and colleges.

Bikram Rana, State Liaison Officer, NSS inaugurated the programmes organized by Govt. Model Sr. Secondary Schools, Sector-37 B, 37 D & 38 (West) Chandigarh. The main aim of the awareness programmes were to sensitize youth about HIV/AIDS and to make them aware about ways of HIV transmission and prevention. 
State Liaison Officer, NSS strongly recommended youth to follow “Abstinence” as the main stay of HIV prevention. He asked the students to be leaders in “making a change” in the society and spread their knowledge in the community to educate them.

Sunil Kumar Panghal, CSACS delivered awareness lectures on HIV/AIDS GMSSS, Manimajra Town and GMSSS Sector- 20, Chandigarh. He motivated youth to come forwarded for Voluntary Blood Donation. He also aware them towards the life principles of swami Vivekanand whose birth anniversary is celebrated as National Youth Day. 
An Oath was administered by the students during the programme to inculcate healthy habits, and shun drug abuse.
HIV/AIDS awareness rallies were also taken out by the NSS Volunteers in different schools. 

"
129,District committees to check ill treatment to HIV patients,2017-05-29T10:38:21+05:30,"BHOPAL: The government has directed district collectors to ensure that HIV patients are not ill-treated or are told to go to other hospitals.

It has been observed that HIV patients, specially pregnant women, are denied proper treatment in government hospitals and are referred to some other hospitals without any valid reason, stated a latest communique to the district collectors across the state by public health and family welfare department.

The collectors have been directed to set up a committee so ensure that such patients do not suffer the misbehaviour of hospital authorities. District collector would be the chairman of the committee in their respective districts. Moreover, a monthly meeting of the committee will have to be conducted, preferably in the first week of month, stated the health department. 

During the monthly meets, the health officials will have to furnish details regarding the status of pregnant HIV infected women, the services extended to them during delivery and whether they were referred to any hospital and if yes, the reason behind it. They will also have to maintain data of HIV patients and their health status in their respective districts.

The committee members will include the chief medical health officer, civil surgeon, superintendent of district hospital, gynaecologists, nodal officer of AIDS control, women and child development officer, deputy director of social justice department among others.

The chief medical health officer of the district would be responsible for extending all assistance to the woman HIV patients. Besides, if a pregnant HIV patient, who is not registered with the district health authorities, turns up for delivery, she cannot be refused on any grounds, the health department directed.

The health authorities have been directed that any woman who reached to the hospital’s labour room should undergo medical test to find out if she was HIV infected in case her HIV status is not clear in advance.

The guidelines were issued in past as well and test kits were provided to hospitals, but it was not followed and now the committee constituted under district collector should look into its implementation, stated the health department’s letter.

"
130,42% drop in new HIV positive cases in state in 7 years,2017-12-01T13:32:49+05:30,"Nagpur: In the last seven years, the rate of new HIV-positive cases in the state has declined by about 42%. As far as mortality due to HIV is concerned, it has declined threefold in last 13 years.

The facts were revealed by Dr Pramod Deoraj, an official from Maharashtra State AIDS Control Society (MSACS) on the occasion of World AIDS Day that falls on December 1.

Deoraj said, “The high rates of positive cases and deaths in the past were because earlier we had fewer ART centres, less medicine stock and not every HIV positive patient received free drugs from government due to criteria called CD4.”

An official notification on May 5 this year made it possible to “treat all” living with HIV regardless of their CD4 cell count (a test that measures the strength of one’s immune system). It has further contributed to decline of new cases.

Deoraj said, “Within the state there were about 23,000 HIV+ve patients who couldn’t get the treatment because of this criteria. With the new guidelines, the government has CD4 clause and we are having a good start. In the last six months we have reached out to over 15,000 patients through ART centres and have been able to begin treatment of about 8000.”

Deoraj said, “In 2010, we used to record about 52,000 new HIV positive cases every year. Last year, the figure fell to 22,000. We have observed that the number is falling by about 1000 to 1200 every year. In 2004 the death rate for HIV positive patients used to be 15% and that has fallen to 5% now.”

The state government has total 73 antiretroviral therapy (ART) centres where free drugs are given. Three centres in Nagpur district are in the medicine department of Government Medical College and Hospital (GMCH), at Indira Gandhi Government Medical College and Hospital (IGMCH) and another at a public health facility in Kamptee.

Officer of District AIDS Prevention and Control Unit (DAPCU) Tanuja Fale said, “In the district, we also have 21 Integrated Counselling and Testing Center (ICTC) where patients are tested for HIV, counselled and connected with ARTs. In 2015, the district received a mobile van to perform as ICTC in remote areas. Last year, we received another van from the collector.”

An RTI query by activist Abhay Kolarkar revealed the ART record of GMCH between the year 2014 and 2016. There is a consistent decline in positive cases here too. The number of deaths came drastically down from 50 to 15 in 2015 but again rose to 30 in 2016.


"
131,"HIV more prevalent in 15-24 age group, data reveals",2018-02-20T06:58:59+05:30,"AHMEDABAD: Data released by the National Family Health Survey reveals that the 0.30% of males in the age group of 15-24 were found to be HIV positive. The data reveals that prevalence of HIV in this group was higher than in the 15-49 age group.

Combined data for Gujarat, Daman and Dadra Nagar Haveli reveals that 0.19% of men in the age group of 15-49 were HIV positive while the number for women in the same age group was 0.18%. The data further reveals that in the age group of 15-54, the number increased to 0.24%.



The officials said that in the 15-24 years group, prevalence was more than any other age group. Interestingly, in this age group, no female was found to be HIV positive. The data also reveals that these are the percentage of HIV positive women and men tested by groups of states or Union territories.

The data further reveals that of the 0.48% married couples who are HIV positive only 0.04% were couples where both spouses were HIV positive. The data further revealed that 0.22% men were HIV positive with their wives being HIV negative. Similarly, in 0.22% it was the wife who was HIV positive while the husband was not HIV positive.

The survey also brought to light the failure of the government to create awareness about HIV. According to the data released, only 69% of men and 43% of women were aware that use of condoms during sex can prevent HIV. Among men, Gujarat ranked 10 from the bottom when it came to knowledge of condoms and women were the fourth worst, better only than Bihar, Dadra and Nagar Haveli and Nagaland.

The data reveals the awareness of mother-to-child transmission (MTCT) of HIV/AIDS was very poor in Gujarat among women, Dadra and Nagar Haveli has the lowest awareness (16%) of MTCT, followed by Bihar (33%) and Gujarat (34%).

The data further reveals that only 59% women were aware of HIV, while among 77% men had awareness about HIV. The data further reveals that only 1% of women had high-risk intercourse in 2015-16 while 6.8% of men had high-risk intercourse in same period. Also, only 23.6% women and men knew how to prevent HIV/AIDS and another 20% had comprehensive knowledge. Divyang Oza, the project officer of the AIDS Control Society said that teenage groups are the most affected and the most common mode of infection was sexual transmission. The second strongest mode for HIV transmission is blood transfusion. It also cannot be denied that many couples only use condom for family planning and are unaware that it can be used to prevent HIV. Oza further said that HIV awareness has to be increased, but it is a time-consuming process and while there has been an improvement, it is less than expected.


"
132,Man held for rape; victim HIV+,2018-08-03T23:35:00+05:30,"Navi Mumbai: A 21-year-old auto driver from Panvel taluka has been arrested by the Khandeshwar police for allegedly sexually assaulting a 19-year-old girl residing in his neighbouring building. However, the accused, who is married, is unaware that the girl he targeted is HIV positive.

The incident had occurred on Wednesday when the girl was alone at home of her maternal aunt. The man broke into her house, raped her and fled. The girl narrated her ordeal to her aunt. 

The victim lodged a complaint while she was in the hospital and a rape case was filed against the auto driver. The cops nabbed the accused when he visited his family on Thursday. The victim contracted the virus from her mother who died of AIDS. The police have not revealed the HIV positive status of the victim to the accused. —George Mendonca


"
133,‘11 blood units found HIV-infected in ’17’,2018-05-04T06:20:24+05:30,"LUCKNOW:In 2017, as many as 11units of blood donated at the community blood bank of King George’s Medical University (KGMU) were found to be infected with human immunodeficiency virus (HIV). In past several years, only three to five units of HIV infected blood units had been timely detected annually.

The rise implies that the number of HIV infected persons are increasing, and also that KGMU has been able to detect infected blood with much more precision by using the specialized Nucleic Acid Testing (NAT), than the previously used ELISA testing method to check donated blood for preventing infections via blood transfusion. Speaking at a programme on ‘Safe Blood Transfusion: Need of the Hour’, head of transfusion medicine department at KGMU, Prof Tulika Chandra said, “Blood transfusion runs a direct risk of contracting HIV if the blood is infected. We at KGMU have undertaken NAT since 2012. Since then, of the 3,10,000 units tested by NAT, 2,300 were found to be infected with HIV, Hepatitis B and Hepatitis C and were thus discarded.”


Docs: NAT saved 9k lives by detecting infected blood units
But, it is not just 2,300 lives, that KGMU claims to have saved, depending on just conducting NAT on blood. “NAT helped save more than 9,000 lives by detecting 2,300 infected blood units that were discarded since four blood components would have been segregated from each unit, which equals to four patients and any one of this unit can be infected,” said Prof Chandra.

She added that the number of HIV infected blood units has grown exponentially while cases of blood infected with Hepatitis A and Hepatitis B have gone down over the years.

“There is an urgent need for blood transfusions to be made safe and the government should take note of this fact. Infected blood can be fatal if transfused to an ailing person. There is a phenomena called horizontal transfusion, which means that a person, transfused with infected blood, can give the infection to others in family through sexual and sometimes other means,” she added.

Prof Chandra added that KGMU and SGPGIMS are the only centres using NAT while other government hospitals are still using the ELISA testing method.

ELISA detects antibodies or antigens produced months after an infection is contracted and is thus futile for recent infections. NAT on the other hand, directly detects DNA or RNA of the infection causing virus present in the blood, making it more accurate.

"
134,Bike rally to spread awareness on HIV,2018-05-05T11:52:40+05:30,"KOHIMA: A motorcycle rally to spread awareness on HIV/AIDS and drug abuse will be conducted from May 5 to 11 by Assam Rifles. The motorcycle rally along the Kohima-Kiphire-Zunebotto-Wokha route will be flagged off on May 5 at 8 am. 20 bikers from the Assam Rifles will participate in the rally, covering a distance of 563 km. 


"
135,World AIDS Day: 35% of HIV-infected patients are youths,2017-12-01T12:29:33+05:30,"AGRA: Despite the government’s continuous effort to spread awareness about AIDS and HIV, more youths in the region are contracting the disease as compared to people from other age groups.
 
 According to sources, 35% of total HIV-infected patients are youths. Over 8,191 cases are registered in Anti-Retroviral Therapy (ART) centre of S N Medical College out of which 2,721 are in the age group of 20 to 30. “We noticed that more youths are coming to get their HIV test in our laboratory. We have examined 1,3100 patients in past 10 months, in which 570 cases were found positive. Although last year, 12,900 patients were examined out of which 560 were found positive,” said Dr Ankur Goyal, HOD, microbiology department of S N Medical College.

 Talking to TOI, Dr Tejpal Singh, professor of S N Medical College and former in-charge of ART centre, said, “We mostly counsel the youths in the age group of 25 to 35 in our ART centre.”

 According to sources, almost 30% of patients take the complete treatment while 10% leave the treatment in middle.
"
136,Row brews as 9-year-old tests HIV +ve after transfusion,2017-09-15T10:41:36+05:30,"THIRUVANANTHAPURAM: In a suspected case of gross medical negligence, the family of a nine-year-old girl, who was undergoing treatment at the Regional Cancer Centre here, has alleged that the girl was infected with HIV after undergoing blood transfusion at the hospital. The Medical College police have registered case and launched a probe after receiving a complaint from the girl’s parents in this regard. The complaint has been raised by a family hailing from Alappuzha district.

According to police, the case has been registered on charges of negligence against the staff of RCC. As per the complaint, the girl was found to be infected with HIV when her blood was tested prior to a surgery related to an eye disease recently. The parents confirmed the infection after testing the blood again at the medical college hospital. It was following this, they approached the police with a complaint. They alleged that only possible way the girl might have got infected with the virus is when she underwent a blood transfusion at RCC as part of her treatment.

Medical College sub-inspector D Girilal said the probe has just been launched and it was too early to say whether the allegation raised against the state-run cancer care hospital was genuine. The parents of the girl have told the police that before starting treatment under RCC in March this year, the girl was treated at a few other hospitals too.

‘’But, they are sure that the girl did not have the infection before the blood transfusion here as they were constantly monitoring her condition owing to continued treatment,” the sub-inspector said.

Kazhakootam Cyber City assistant commissioner A Pramod Kumar, under whose jurisdiction the RCC comes, said the matter will be discussed with forensic experts and then it will be referred to a medical board as per procedure

RCC director and PRO were unavailable for comments despite repeated attempts to contact them.


Read this story in Malayalam
"
137,"HIV spread declining, but not all states show progress",2018-09-15T10:36:57+05:30,"India had around 21.40 lakh people living with HIV/AIDS in 2017, but adult HIV prevalence among 15-49-year-old people has been declining, and was estimated at 0.22% for last year. Also, at 69,000 AIDS-related deaths in 2017, the annual decline is almost 71%. But the declining rates don’t tell the full story as there are several states showing a rising trend. 

Mizoram had the highest adult HIV prevalence in 2017, followed by Manipur at 1.43% and Nagaland at 1.15%. 






Maharashtra accounted for 15% of the national total. It was followed by Andhra Pradesh, Karnataka, Telangana, Bengal, Tamil Nadu, UP and Bihar.

Around 87,000 new HIV infections were reported in 2017, marking an 85% decline in annual new HIV infections since the peak of 1995. New infections have increased in Arunachal Pradesh, Assam, Mizoram, Meghalaya and Uttarakhand . On the other hand, Bihar, Bengal, Telangana, Delhi, Jharkhand and Haryana had decline rates lower than national average.

Telengana topped in new HIV infections with about 9,324 new cases in 2017, which accounted for 11% of total new HIV infections. It is followed by Bihar, Bengal, UP, Andhra Pradesh, Maharashtra, Karnataka and Gujarat. Together these 8 states account for two-thirds of all new annual HIV infections in India.




"
138,"2 patients allege Davanagere hospital issued false HIV-positive reports, file plaints",2018-10-03T07:34:43+05:30,"BENGALURU: A labourer and a homemaker have filed separate complaints with the health department against a Davanagere private hospital for allegedly giving them false HIV-positive reports. They claim the revelation turned their lives upside down, causing them mental agony and pushing them into depression. 

Halappa KB, 60, and Sushmitha, 21, are residents of Davanagere. Halappa, a labourer, got admitted to City Central Hospital in December 2017 for acute leg pain, followed by blockage in his veins. He alleged that no consent was taken from him for the HIV test nor was he informed while his blood was being drawn. His son Raju H is now running from pillar to post seeking justice and has complained to the consumer court as well, claiming that his father had to face stigma due to the false positive reports.

“The hospital conducted an HIV test without our knowledge and consent. It claimed that the report was positive and refused to conduct cardiac surgery on my father. He slipped into depression and even attempted suicide. We brought him to a private hospital in Bengaluru and got him tested for HIV. But the report was negative and he even underwent the operation. My complaint to the health department has been ignored and justice has been delayed,” Raju told TOI. 

Sushmitha had visited the Davanagere hospital in March for a prenatal check-up when she was five months pregnant. “The blood test was done on March 23. But they asked us to collect the report after three days. We were shocked with the findings — they showed she was HIV-positive — and underwent stress and psychological trauma,” said her husband Prahlad S, a police constable.

The couple then went to the government-run Integrated Counselling and Testing Centre for HIV testing. Till then, they had no idea that the report issued by the private hospital was false. “ICTC’s report revealed Sushmitha was not HIV-positive, which came as a huge relief. But the private hospital was firm on its stand. If they had a doubt, they should have conducted another test,” said Prahlad. Sushmitha’s medical negligence complaint with the health department is pending inquiry. Prahlad added that the hospital didn’t even bother to counsel them when they were traumatised after seeing the report.

Dr Raghavan GD, district HIV/AIDS control officer, Davanagere, said he was asked by the district health officer to inquire into both the complaints. “In Halappa’s case, the inquiry report has been submitted to the government, but the findings can’t be disclosed. In the other case, the inquiry is yet to begin,” he said.


Cases pending before court: Hospital

When TOI contacted the hospital authorities, they refused to comment but neither denied nor admitted to the allegations. “The cases are pending before the consumer court. At this stage, we can’t comment on the complaints. We have cooperated with the health department for the inquiry,” said Padmanabh UR, administrator, City Central Hospital.


‘Negligence cases not under KPME Act’
In 2017, the state witnessed a series of protests by doctors when the government initiated amendments to the Karnataka Private Medical Establishment (KPME) Act to regulate private medical establishments. Though the amendments were made, they were called the watered-down version of those intended. In the two cases, the patients have sought action under the KPME Act. “But the Act authorises us only to check and take measures if a hospital/clinic is functioning without registration. Medical negligence cases don’t come under it,” said Dr Raghavan GD, district HIV/AIDS control officer, Davanagere. 


"
139,Unsafe sex leads to 90% HIV cases in Mumbai,2016-12-01T12:15:00+05:30,"Nine of 10 new infections of HIV in 2015-16 occurred due to unsafe sex, said statistics available with the Mumbai Districts AIDS Control Society (MDACS).

“We found that among those newly infected with the virus, 91% have been infected due to unsafe sex,'' said Dr Srikala Acharya of MDACS. HIV spreads through sexual contact, unsafe blood transfusion or by sharing needles. While unprotected sexual contact has for long been the main cause of the HIV AIDS epidemic, what is surprising this time around is that the all-India average is lower. “Compared to Mumbai's 91%, the all-India figure is 80%,“ added Dr Acharya. The Mumbai AIDS control figures for 2015-16 show that among the remaining cases, 5.7% got infected from infected mother to child, 0.2% people were infected due to unsafe blood and 0.5% through infected needles or syringes.

The government has taken several steps to break the HIV transmission chain. “There is such awareness about unsafe needles that this transmission chain is almost negligible,“ said Eldred Tellis from NGO Sankalp. He said that while there were 15,000 drug-injectors in Mumbai in 2,000, the number fell to 8,000 in 2008 and stood around 1,000 this year.

The new three-drug regimen started two years back to prevent mother-to-child transmission too has yielded results.


"
140,IDUs vulnerable to HIV and Hepatitis C,2017-06-27T14:49:05+05:30,"GUWAHATI: On the occasion of International Day against Drug Abuse and Illicit Trafficking on Monday, grim statistics remind that injecting drug users (IDU) from the northeast are susceptible to AIDS/HIV and Hepatitis C infections. According to estimates, there are 66,000 IDUs in the northeast. As per HIV Sentinel Surveillance data, IDUs constitute 1.46% of the high-risk group for HIV. 

Kailash Ditya, deputy team leader of Project Sunrise, a project that oversees a prison intervention program (PIP) for high risk groups among prisoners, told TOI that 40 inmates at Guwahati Central Jail with a history of IDUs have been tested for HIV/AIDS since January. ""We are working on to bring down demand, supply and harm reduction among the inmates. There is also risk assessment at the same time among the inmates"" said Ditya. 

Though harm reduction programmes (HRN) and oral/opiod substitution therapy (OST) is gaining ground in HIV-afflicted states like Manipur, Mizoram, Nagaland and Mizoram, reaching OST to all parts of the northeast is a challenge because 84% of the population in the northeast resides in rural areas. 

""The Centre has to initiate a surveillance system for HCV at the earliest. IDUs are most vulnerable to HCV. There is no data of how many are affected. There is the need for estimation and study of the disease burden of HCV. Without estimation, proper policy cannot be formulated,"" said Ketholelie Angami, the chairperson of Northeast Hepatitis C Forum.

"
141,"HIV-affected man poisons two daughters to death, kills self",2018-09-24T06:29:55+05:30,"COIMBATORE: A 37-year-old HIV-affected man has murdered his two daughters by feeding them poison filled capsules, before committing suicide in a similar fashion at Chinna Sengulam forest settlement area near Anthiyur in Erode district on Saturday night.

The deceased were identified as I Chikkannan alias Chikkaran, of Chinna Sengulam, and his children C Sudha, 15, and C Megala, 10. Sudha was a Class IX student of a private school at Ammapettai, while Megala was a Class VI student of a private residential school at Anthiyur. Both were staying in hostels. A farm worker, Chikkaran had separated from his wife Chikkari about eight years ago. “He was taking care of his two daughters. He was tested HIV positive a few years ago and he had been taking treatment at the Erode government hospital. As his health condition deteriorated, he was recently told that he could live for just two more years,” an investigation officer said.

On Saturday evening, Chikkaran took his daughters to the house from their hostels and fed them capsules filled with poison. Later, he also consumed the same. When a neighbour came to their house at night, he saw the trio struggling for lives with forth in their mouth. Immediately, the trio were taken to the Anthiyur government hospital, where doctors declared Megala brought dead. Sudha and Chikkaran were referred to the government hospital in Erode, where Sudha died without responding to the treatment on the early hours of Sunday. Chikkaran also died in the hospital in the evening.


"
142,Zydus Cadila gets USFDA nod to market generic HIV treatment tablets,2018-11-16T13:36:27+05:30,"New Delhi, Nov 16 () Drug firm Zydus Cadila Friday said it has received final approval from the US health regulator to market generic Abacavir and Lamivudine tablets used for treatment of a type of HIV infection.  The company also said in the regulatory filing that it had received final approval from the United States Food and Drug Administration (USFDA) to market generic Fondaparinux Sodium injection.  The approval from the USFDA is for Abacavir and Lamivudine tablets USP in the strength of 600 mg/300 mg, Zydus Cadila said.  The tablets are used with other antiretroviral medicines to treat human immunodeficiency virus-type 1 (HIV-1) infection that causes acquired immune deficiency syndrome (AIDS), it added.  ""The product will be manufactured at the group's formulations manufacturing facility at special economic zone (SEZ), Ahmedabad,"" Zydus Cadila said.  The nod for the Fondaparinux Sodium injection USP is in the strengths of 2.5 mg/0.5 mL, 5 mg/0.4 mL, 7.5 mg/0.6 mL and 10 mg/0.8 mL single-dose, it added.  Fondaparinux Injection is used to treat blood clots in deep veins and the lungs. It can also be used to prevent blood clots in patients undergoing certain types of surgeries, Zydus Cadila said.  ""It will be manufactured at a partner's manufacturing site,"" it added.  The group now has more than 230 approvals and has so far filed over 330 abbreviated new drug applications (ANDAs) since the commencement of its filing process, Zydus Cadila said.  Shares of Cadila Healthcare, the listed entity of the group, were trading at Rs 357.80 per scrip on BSE, down 0.54 per cent from their previous close. AKT ANS"
143,"New HIV infections down, but AIDS deaths rise 35% in 3 yrs",2016-11-30T12:39:35+05:30,"Deaths due to full blown AIDS in the city have jumped by nearly 35% over the last three years though the number of fresh HIV infections has shown a decline, shows figures collated by the Mumbai District Aids Control Society.

They suggest that a majority of the HIV cases are detected in the 35-49 age group, indicating that awareness campaigns are probably not making early inroads.

AIDS deaths rose from 945 in 2013-14 to 1,270 in 2015-16 (see box). Activists are alarmed that the year-on-year increase in fatalities has ranged from 12% to 20%. Most blame it on the country's restrictive antiretroviral therapy (ART) strategy . An analysis shows the fataies are declining in those lities are declining in those who are taking the ART treatment on a regular basis. The increase in deaths is mainly in the group that has been diagnosed with HIV but is considered too healthy to be started on ART. In India, a patient is given free ART drugs only when his her CD4 count drops to 500, or the patient has a TB or hepatitis co-infection. The CD4 count is an indicator of how well the body's immune system is working.

Globally , patient groups have been demanding that each and every HIV-positive person should be given free ART drugs by their governments.The WHO in 2015 had recommended that all HIV patients should be started on ART irrespective of their CD4 count. In India, out of 21 lakh people living with the disease, only 55% are currently on free ART.In Mumbai too, out of the 70,000-odd people living with the disease, a little over 35,000 are on the drug regimen.

Eldred Tellis, one of the founding members of Mumbai Aids Forum, said the health ministry was looking away from a mammoth human crisis. “People who suffer from HIV are extremely vulnerable to opportunistic infections.But our systems are not geared to treat those infections,“ he said. Another NGO member said the programme is going through a lack of motivation and urgency to control the disease.

A National Aids Control Organisation (Naco) member said the higher number of deaths could be a result of better tracking mechanisms. Dr Padmaja Keskar, BMC's executive health officer, said: “AIDS deaths often happen due to opportunistic infections and multi-organ failure. They don't happen overnight and the disease manifests over many years. Factors such as nutrition play a pivotal role too.“

She added that MDACS is aggressively working towards bringing new infections to zero. “We have to catch and treat them early .“

Statistics at the moment do not suggest that is happening: a majority are getting diagnosed between 35 and 49 years. In 2015-16, 44.3% of the fresh infections were in that age bracket, followed by 26.1% cases in 25-34. Overall though, fresh HIV infections have dropped by 55% in the last five years.

A Naco official said the Centre is toying with the idea of starting ART for all. “It would entail an additional cost of Rs 100 crore as more than 1.5 lakh people would be added to the regimen. Money is not a problem, but the logistics of procuring the drugs is being looked into,“ he said.


"
145,"Man with HIV kills two daughters, attempts suicide in TN",2018-09-23T17:55:45+05:30,"ERODE (TN): A 37-year-old man with HIV allegedly killed his daughters by feeding them poison laced food before attempting suicide in the district Sunday, police said.

Sikkaran, a daily wage worker of Sengulam forest settlement in Anthiyur, was tested positive for human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) a few years back.

He knew that death was imminent and had opted to end his life, police said, adding, he administered the poison laced food to his daughters before consuming it.

On noticing the three lying conscious, the neighbours informed the police, who rushed to the spot and shifted them to Anthiyur Government Hospital.

While both his daughter died on the way to hospital, Sikkaran is undergoing treatment in the hospital, where his condition is said to be critical, they said.

Sikakran has been living with his two daughters aged 15 and 12, after his wife had walked out on the family seven years ago owing to some differences with him, they said.

A case has been registered against Sikkaran and investigation is on.

"
146,"93% HIV patients in Telangana battle taboo, live on edge",2017-04-08T07:25:49+05:30,"HYDERABAD: Thirty-two-year old Ramesh (name changed ) is married with two children. He was diagnosed with HIV in 2014. While life changed after his diagnosis, he was at least thankful of having a stable job at the front desk of a private hotel. But fate and prejudice intervened the day his manager saw the AIDS Control Society card on his desk. The next day he was asked to quit. “I even attempted suicide three times. I could not find a job, finally an NGO offered me a job as counsellor,“ he said.

Ramesh is not isolated in trauma. A survey conducted in Telangana revealed that 93% people living with AIDS face stigma at workplaces, in their neighbourhoods and even at hospitals. This has forced several of them to travel long distances to reach Anti-Retroviral Therapy (ART) centres.

The survey, carried out by city-based Helping Hands Foundation, began in mid-February and covered 26 ART centres. The team interviewed 561 patients across the state, 182 of whom were from Hyderabad, to find that 93% of them faced discrimination at their places of work and while accessing healthcare or getting rented accommodation in case they disclose their HIV-positive status.ART counsellors and medical experts were also interviewed.

The survey also exposed exploitation by private hospitals.As many as 60% of the respondents said that private hospitals make them pay through the nose for treatment. In case they choose to go to a government hospital, they are met with hesitance. This is why most HIV patients prefer to keep their identities guarded. As many as 55% of the respondents withheld their names for fear of discrimination and only shared their ART registration number in the survey.

What's worse is that 25% reported facing discrimination at ART centres too. They said they faced problems in collecting medicines and had to put up with rude behaviour of staff. The stigma is so high that 54% said they went to ART centres far away from their homes for fear of being exposed in their own neighbourhoods.Most patients also discard medicine boxes just outside ART centres to ensure they are not identified.

"
147,3rd line of defence against HIV in place for patients in India,2016-07-30T12:07:29+05:30,"Mahesh*, 41, a resident of Sangli, has lived with HIV for 14 years now. The last one year though has been the most trying. ""I have been hospitalised nine times over the last 11 months for chest and throat infections. I spent over Rs 3 lakh in Pune and Mumbai hospitals before someone pointed out that my HIV drugs were not working. A doctor in the private sector offered to treat me for Rs 4lakh but there was no way I could afford that,"" said the patient. Mahesh's case is rare, but not unusual. In the battle against HIV/AIDS, some have developed resistance to most combinations of drugs used in treatment, either due to poor adherence to the regimen or mutation in the virus. For several such second-line failure patients, their only hope was the international NGO, Médecins Sans Frontières, but that again was an option open to a select few.
 
 Now finally, a third, more potent line of treatment has finally been rolled out across 10 hospitals in India, including JJ in Mumbai, Maulana Azad in Delhi, others in Kolkata, Chennai, etc. 18 patients from Maharashtra have been enrolled for this higher grade of anti-retroviral therapy (ART), which is at least 15 times more expensive than the firstline treatment.

 The Byculla JJ facility, the nodal centre for HIV treatment in the state, has begun the exercise of screening 2,214 patients who are currently on second-line drugs. Doctors will look for a rapidly swelling viral load in them before concluding that the existing treatment regime is no longer effective to suppress the virus. ""Any patient with a viral load of above 10,000 copiesmL will immediately be started on the third-line which will be a combination of Raltegravir (400mg), Darunavir (600mg) and Ritonavir (100mg),"" said Dr Vidya Nagar, nodal officer at JJ Hospital.

 The news that the state-run healthcare network is making available a third and more potent line of drugs has come as a huge relief. ""The cost for third-line is at least 15 times more expensive than the first and five to six times more than the second line. Several patients have died only because they could not afford the treatment,"" said Ganesh Acharya, a member of the Mumbai AIDS Forum. Many were even taking the drugs from the private sector but could not sustain for long. Additional project director at Mumbai District Aids Control Society, Dr Shrikala Acharya, said the annual cost of the third-line regimen was around Rs 1.5 lakh for each patient.

 Drug resistance is one of the challenges for the HIV/AIDS programme. According to studies, resistance is less than 1% in first-line and 2-3% in the second-line. ""We have detected around 60-70 resistant patients across India so far against our estimation of 500. But we have drugs for more than 1,000 patients and we can procure more,"" said Dr BB Rewari, national programme officer, National Aids Control Organisation.

 Adult HIV prevalence at the national level has seen a decline from an estimated 0.38% in 2001-03 to 0.26% in 2015. Rise in new infections however has been a major point of concern. In 2015, over 86,000 new infections were detected across India. Resistance poses an additional challenge as treatment failure translates into a high viral load in patients. 
"
148,"8% of TB patients in Karnataka are HIV positive, third highest in India",2018-04-06T06:58:05+05:30,"BENGALURU: The prevalence of HIV positivity among TB patients in Karnataka is the third highest in the country. According to the India Tuberculosis 2018 report released recently, 8% of the TB patients suffer from HIV infection and are aware of the condition. 

“HIV infection increases the risk of progression of latent TB infection to active TB disease, increasing the risk of death if not treated timely,” it adds.

The highest prevalence of HIV among TB patients has been recorded by Nagaland (14%), followed by Andhra Pradesh (10%). One of the reasons why Karnataka is in the third position is emphasis given to the testing of HIV status of TB patients, say doctors with the state health and family welfare department.

When it comes to total TB patients notified in the country, Karnataka is in the 10th position (81,187). Uttar Pradesh tops the list with 3,11,041 cases. When the prevalence of HIV among TB patients is considered, Uttar Pradesh reports only 1%, indicating poor testing. 

Bagalkot tops list 

Bagalkot district tops the list of HIV prevalence among TB patients in Karnataka at 30%. It is followed by Belagavi (15%), indicating that TB care needs to be more focused on north Karnataka. Dharwad, Raichur and Udupi have 11% TB patients suffering from HIV.

Dr Ramachandra Bairy, joint director, tuberculosis control programme, health and family welfare department, said early detection helps in controlling the infection. “In Karnataka, all HIV positive persons are tested for TB during their regular monthly antiretroviral therapy (ART) sessions. Likewise, all TB patients are tested for HIV infection,” he said. 

If people living with HIV have cough that persist for more than two weeks and develop any gland in neck, they are immediately referred for TB testing, he added.


"
149,"Patient groups, legal experts express concern over HIV/AIDS Bill",2017-03-23T18:32:25+05:30,"Patient groups, legal experts and activists have expressed concern over the HIV/AIDS (Prevention and Control) Bill, saying it dilutes the Central and state government’s obligation to provide complete treatment to HIV patients. The Bill which was passed in Rajya Sabha on March 21, failed to ensure free and complete treatment to People Living with HIV, as it states that government shall provide treatment to HIV patients ‘as far as possible’.

An obligation to provide treatment ""as far as possible"" is a significant dilution of the right of people living with HIV to treatment, which is well known that it must be taken life-long. 

The National AIDS Control Organisation provides free screening and treatment to HIV patients in centres across the country. 

Deletion of the clause from section 14(1) has been a major demand by patients and experts since the Bill was tabled in Rajya Sabha in February 2014. Though several MPs moved amendments to remove these words, these were regrettably withdrawn at the last minute. It should be noted that a mere verbal assurance by the government that treatment would not be denied to any person is not equivalent to a legal obligation, experts added. 

Anand Grover, director Lawyers Collective (LC) said “There are few issues also which need to be addressed but the primary one which had to be addressed deleting the words, “as far possible” in Clause 14(1) relating to treatment measures. It is extremely unfortunate that despite the overwhelming support for this was not pursued. The LC strongly urges the minister to delete those words as also look into other glitches in the Bill which have already been pointed out.”

The Bill under Section 14 (1) only states that Central and state government shall take measures to `as far as possible’ provide anti-retroviral treatment, diagnostics and treatment for HIV patients, estimated to be over two million. 

Says Loon Gangte regional coordinator-South Asia International Treatment Preparedness Coalition: The Health Minister’s verbal assurance that no one will be denied treatment as India will adopt ""test and treat"" policy, is very welcoming but this has no constitutional or legal status. We want concrete assurance and safeguard of our treatment in the Indian Constitution”.

Paul Lhungdim president, The Delhi Network of Positive People said: Today, entire Rajya Sabha failed the HIV community in India. The Congress Party shamefully withdrew the amendment they themselves had suggested, at the last minute. Politicians have betrayed us, which will have adverse effect on future treatment of people living with HIV in India. The government does not provide treatment for co-infections like Hepatitis C and opportunistic infections like Kaposi Sarcoma, a form of cancer”.

"
150,Needle pushers adding to rising HIV count in city,2017-07-27T07:27:23+05:30,"HYDERABAD: Over the past few months, at least 25 drug abusers have tested positive for HIV/AIDS with authorities raising concern over injectable drug use in the city. 

These are among the 12,058 new patients added to the HIV/AIDS caseload over the past 12 months.

Drugs like heroin, cocaine, MDMA (ecstasy) - known as street-drugs are commonly injected despite the high risk of contracting AIDS. In fact, one in 23 women and one in 36 men, who inject drugs have a risk of contracting AIDS, health authorities say.

Overall, the state has an estimated 400 such AIDS patients who contacted the dreaded virus through intravenous drug injections. Apart from the street drugs, even prescription drugs like tablets, capsules and liquids are injected occasionally, say insiders.

""Drug abusers often begin with taking pills or snorting drugs in the powdered form, slowly graduate to the intravenous method. Most of the abusers are obsessed with being on a perpetual high. Over time, the usage of pills, capsules, puffing and snorting slowly reduce the impact and hence they switch to intravenous drugs,"" said an official at the Narcotics Control Bureau.

These injectable drugs are often make from powder or crystal form of drugs by dissolving them in water. Sometimes it is even heated up if required and later drawn in to the syringe by dipping a cotton ball into the solution. ""The fact that many of the drug users also have unsafe sexual practices, increase the risk of HIV due to sharing of the syringes,"" added the official.

Apart from getting a high, there are many more reasons why addicts graduate to intravenous drugs say experts, even if it comes with the highest risk of contracting AIDS as well as other blood-related infections. 

""The type of injected drug are opioids- the most well-known of which is heroin. Other opioid medicines that IV drugs users frequently abuse are fentanyl, Talwin and buprenorphine, as well as the prescription painkillers oxycodone and hydrocodone (the latter two are first crushed into a powder and then dissolved into a solution for injection),"" added Dr Rahul Agarwal, senior consultant internal medicine, Maxcure hospitals. 

Stimulants are popular with IV drug users because they quickly deliver a strong feeling of euphoria, as well as increased energy, reduced appetite and a reduced need for sleep. ""People who repeatedly snort suffer discomfort due to perforation of nasal mucosa, sinusitis, nose bleeds, loss of sense of smell, problems in swallowing and hoarseness,"" he added.

"
151,Cabinet approves amendment to HIV/AIDS bill,2016-10-05T13:28:32+05:30,"NEW DELHI: A draft law which seeks to protect the interests of persons with HIV and AIDS got more teeth on Wednesday with government approving amendments to bring in legal accountability and establish a formal mechanism to probe complaints against those who discriminate against such people.

The Union Cabinet approved amendments to 'The HIV and AIDS Bill, 2014' drafted to safeguard the rights of people living with HIV and affected by HIV.

The bill lists various grounds on which discrimination against HIV positive persons and those living with them is prohibited. These include the denial, termination, discontinuation or unfair treatment with regard to employment, educational establishments, health care services, residing or renting property, standing for public or private office, and provision of insurance (unless based on actuarial studies).

The requirement for HIV testing as a pre-requisite for obtaining employment or accessing health care or education is also prohibited, a statement issued after the Cabinet meet said.

The Bill requires that ""no person shall be compelled to disclose his HIV status except with his informed consent, and if required by a court order"".

Establishments keeping records of information of HIV positive persons shall adopt data protection measures.

According to the proposal, every HIV infected or affected person below the age of 18 years has the right to reside in a shared household and enjoy the facilities of the household.

The Bill also prohibits any individual from publishing information or advocating feelings of hatred against HIV positive persons and those living with them.

The Bill also provides for guardianship for minors. A person between the age of 12 and 18 years who has sufficient maturity in understanding and managing the affairs of his HIV or AIDS affected family shall be competent to act as a guardian of another sibling below 18 years of age. 

This provision will be applicable in the matters relating to admission to educational establishments, operating bank accounts, managing property, care and treatment.

"
152,Legal aid centre for HIV-affected opens in Vellore,2017-08-08T00:09:49+05:30,"Vellore: With an objective to extend legal aid to the patients coming to the anti-retroviral therapy (ART) centre of the Christian Medical College Hospital, the district’s legal service authority (DLSA) has established a legal service here on Monday.

The centre would aid the HIV affected people to avail their legal rights. The centre was inaugurated by principal district judge and chairperson of DLSA, S Ananthi.

According to the officials of the DLSA, the HIV affected people can approach the centre if they face any legal problems such as the partition of property and dwelling rights at home. The centre would also educate them on government welfare schemes and concessions available for them through the district AIDS control society, said the official. The CMC hospital provided a room for DLSA at the ART centre.

DLSA would depute a lawyer and a para legal volunteer at the clinic, which would be open from 10am to 3.30pm on Tuesdays and Thursdays. District judge E M K S Siddarthar and officials from DLSA were also present on the occasion.


"
153,"Despite HIV, they’re positiveve about life",2017-02-22T09:52:35+05:30,"LUCKNOW: The prospect of living with HIV virus may have seemed a daunting task for the Madiaon couple who chose to end their lives instead. But, for all those who chose life, the going hasn’t been any easy, says Mahesh, an HIV+ for 11 years now.

“In 2005, I found out I was HIV + at a blood donation camp. I worked for a private firm and was a bachelor then. It felt my world collapsed that moment and from then on, I would just stay in my room, moping over my condition,” he said. Then a friend suggested a visit to Uttar Pradesh Network for people with HIV + & AIDS (UPNP). Mahesh says he felt like he was reborn then. 

“I married an HIV+ girl in 2011 and how our lives changed! HIV + is not the end of the road but the beginning of a new journey,” says Mahesh.

Like Mahesh, there many with HIV+ people who have overcome odds to lead a productive life. When Fatima (35) found out she was HIV+ in 2004, she locked herself inside her room for five days. “My sister-in-law used to curse me daily... I could hear her even from inside my room. I just wanted to die. Then a TV series gave me hope.” Fatima visited a counselling centre which led her to UPNP. 

“I got married three years ago and my husband is supportive. We have decided to create awareness about HIV virus. It is not an illness and proper prevention can help the infected person feel better,” she said.

“I was thrown out of my job. My colleagues laughed at me, even my own family disowned me,” says 40-year-old Suresh who was diagnosed in 2001. One night, while eating at a dhaba, he met a man who was also an HIV + and life changed thereafter. “HIV+ just requires you to take preventive measures and you can lead a healthy life,” he said. “I have got a good job and have emerged a winner,” he said.

UPNP chief Naresh Yadav said HIV+ people were not criminals. It’s just that they were prone to catching infections as the virus weakens their immune system.

Dr Himanshu, head of anti-retroviral (ART) therapy centre at KGMU for HIV+, said HIV never spreads by one’s saliva, sweat or urine. It is only transmitted if the blood of the infected person comes in contact with a body. Then, he said, precaution can be taken within 72 hours, known as Post-exposure prophylaxis (PEP), under which certain medicines reduce the exposure of the virus. He said HIV+ couples can have kids through Prevention of Parent to Child Transmission (PPTCT). There have been over 50 cases where children were born to couples with HIV virus, he said. 

(ALL THE NAMES HAVE BEEN CHANGED) 

"
154,HIV+ kids in Goa battle social ostracism,2016-11-30T08:46:12+05:30,"PANAJI: Until recently, 16-year-old Rihan Gauns (name changed) was often bullied by some of his classmate. A class XI student, Rihan is HIV positive, an infection he got from his parents who are now long dead. His is a two-pronged struggle. On the one hand, while he fights the infection in his body, on the other he has to battle social ostracism. 

Gauns is one among the 253 children and adolescents living with HIV in Goa, for whom life is a daily struggle. As they cope up with their life-threatening ailment, they battle virtually everyday with society, which looks on them with suspicion.

President of Human Touch, Peter Borges informed that one or both parents of most of these children are dead. Some live with their extended family or with a single parent while some are being raised in orphanage.

The HIV status, whether that of a child or an adult, is not revealed, but sometimes it does come out exposing them to discrimination, Borges said. 

“We managed to stop bullying in Rihan’s case after we approached the school management, but it was a difficult situation nonetheless,” said Peter who added that society should be more accepting of such children, and disease itself. 

Some of the 253 children living with HIV are in their teens. There are a few who are above 18 years of age, too. 

Though the government provides a monthly allowance of Rs 2,000 to persons living with HIV, Borges said not all are able to avail of the allowance due to bureaucratic hassles. 

There are five youngsters under his guidance for whom he has arranged a room to stay as they have no family members to rely on. 

To provide care and support, Goa State NGO forum on HIV/AIDs, comprising of eight NGOs, has analysed the main obstacles facing HIV+ children and charted an action agenda to overcome the same. 

The biggest challenge before those who are above 18 years of age is what to do next. 

Some though are completing their education. 

The NGOs want the government to intervene and help this segment of the society that has been left behind.


"
155,"HIV screening sees dip, even after counselling",2016-12-06T04:28:22+05:30,"GURUGRAM: The trend of women not getting tested for HIV, even after being counselled, is rising. This, despite doctors working hard to eliminate HIV transmission from mother to child. Approximately, a third of these women are pregnant. 

According to the latest statistics, over 3,000 women in Gurugram did not undergo HIV tests till October 2016. Of this, 1,215 pregnant women had been counselled to do so. Till October, 14 cases of pregnant women having HIV have been confirmed. 

According to doctors, it is possible to eliminate transmission, but only if mothers agree to get tested.

Dr Himanshu Batra, head of the department of paediatrics at Columbia Asia hospital said, HIV testing is a part of routine screening at all private hospitals. “All of my patients get tested for HIV, no matter what,” he said. It is not the case everywhere, though. 

In 2015, 7,700 men were counselled at government-run integrated counselling and testing centres (ICTC), and 6,660 men opted to get tested for HIV. The number is higher in the case of women, where 21,562 women underwent counselling last year, but only 18,449 opted for testing. The gap is 3,113 women. In 2014, this number was 1,600, in 2013, it was 1,005 and in 2012 it was 899. 

According to Vijay Kumar, the nodal district officer of the AIDS programme run by the Haryana State AIDS Control Society, there are many reasons behind the figures.

“Some of them don’t get tested because they don’t want to wait for the long hours of testing (it takes around two hours for an HIV test). Others think they are not at much risk, and therefore drop out of the tests. We cannot force them as it is done only with their consent,” he said.

HIV infection can be caused through various means: sexual transmission, blood transfusion, intravenous drug use and from mother to child. However, 90% of children with HIV contract it from their parents.

According to doctors, a complete cure is possible if detection is early. 

According to National AIDS Control Organisation (NACO), its ‘Prevention of Parent to Child Transmission’ services cover only about 47% annual estimated pregnancies in India. In 2015-16, 12.7 million pregnant women accessed this service.

A NACO report says the number of women who are counselled anyway covers only 47% of women, making the number of women who do not get tested significantly large. “In such a situation, complete elimination of HIV transmission from mother-to-child appears to be a distant possibility,” it reads.

"
156,Four of 10 HIV+ newborns may miss timely treatment: Study,2018-09-10T03:34:02+05:30,"MUMBAI: Four out of 10 HIV-positive newborns in the city could be missing out on timely treatment as their parents fail to return for a confirmatory diagnosis. Failure to detect and treat HIV early may not just cause irreversible neurological damages, but also prove fatal for babies. 



Doctors at the civic-run BYL Nair Hospital recently discovered the worrying trend while analyzing data of 1,410 babies who were tested for HIV between 2015 and 2018 at the reference laboratory in Kasturba Hospital. At six weeks of birth, infants born to HIV-infected mothers are subjected to the first test, which if positive, is repeated immediately. This second test assumes great significance as the child is immediately started on antiretroviral therapy (ART), if this report too comes positive.





The study showed that merely 61% of parents returned for the second confirmatory test. “We were surprised to see that so many parents are missing out on the second visit, thereby delaying the child’s treatment,” said Dr Jayanthi Shastri, who heads the molecular lab at Kasturba that receives samples from 36 HIV testing and counselling centres across the city. The laboratory also gets dried blood spot samples from Gujarat, Goa and Madhya Pradesh. “Such a delay is unfortunate as the advances in ART assure that children with HIV escape the serious neurological damages,” she said.

Nair hospital’s Integrated Counselling and Testing Centre has found migration to be one of the biggest reasons. “In 70% of these cases, parents are migrants, who come here for child delivery and return to their hometowns. In a small percentage, it’s also the lack of understanding about the seriousness of HIV,” said Medha Deorukhkar, a counsellor at the centre. Around 46% of children were lost to follow-up, the analysis found. 

The national protocol warrants that babies be followed up to 18 months as antibodies from mother could give out false positivity in tests carried out before that. In fact, regular follow-ups and counselling are crucial not just for HIV-positive babies, but also for negative ones. While India data is scarce, it has been found that babies who have escaped contracting the virus during birth may still get it through breastfeeding. “Counselling is crucial as mothers may not comprehend the harm of switching between breast milk to formula milk,” said a doctor from Sion hospital’s paediatric centre of excellence for HIV. “Bottle feeds cause ulceration on the gut wall, which makes it conducive for the virus to enter the baby’s bloodstream.” 

Dr Shikala Acharya, assistant project director at Mumbai District Aids Control Society, said while mother-to-child transmission has dropped to less than 0.2%, tracking remains a challenge. In 2017-18, of around 460 deliveries in HIV-positive women, four babies tested positive. She said in families where the couple has not informed extended family, pursuing them to return for testing of the child becomes difficult. 

But Dr Anju Seth, director of paediatrics at Delhi’s Lady Hardinge Medical College, said it’s worth the effort as virus suppression is crucial here. “The first three years of a child’s life is when maximum growth happens. If the virus is not controlled, damages like stunting of height, weight and developmental milestones could be permanent.”


"
157,Parliament passes HIV and AIDS bill,2017-04-11T20:55:10+05:30,"NEW DELHI: The Parliament on Tuesday passed a vital HIV and AIDS (Prevention and Control) Bill, ensuring equal rights while seeking treatment, education and job by people living with HIV.

Terming the unanimous passage of the Bill in the Lok Sabha as ""historic"", health minister J P Nadda said the government ""stands committed for free treatment of HIV patients.""

 The bill was passed by the Rajya Sabha on March 21.

The total number of people living with HIV in India is estimated at 21.17 lakhs, whereas around 86000 new HIV infections were reported in 2015, showing 66% decline in new infections from 2000. In 2015 around 68000 people died of AIDS related causes nationally.

The Bill assumes significance as it protects people living with HIV from specific acts of discrimination by the state, or any other person. It also lays down penal provisions for any discrimination practised against a person with HIV/AIDS and breach of confidentiality.

Under the new law, central and state governments are obliged to provide for anti-retroviral therapy (ART) and management of opportunistic infections (infections that take advantage of weakness in the immune system and occur frequently).

The protection mandated under the law extends to the fields of employment, healthcare services, educational services, public facilities, property rights, holding public office, and insurance.

Calling the Bill 'people centric', Nadda said the new law will strengthen the rights of the people living with HIV.

""It is not the case that before coming of this bill, these people (infected with HIV ) were not empowered but with the passage of this bill they will get more powers,"" he said.

Though the Bill was initially introduced in Parliament by the UPA government, the amendments to the HIV and AIDS (Prevention and Control) Bill, 2014 were revived by the Modi government in July last year.

Since then the health ministry has made various changes to the original Bill to address several concerns raised by the HIV community as well as state governments.

For instance, the Bill now makes anti-retroviral treatment a legal right for all HIV/AIDS patients. It has also adopted ""test and treat"" policy which means any person testing positive will be entitled for free treatment by the state and central government. Earlier, this was restricted by a CD4 count rate.

It also provides for confidentiality of HIV-related information and makes it necessary to get informed consent for undertaking HIV tests, medical treatment and research.

The new legislation has provisions to safeguard the property rights of HIV positive people. Every HIV infected person below the age of 18 years has the right to reside in a shared household and enjoy the facilities of the household.

"
158,Case that changed HIV treatment forever,2017-05-14T12:19:30+05:30,"MUMBAI/GOA: It was Valentine’s Day morning in February 1989, and Dominic D’Souza, a 29-year-old living in Parra, a rural parish of north Goa, had just finished breakfast with his mother and aunt when a policeman arrived and whisked him away.

Without being told why, Dominic was hustled around the police station, a hospital and badgered with questions about his sexuality and sex life until he was jolted into realising he was a carrier of the HIV virus.

It’s been 25 years since the country’s patient zero of the dreaded scourge, who was the first to bear the brunt of ostracism and whose case became the first HIV-related one to reach the Indian courts, succumbed to AIDS.

From being handcuffed and left to rot in an abandoned tuberculosis sanatorium to challenging the Goa Public Health Amendment Act, which called for mandatory isolation of HIV-positive persons, Dominic’s legal, medical and emotional journey irrevocably changed not only his own life but became a rallying cry in the struggle for equal rights to treatment and care for those with HIV in the country.

Still fit at the time of arrest, Dominic had all along maintained that he was an HIV carrier but not an AIDS patient even as he was being quarantined with rats. Finally, he legally fought his way out 64 days later. On release, he lost his job but chose not to play the victim. Instead, he became India’s first HIV-positive activist.

Goa became a centre of AIDS activism with Dominic setting up Positive People, an NGO for the rights of the HIV-infected. Isabel de Santa-Rita Vaz, his friend who’d rallied around him and continued his mission with Positive People, recounts: “His agony was unbearable for us. Dominic knew it wouldn’t be possible to achieve total freedom from infection but wanted to start an organisation that could combat discrimination.”

Although he won a partial victory at first when the state amended the Goa Public Health Act and court made detention optional, Dominic lost his life three years on, at 33. “Dominic lived with AIDS, but he lived not to be ashamed,” read his obituary in Goa’s newspapers in 1992, in keeping with his wishes. “He is survived by his twin brother who lives in Sweden, a sister in Mombasa and another brother in the US,” says Vaz.

Today, there are an estimated 2.1 million HIV-positive persons in India. Even though diagnosis is no more a death sentence but a chronic illness for which medicines are easier to access, and one can live longer, regular lives, the challenges are many. The stigma it carries and its association with homosexuality, drug use and sex work still impedes the shift in people’s attitudes, says Vaz, adding that the other big challenge is “funding”.

Yet, what happened 25 years ago changed the national conversation on the disease and laid the grounds for the 

  HIV/AIDS Bill passed by Parliament
 + last month. “The dream of having an integrationist approach which requires testing with informed consent and preserving confidentiality and integration of the individual in society has been passed,” says Anand Grover, Dominic’s counsel, who’s been fighting for HIV patients in court since he first met Dominic. “We not only became good friends but worked to oppose the Centre from adopting the Goa Public Health Act model nationally. That was India’s first movement on HIV issues.”

The HIV/AIDS Bill passed by Parliament was drafted by Grover’s Lawyers Collective. But Grover is apprehensive about the ‘test and treat’ policy of providing ART as soon as a person tests positive irrespective of his CD count or clinical stage that it introduced. “India is still far from the goal of complying with the 500 CD count regimen even now,” says Grover. Moreover, the caveat it introduced about treatment services being provided ‘as far as possible’ could be an escape route for government to evade its obligations. A lot remains to be done.”

Grover’s resolve was predestined. In May 1992, shortly before his death, Dominic had “extracted” a promise from Grover. “A promise I did not realize would have a profound impact on me. It was May 22, 1992. I got a call about Dominic being seriously ill and in Breach Candy hospital in Mumbai. I rushed there. The otherwise handsome young man was skin and bones, but he was only interested in what I was doing for HIV issues. Whether by design or accident, it became a promise that I’d continue doing legal work for HIV rights.”

The cases he handles now are primarily about access to medicines, discrimination and negligence of health care workers.


With inputs by Lisa Monteiro

"
159,"Despite meds, Maharashtra’s HIV+ kids fight a crippling battle",2018-09-03T06:48:18+05:30,"SOLAPUR: Sumana will turn 18 next year, but she looks 10, is four-feet-tall and weighs 30kg. The HIV-positive girl is hearing impaired and her mental ability is that of a child half her age. Like her, at least 60% of the 110 inmates at Solapur’s Palawi-Prabha Hira Pratishthan, the state’s oldest institution caring for children with HIV, suffer from varying degrees of hearing loss. TOI found that the prevalence of height and weight stunting is more than 70%, while over 30% have stymied mental development.


AIDS-related deaths may have dropped by 54% in India over a decade, but most children in rural areas living on antiretroviral therapy (ART) are barely surviving, afflicted by physical and mental deficiencies. The reason: the national programme focuses on medicines instead of a comprehensive medical, nutritional and psychosocial model. For the nearly three lakh registered HIV patients in the state, there are less than 1,000 counsellors, mostly underpaid, and overburdened with administrative work. A fourth of India’s 60,000-odd children taking ART for HIV live in Maharashtra. With no adequate support, the state recently learned that over 30,000 of the two lakh patients on treatment have quietly dropped out.


Stunted, depressed, low on hearing: HIV+ kids face fallout despite drugs

Sumana looks like a 10-year-old though she’s a teenager 11 months shy of 18. Four feet tall and with body weight of 30kg, she is at least 25kg underweight and significantly short for her age. Her mental ability is of a child half her age and she is hearing impaired.

At Solapur’s Palawi-Prabha Hira Pratishthan, one of Maharashtra’s oldest institutions caring for children living with HIV, cases like Sumana’s are not an exception. At least 60% of the 110 children here suffer from varying degrees of hearing loss. The prevalence of height and weight stunting is more than 70%, while over a third have stymied mental development. Besides physical, prevalence of mental health problems such as depression is alarmingly high.

AIDS-related deaths have dropped by 54% and new infections by 66% in India over a decade, but children like Sumana are a testimony to the gaping deficit in the national programme that focuses on drugs instead of a holistic medical, nutritional and psychosocial model that a complex disease such as HIV warrants. A little over a quarter of the 60,000 such children are in Maharashtra.

An otherwise spirited child, Sumant gets drowsy and irritable after taking medicines. “I get severe stomach-ache, dizziness, headache and diarrhoea,'' he says, describing his plight after taking the daily dose of antiretroviral therapy (ART) medicines. Born with the virus, these children need to take two to six capsules daily. For additional infections such as tuberculosis, the pill count could run into double digits. Their very survival depends on following this regimen, but the six-year-old Sumant is among 17 children at the Palawi home who refuse to continue with ART .

“Children go through hell in spite of ART. There is no denying the dramatic shift in HIV care today, but what about those who got the disease at the turn of the century and have spent a lifetime taking medicines. We know little or nothing about what the virus or ART does to each child?” said Palawi's founder, 65-year-old Mangaltai Shah. She says most children in Palawi grapple with problems ranging from skin rashes, oral and vaginal yeast infections, pus accumulation in ears, hearing and vision problems to life-threatening infections such as TB. “So when medicines meant to heal start giving additional trouble, they find it easier to discard.” Moreover, she adds, at Rs 25 per child per day institutions like Palawi neither have adequate funds nor support from government hospitals to tackle the unique health problems of each child.

Sumant is supposed to receive intensive counselling from the local ART centre till his adherence improves, but Shah says the three doctors and four counsellors that cater to 300 HIV patients daily at Solapur Civil Hospital barely have the time to look up. For nearly 3 lakh registered HIV patients in the state, there are less than 1,000 counsellors. Another Palawi resident, four-year-old Khusboo, suffered hearing loss after recurrent ear infections. The diagnosis didn't come from the ART centre, but from her teacher at Palawi’s in-house Gyan Mandir school, who noticed Khusboo was oblivious to classroom activities.

The institution was compelled to start its own school in 2014—a ground-plus-one structure next to the orphanage on Pandharpur’s outskirts—as children are denied admission in regular schools the moment Palawi is mentioned. But it’s a blessing in disguise for these children who struggle to sit through more than one or two classes without dozing off. “A regular school wouldn’t understand or probably tolerate it,” Patil says. Palawi which has been home to 250 HIV-positive children since 2001, has lost 40 to the disease. AIDS claims an average of 2,500 lives in Maharashtra annually; how many are children is not known. The state recently discovered that over 30,000 of the two lakh patients on treatment have dropped out. Here too, paediatric percentage is unclear. On paper, 16,000 children in Maharashtra are on treatment.

Coping is equally challenging for children in the community, who having lost one or both parents to the virus, face vulnerabilities starting from poor access to healthcare and government entitlements to education and nutrition.

Now 17, Palghar native Sachin has been on ART since he was three. He lost his mother at birth and father last December to HIV. He admits to skipping his daily 10-pill regimen. He dropped out of school due to his condition. “The pain would begin after the morning pills. I would cry in class and be compelled to lie down,” said Sachin who can't keep a job either as the medicines make him “drowsy and tired”. At four-feet and grossly underweight at 35kg, Sachin typifies the wasting and stunting associated with HIV.

HIV is a neurotropic virus that not just attacks the immune system but practically affects every organ, resulting in damage to nerve tissues, cognitive development, physical growth, and at the same time causing learning difficulties, speech and language problems. Experts say it’s crucial to monitor toxicity and provide 360-degree healthcare. Dr Ira Shah, an expert in paediatric HIV, says it’s not enough to tell children to take medicines lifelong. “These are toxic drugs given at a much younger age. It is necessary to monitor bone health or metabolic acidosis before the children become intolerant,” she said. In one of her published papers, she wrote about three children who died of neurological complications caused by HIV despite their viral load being suppressed with drugs.

National Aids Control Organisation deputy director Dr R S Gupta admits little is known about how children cope with ART. But he underlines the fact that “they live longer because of the medicines and the average life expectancy now exceeds 20.” There are side-effects, but “what is important is they are alive”. Ironically, Sumant, Khusboo, Sachin are Indian HIV programme's success stories even though they are not thriving but merely surviving.

(Names of all patients have been changed)


"
160,"India, China, Pakistan among 10 nations accounting for 95% of HIV infections: UN report",2017-07-21T12:55:15+05:30,"UNITED NATIONS: India, China and Pakistan are among the 10 countries that accounted for more than 95 per cent of all new HIV infections in the Asia and the Pacific region in 2016, according to a UN report.

The report by the Joint UN Programme on HIV/AIDS, UNAIDS, 'Ending AIDS: Progress towards the 90¬-90-90 targets', gives a comprehensive analysis of the 2014 targets to accelerate progress so that by 2020, 90 per cent of all HIV-infected people know their status, 90 per cent of all HIV-diagnosed people are accessing antiretroviral therapy (ART) and 90 per cent of those taking ART are virally suppressed.

It said scales have tipped for the first time in the fight against AIDS as more than half of all people living with the HIV virus now have access to treatment, while AIDS-related deaths have nearly halved since 2005.

In the Asia and the Pacific region, the majority of new infections are occurring in 10 countries led by India, China, Indonesia, Pakistan, Vietmnam, Myanmar, Papua New Guinea, the Philippines, Thailand and Malaysia. These 10 countries together accounted for more than 95 per cent of all new HIV infections in the region in 2016.

The region's HIV epidemic remains largely concentrated among key populations, including sex workers and their clients, gay men and other men who have sex with men, people who inject drugs, and transgender people. The annual number of new HIV infections in Asia and the Pacific has declined 13 per cent over the last six years, from 310,000 in 2010 to 270,000 in 2016.

The report added that in India, a respondent-driven sampling survey across 26 cities found that knowledge of HIV status was 41 per cent among people living with HIV who inject drugs. Of those who knew their HIV status, only 52 per cent were accessing antiretroviral therapy and 83 per cent of those accessing treatment were virally suppressed (55). Among gay men and other men who have sex with men living with HIV who also were surveyed, 30 per cent knew their HIV status, 68 per cent of those who knew their HIV status were accessing treatment, and 78 per cent of those on treatment were virally suppressed.

The report added that last year, 19.5 million of the 36.7 million people living with HIV globally had access to treatment and AIDS-related deaths have fallen from 1.9 million in 2005 to one million. With continued scale-up, this progress puts the world on track to reach the global target of 30 million people on treatment by 2020, according to the report.

""We met the 2015 target of 15 million people on treatment and we are on track to double that number to 30 million and meet the 2020 target,"" UNAIDS Executive Director Michel Sidibé said.

""We will continue to scale up to reach everyone in need and honour our commitment of leaving no one behind,"" he added.

Eastern and southern Africa, which account for more than half of all people living with the virus, are leading the way. Since 2010, AIDS-related deaths there have declined by 42 per cent and new HIV infections by 29 per cent, including a 56 per cent drop in new infections among children over that period - a remarkable achievement of HIV treatment and prevention efforts aimed at putting that region on track towards ending its AIDS epidemic.

In contrast, progress against the targets has been poor in the Middle East, North Africa, Eastern Europe and Central Asia, where AIDS-related deaths have pointedly risen. Exceptions, however, include Algeria, Morocco and Belarus, which have increased HIV treatment access from 2010 to 2016.

The report also shows that globally, 30 per cent of people living with HIV still do not know their status, 17.1 million are unable to access ART and more than half are not virally suppressed. 

"
161,HIV awareness project for jail inmates launched,2017-02-01T05:57:02+05:30,"GUWAHATI: For the first time in Assam, a prison intervention project (PIP) aimed at scaling up AIDS awareness and counselling among inmates categorised as high risk groups (HRG) was launched as a pilot project at the Guwahati Central Jail on Tuesday. 

The PIP is part of a collaboration between the state prison department, Assam State Aids Control Society (ASACS), National AIDS Control Organisation (NACO) and Emmanuel Hospital Association, which is acting as an implementing body for PIP along with the state prison department.

The PIP aims to bring various established HIV/AIDS intervention programmes at the state level closer to those lodged in central and district jails. ""We don't know how many HIV-positive inmates are lodged in Assam's jails. We have just started the project. We will counsel them and integrate them with intervention programmes,"" said Rebecca of EHA.

It will help HIV-positive inmates get access to free counselling and medicines. Once rolled out, the PIP will be replicated in all the jails of Assam. 

The PIP aims to provide oral/opiod substitution therapy (OST) to drug addicts lodged in prisons. Assam is the last state in the northeast where PIP has been launched. Last year, it was launched at jails of Nagaland, Manipur, Mizoram and Meghalaya.

The PIP project is a part of Project Sunshine - a five-year initiative to raise awareness and start intervention programmes for AIDS-affected people in the northeast.

""We cannot take HIV-positive inmates to hospitals outside the jail. Through PIP, we will bring mobile integrated counselling and testing centre (ICTC) to the prisons. In prisons, it is seen that there are HRG people like female sex workers, intravenous drug users and others. The PIP will aim at fostering communication and bring the vulnerable people closer to intervention programmes and correct the HRG inmates' behavioural pattern,"" said Kailash Ditya, deputy team leader, Project Sunrise.

Project Sunshine is supported by the USA-based federal agency centres for disease control and prevention and implemented by Family Health International 360, a global non-profit development organisation. 

"
162,"Despite meds, Maha's HIV+ kids fight a crippling battle",2018-09-03T08:06:32+05:30,"SOLAPUR: Sumana will turn 18 next year, but she looks 10, is four-feet-tall and weighs 30kg. The HIV-positive girl is hearing impaired and her mental ability is of a child half her age. Like her, at least 60% of the 110 inmates at Solapur's Palawi-Prabha Hira Pratishthan, the state's oldest institution caring for children with HIV, suffer from varying degrees of hearing loss. TOI found that the prevalence of height and weight stunting is more than 70%, while over 30% have stymied mental development. 

 AIDS-related deaths may have dropped by 54% in India over a decade, but most children in rural areas living on antiretroviral therapy (ART) are barely surviving, afflicted by physical and mental deficiencies. The reason: the national programme focuses on medicines instead of a comprehensive medical, nutritional and psychosocial model. For the nearly 3 lakh registered HIV patients in the state, there are less than 1,000 counsellors, mostly underpaid, and overburdened with administrative work. 

 A fourth of India's 60,000-odd children taking ART for HIV live in Maharashtra. With no adequate support, the state recently learned that over 30,000 of the two lakh patients on treatment have quietly dropped out. 

"
163,Youngsters haven’t stopped working for HIV/AIDS patients,2017-07-23T22:47:52+05:30,"The number of HIV/AIDS patients has steadily decreased in the past two years in Maharashtra and credit for that goes to thousands of young health workers, who are working with complete dedication in this field. The sad part is that most of them have not been paid their monthly stipend for more than seven months and yet they haven’t stopped working. We tell you all about their trauma, trials and tribulations…
Sheel Maske (name changed on request) is pursuing his masters in social sciences, but his passion is — easing the agony of those suffering from AIDS. He works as a health worker while pursuing his studies privately. But these days, tension is writ large on his face. Ask him the reason and he shares, “My friends and I get a monthly stipend of `5000. This helps us in travelling to various parts of the city and beyond, spreading awareness about AIDS and giving medicines to those who need it. But we haven’t been paid for almost eight months now. Since I come from a stark middle class family, I can’t ask my parents to help me and I can’t ditch the AIDS patients either. So I have borrowed money from friends; I don’t know how long I will be able to continue like this.”
There are others, who are striving hard to survive in these tough times. Akash Ninawe, a 25-year-old, who is pursuing BSW from a night college, laments, “My parents are very fragile medically, so I take care of the home expenses with my meagre stipend. With money not coming for several months now, things are really sad. I have borrowed from various sources because I can’t even afford to pay for my fee or some of the basic amenities.”
There are some homemakers who are working for HIV/AIDS patients and things have been equally tough for them too. Hemlata Lohave, who has been working for AIDS control in the city for long, shares, “I have borrowed money from loan sharks to make the two ends meet and it is tough running a home in this situation. The sad part is that some of the senior officers of District AIDS Control Unit and Technical Support Unit tell us to quit and not crib about non-payment of dues.” When we contacted programme officer, Nagpur district, Tanuja Fale, she merely said, “I just look after the administration and not the payments.” When we reminded her that payments are also a part of administration, she went on to say, “We hope that the money will be released at the end of this month.” 
Joint director of Maharashtra State Aids Control Society (MSACS), Dr Lokesh Gabhane, however, gave an assurance. “I have worked with the health workers and I understand their pain. It is commendable that these people have been sending their monthly reports on time, this shows their level of commitment. Due to backlog of last year and a half, the problem of non-payment has persisted, but I assure everyone that by next week, the payments will be remitted in people’s accounts directly. This year, the payments will be released every four months and we will get the pending payments also cleared, it’s my promise.”

"
164,Gujarat sees hope in AIDS survivors,2016-12-01T06:18:20+05:30,"AHMEDABAD: She is a battle-hardened mother who exemplifies life amid all hurdles. In March 2000, soon after having tested HIV positive, she gave birth to a son who also was diagnosed with the same disease. In 2005 she lost her husband to AIDS but that too did not see her falter. Armed with an iron-will she took up his job as a cable operator and battled on with her son who is now 17 year old. “I urge people like me to live a healthy life with proper medical treatment,” she said.

Though nearly 2,000 people die of HIV AIDS in Gujarat every year, such cases are a beacon of hope for survivors of the deadly disease. The theme of this year's World AIDS Day on December 1 is “Hands Up for HIV Prevention”. Many survivors in Gujarat exemplify this slogan today.

According to the Union health ministry data, 2,155 HIV positive people have died last year in Gujarat alone. In 2014-15, the state witnessed 2,305 deaths due to HIV infection and in 2013-14 2,399 persons had died of AIDS.

Gujarat is ranked fifth in the country for reporting large number of HIV-related deaths after Andhra Pradesh (12,670), Maharashtra (6,697), Karnataka (5,840) and Tamil Nadu (3,612). According to data compiled by National AIDS Control Organisation, Gujarat has 1.66 lakh people battling AIDS at present.

Amid all the morbid facts, there are many who provide inspiration to the others to not give up. An elderly man, who lives in Paldi was shocked when he was diagnosed as HIV positive in 1998. Today, he has turned his life around and has become an inspiration for others living with the disease. “Initially, I broke down completely when I came to know that I was diagnosed with HIV. My business too collapsed owing to this. But later I decided to fight back and I learned to live with the disease. I am now helping others to live a full life even with AIDS,” he said. 

"
165,HIV vaccine comes closer to reality,2018-06-11T11:02:35+05:30,"WASHINGTON DC: HIV vaccine could soon be a reality.


Researchers have found that Treg cells, a type of regulatory lymphocyte, might be protecting babies in the womb from getting infected with the HIV virus when the mother is infected.

""Finding out what protects the majority of babies is important, as it can lead to ways to boost natural immune responses and make individuals resistant to HIV infection,"" said researcher Peter Kessler from the Emory University School of Medicine.

Scientists had been puzzled for years by the fact that only a minority of babies born to mothers with HIV infection get the infection from their mothers. 

Currently, HIV infection can be successfully managed with antiretroviral drugs, but these drugs have to be given for life. Preventing the infection is very important, but there is no vaccine available yet.

Researchers found that levels of Treg lymphocytes were higher in the blood of newborn babies born to mothers with HIV infection who had escaped the infection themselves, compared with babies who were born with HIV infection.

Lymphocytes are cells of the immune system that protect the body by fighting bacteria and viruses. Treg cells, or regulatory T cells, are an important ""self-check"" in the immune system to prevent excessive immune reactions that could lead to tissue damage.

The researchers examined the blood of 64 babies who were born HIV-uninfected and 28 babies born HIV-infected and found that Treg cell levels were higher in uninfected babies at the time of birth. In contrast, other lymphocyte types were activated and higher in HIV-infected infants. The HIV virus can only infect cells that are activated, so Treg may protect from HIV infection by suppressing activation of other lymphocytes.

They analyzed the stored blood by flow cytometry, a technique that can differentiate between the different types of cells based on what markers they express on their surface. Regulatory T cells come in many forms with the most well-understood being those that express the markers CD4, CD25, and FOXP3.

""Even though the number of babies studied is relatively small, these findings indicate that Treg, by controlling immune activation, may lower the vulnerability of the babies to HIV or other chronic infections even before they are born,"" said Kessler.

These results could pave the way for the development of vaccines or other immune-based therapies that could be used together with medications to prevent the spread of HIV or other infections from mothers to their babies.

"
166,"IAVI, Serum join hands to develop antibody products for HIV, other diseases",2018-10-22T21:46:35+05:30,"New Delhi, Oct 22 () The International AIDS Vaccine Initiative (IAVI) and Serum Institute of India Monday announced a strategic partnership to develop and manufacture monoclonal antibody products for HIV and other global health challenges.  ""Through this partnership, we will work to pioneer a viable and sustainable pathway toward accessible, low-cost, antibody-based products for HIV, which if successful, may also be applied more broadly to innovative monoclonal antibody therapeutics targeting other disease areas,"" IAVI president and CEO Mark Feinberg said in a statement.  Serum Institute of India CEO Adar Poonawalla said the company has a proven record of developing and delivering vaccines and pharmaceutical products globally, and it is already applying this expertise in the field of antibody development.  ""Serum Institute and IAVI have joined forces in the fight against HIV with the aim of making cost-effective monoclonal antibodies for HIV, and in the fields of antimicrobial resistance and anti-snake venom. Provided the breadth of our technology, I am confident that we will be able to make positive contributions in these important areas,"" he added.  Serum Institute of India makes vaccines which are sold in over 170 countries. On the other hand IAVI has worked in India since 2001, and partners with the central government on its network of clinical research centers and laboratories engaged in HIV research, including the Translational Health Science and Technology Institute.  MSS MR MR"
167,An HIV-positive dream hits house hurdle in Kolkata,2018-03-05T04:54:13+05:30,"KOLKATA: They are a bunch of 10 ordinary teenagers, who nourish the dream of making it big. But their HIV-positive status has turned them into social pariahs, with the city offering them no space to pursue their entrepreneurial dreams.

Out to open their own café called “Cafe Positive”, all they have met with for the last three months is a big negative. No house-owner in some of south Kolkata’s posh localities has been willing to rent out space once told about “who will manage and run the shop”.

While a few landlords have straightaway refused saying “e paray erom cholbena (such business won’t run in this neighbourhood)”, others have been courteous enough with financial help and old clothes, but pleaded helplessness in renting out space to the 18-plus teens.

The NGO funding the café and trying to find a 750sqft space has approached over a dozen owners since December at locations like Golpark, Dover Lane, Lake Road, Hindustan Park and Purna Das Road. “We have been looking for a suitable space for the café since December and approached a number of house-owners directly and through brokers. The owners initially seemed excited at the concept, but the moment they learnt that the shop will be managed and run solely by HIV-positive children, they backed out,” said Kallol Ghosh, founder of Anandaghar, a shelter for abandoned HIV/AIDS-infected children.

TOI spoke to two house-owners, one at Lake Road and the other at Dover Lane. “I would not mind renting out space to them. But we live in a joint family and some members have objections. I could not convince them, so I rejected the offer,” said a landlady.

The house-owner at Dover Lane, too, blamed her neighbours and family. “I don’t know how people in our neighbourhood would react to it. I know there are many misconceptions associated with HIV. I don’t think I am in a position to convince everyone. Moreover, I have now decided to rent the space to a boutique and not an eatery,” he said.

The Human Immunodeficiency Virus and Acquired Immune Deficiency Syndrome (Prevention and Control) Bill, 2017 defines what can count as discrimination against HIV-positive people. It lists that denial or discontinuation of employment, education, healthcare services, renting or residing property, standing for public or private office will count as discrimination along with unfair treatment in any of the above mentioned categories.

The shelter at Narendrapur is home to around 70-odd young patients and this café project is part of an initiative to make a group self-sufficient. The NGO will give the initial funds and later hand over the management of the café to the 10 boys and girls, who would be running it.

“We have been undergoing training at this shelter and can’t wait to start our café. We know the disease we suffer from and how it spreads or what precautions we need to take. But strangely, the adults don’t understand that HIV doesn’t spread through touch and often hesitate to even shake hands with us,” said Susanta Pal (name changed), a Class XII student who was diagnosed with HIV when he was just 5.

“HIV does not spread by kissing, hugging, sharing food/drink, toilet seats, sweat, touching, sneeze/cough or through insect bites. We also want society to know about these from our café. But for that, we first need an opportunity,” said Sathi Biswas (name changed), another Class XII student who specialises in sandwich-making and baking cookies.

According to the plan, food and beverages at the 750sqft ground-floor café will be served on disposable plates and there will be no sharp cutleries or glass items that can cause bleeding. “We are not looking for any exceptions or rebate and are ready to pay as per the existing market rate but even then not a single house-owner is ready,” lamented Ghosh.


"
168,"HIV killed 80,000 in Karnataka in 10 years; experts blame government restrictions",2017-11-30T11:07:40+05:30,"BENGALURU: A staggering 80,173 people have died of HIV over the past decade in Karnataka, according to the death audit conducted by Karnataka State AIDS Prevention Society (KSAPS). The state ranks eighth in the country in HIV prevalence.

According to experts, the alarming number of deaths could be because of restrictions put by the government on free antiretroviral therapy (ART) for people living with the deadly disease. Of the 80,173 people who died of the disease, only 60,208 were provided antiretroviral therapy by the government, while the rest 19,965 were left out as they were not deemed eligible for the treatment.



“How come this data is not available on the website? Peer educators, who spread the prevention message among sex workers and play a crucial role, have not been paid honorarium for many months. Unless the state government wakes up and reaches out to the last person, its efforts to cut down on fresh HIV cases won’t yield results,” said David Bodapatti, public health activist who has been working with the affected community.

KSAPS authorities claimed that the state has taken considerable steps to reduce the number of HIV cases. “In prevention of mother-to- child transmission, the state has taken preventive measures. Every pregnant woman is tested for HIV, and if found positive is immediately provided antiretroviral therapy. The number of children tested HIV positive at the age of 18 months was 43 in 2014-15, and has come down to 31 in 2017-18. The mother-to-child transmission rate has come down to less than 5%,” officials said.

"
169,NGO organises Diwali celebrations for children suffering from HIV,2018-10-20T23:33:00+05:30,"Madurai: A youth volunteer NGO, Padikattugal, organised Diwali celebration for children, who have been tested HIV positive, a fortnight ahead of the festival this year. 

The children wore new clothes, burst crackers, disbursed sweets among their friends and had a sumptuous lunch on Saturday.

While many of them have single parent, some of them are orphans and all of them belong to poor economic background, who cannot afford to celebrate the festival lavishly.

Padikattugal has been supporting the HIV positive children and has been giving new clothes to the children during the occasion every year. 

This year the children got a chance to choose the clothes they want. 

Thirty six children in the age group of six to 17 were taken to a textile store in the city and they purchased the dresses of their choice. 

“We requested the textile store to open one hour in advance so that the children would not get stuck in the Diwali rush. Employees at the shop were kind enough to help us. Donors, who saw our post seeking help, had come forward to gift dresses to the children,” said M Kishore Kumar, founder of Padikattugal and a software engineer.

“After shopping, we were taken to a venue where we celebrated the festival much in advance. We enjoyed the day,” said one child.

M Kayalvizhi, coordinator of the event, said that they had kept a donation box in the textile store, where the children went for shopping. They had received good response and made use of the money to purchase clothes for 50 more children hailing from remote parts of the district. While many had bought dresses for themselves, a few could not make it. Clothes and other goods will reach them soon, she said.


"
170,Prisoners to spread AIDS awareness,2017-04-08T10:24:23+05:30,"GUWAHATI: The ongoing prison intervention project (PIP), being carried out at the Guwahati Central Jail to identify high risk groups (HRG) and scaling up of AIDS/HIV awareness among inmates, is to select peer leaders with good behaviour among them to spread the message about the disease. 

PIP was launched as a pilot project in January at the Guwahati Central Jail. It is aimed to bring closer the various established HIV/AIDS intervention programmes at the state level to inmates lodged in the central and district jails across the state.

Experts involved in the project have already completed the baseline needs assignment in profiling the inmates at the central jail. And a ground work report has been prepared in identifying the high risk groups among the inmates.

Kailash Ditya, deputy team leader of Project Sunrise, told TOI on Tuesday that officials associated with PIP are currently doing baseline needs assignment process to identify inmates who could be categorised into risk groups.

A five-year initiative in bringing high level awareness and intervention programmes for HIV-AIDS affected people in the northeast, Project Sunrise is currently focussed on risk assessment of inmates. The programme is supported by the US-based federal agency, Centres for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC) and being implemented by the Family Health International 360 (FHI), a global non-profit development organisation.

""We are in the process of selecting peer leaders from among the inmates. Inmates who have good conduct will be selected and through them we can spread the message about HIV/AIDS,"" said Ditya.

PIP is being carried out in collaboration with the state prison department, Assam State AIDS Control Society (ASACS), Project Sunshine, National Aids Control Organisation (NACO), and Emmanuel Hospital Association, a pan India non-profit health provider and the implementing body. 


"
171,"Harvard honours Elton John for efforts for fighting HIV, AIDS",2017-11-07T15:21:07+05:30,"Harvard Foundation has honoured legendary singer Elton John for his contribution in the fight against HIV and AIDS. 

Reportedly, the 70-year-old musician received the prestigious Peter J Gomes Humanitarian Award at the world-renowned university.



Harvard honors Elton John for work fighting HIV/AIDSUSA-AIDS/ELTONJOHN:Harvard honors Elton John for work fighting HIV/AIDS

In his acceptance speech, John said drugs had turned him into a 'monster' and it was a wake-up call for him when ended up losing many friends to substance abuse. 

""My passion and commitment to music opened up imaginable doors and took me to new heights in life. But once I hit the pinnacle, happiness became elusive and darkness crept in. I lost my own humanity in an excess of drugs, alcoholism, and eating disorders,"" he said. 

The Grammy-winning artiste, who has been sober for 27 years now, said he believes humanity is the most powerful force in the world that can help people shun drugs and embrace the brighter side of life. 

""Through my career and humanitarian work, I've seen how people can be pulled together. The human spirit is the most powerful thing in the world, and when it embraces kindness and does good things, wonderful things happen. 

""Nothing is more profound or powerful than recognising our common humanity. I know how easy it is to despair. We can rise above it and lift people up. This period of darkness we're going through right now is the period right before the light we will all treasure,"" John said. 

The 'Your Song' hitmaker had started Elton John AIDS Foundation in the early '90s dedicated to the cause that continues to help people around the globe. 


AIDS epidemic not over: Elton John01:38

 
"
172,Fatehpur’s ‘HIV village’ has seen no fresh case in 5 years,2018-02-19T07:21:28+05:30,"UDAI SARAI (Fatehpur): Residents of this small village in Fatehpur district would empathise with HIV-affected Bangarmau town in Unnao the most.

More than 12 years ago, their village had hit headlines for reporting a large number of HIV positive cases in a health camp. The incident had lent Udai Sarai a negative image, feel its residents, some of them relieved that the tag is now for Bangarmau’s villages. “Whenever I told people I was from Udai Sarai, they used to quickly check if it was the same HIV village that made news a few years ago. Though I was embarrassed, I had to accept the truth,” said former village head Dhanraj.

“The Unnao villages’ incident is unfortunate,” he added, referring to the case where a quack had infected 58 people with a syringe. “But things will change if people determine. Take the case of our village, no new HIV case has been reported in Udai Sarai for a few years. This will help us shun the bad image,” he added.

Awareness measures have helped Udai Sarai stay HIV-free for 5 years

‘Women spearheading change by discussing prevention’

In the detection in 2005, 52 people had tested positive for HIV. Of them, 48 have died while the remaining are on anti-retroviral therapy. The village, barely 18km from a government hospital, was home to around 500 families at that time. At least one member from each was working in Maharashtra or Gujarat. With migrant population believed to be a major reason for the virus, HIV came to be known as ‘Mumbai wali bimari’ here.

Today, 90% of the 700 houses in the village have someone working in Maharashtra but no new case has been reported in the past five years.

Women have driven the change by openly talking about prevention, claim health activists and officials. Caution has become their second nature.

“Women maketheir husbands get themselves tested for HIV at least once a year,” said Vidya Devi, who was a newly wed in 2005. Anganwadi worker Gyan Swaroopa has been a hero of HIV prevention by counselling the women. Breaking barriers of shame and harassment—there is fear of being teased by men for talking

about sex—she speaks openly to every boy who heads to Mumbai. “Isme kahekisharam... jaan hai to jahan hai (Why be ashamed of doing my duty. Health and survival are the most important),” she reasons.

As a result, the air of stigma around HIV is absent in this village.

“You can pose direct questions on HIV here unlike in other villages. In fact, HIV testing is considered even at the onset of a simplefever,” saidRajendra Sahu of Nehru Yuva Sangathan Tisi, a social organisation working to create awareness around HIV/ AIDS. Village head Jagatpal said: “The men have been told to have sex only with their wives. The elders keep an eye on the behaviour of their children. Those in Mumbai keep an eye on each other and ensure that no one gets deviated. Medical advice is taken for every disease. Even a simple fever is not ignored and HIV testing is done.”

“No HIV positive case has been reported from this village in five years,” said Dr SP Jauhari, secretary of the district aids control society. However, HIV cases in Fatehpur district have continued to rise. Against 97 cases in 2014, 163 cases were reported in 2017. January alone this year has seen 27 cases, data from the health department shows.


"
173,9-year-old HIV+ girl found hanging months after mom dies of AIDS,2017-06-23T07:25:52+05:30,"KOLKATA: The body of a nine-year-old girl, who had tested positive for HIV , was found hanging at her maternal grandparents' home in Behala on Wednesday night. Police suspect she might have been suffering from depression since her mother died of AIDS five months ago and committed suicide. They are waiting for the post-mortem report to rule out foul play.

The girl has been living at the Be hala address for the past few years. It was her mother who had decided to return to her parents' home with her son and daughter after her husband deserted them when he was detected with AIDS. The girl's mother had died in January . The family suspects the father, too, may have died by now.

The girl's grandmother said her son-in-law had never contacted the family after walking out a few years ago.

It was the girl's 11-year-old brother who first spotted her body hanging from the ceiling. It was he who cut the rope and brought her down. Their maternal uncle then rushed to Vidyasagar S G Hospital with the body , where doctors declared her dead.

Neighbours said both the girl and the boy studied at local schools in Be hala. They lived in the house alongwith the grandmother, a maternal uncle and a pet dog.

The family had been living in the two-room tolly-roofed house -a stark misfit in the middle-class neighbourhood of Senhati Bazaar in Behala for the past several years.

“The young boy was visibly shaken after he brought down the lifeless body of his sister. He has not been speaking to anyone. To make matters worse, cops called him and his elderly grandmother to the police station and recorded their statements for several hours on Thursday . They looked physically and emotionally drained when they came back home on Thursday night,“ said a neighbour, unwilling to be named.

TOI attempted to speak to both the boy and the grandmother, but they refused to speak. “We don't want to say anything. I just wish no one has to go through the kind of suffering me and my grandson are going through. We are tired and don't have anything to share,“ the grandmother told TOI on Thursday evening.

According to the uncle, the girl was undergoing treatment and aware of her disease. Locals said she had tried to escape a couple of years ago, but the attempt was foiled after a neighbour spotted her.

"
174,"HIV+ man acquitted of killing son, wife turns hostile",2018-08-17T23:55:00+05:30,"Mumbai: A 51-year-old HIV-positive man was recently acquitted of murdering his minor son in 2016 after his wife, the complainant in the case, turned hostile. Police alleged that the accused killed the child after suspecting that he too was HIV positive like his wife, daughter and himself. 

The woman denied telling the cops earlier that her husband had called her up after disappearing with their son and said that he had killed him. The child was found drowned in a nullah along the railway tracks.

Observing that the homicidal death of the child was not proved, the sessions court also did not find the alleged motive convincing. “It is not believable that when his wife and daughter are suffering from HIV and they were taking treatment at a civil hospital in Jalna, then merely on suspicion that the deceased might be suffering from HIV, he would take such a drastic step of taking the life of his son,” the court said. 

The accused and his wife had six children. The accused had been in jail from July 11, 2016. The prosecution stated that on July 5, 2016, the son was crying so the accused took him out. The prosecution said after there no trace of the father and the son, the woman appproached the police at 4am the next day, and later the accused called her on her phone and said he had killed their son. 

Pointing to her statement during the trial, the court said her evidence showed that her son was missing, so her husband went to search him.


"
